Table of Contents
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
FORM 10-K
ANNUAL  REPORT PURSUANT T O SECTION 13 OR 15 (d) OF THE
SECURITIES  EXCHANGE ACT OF 1934
For the fiscal year ended December 31, 2019
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, INC.
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, L.P.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
Delaware
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
Delaware
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(State of incorporation
or organization)001-14469
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
001-36110
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(Commission File No.)04-6268599
(Simon Property Group, Inc.)
34-1755769
(Simon Property Group, L.P.)
(I.R.S. Employer
Identification No.)
225 West Washington Street
Indianapolis, Indiana 46204
(Address of principal executive offices) (ZIP Code)
(317) 636-1600
(Registrant’s telephone number, including area code)
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:
Title of each class     Trading Symbols     Name of each exchange on which registered
Simon Property Group, Inc. Common stock, $0.0001 par value SPG New York Stock Exchange
Simon Property Group, Inc.83/8% Series J Cumulative Redeemable
Preferred Stock, $0.0001 par valueSPGJ New York Stock Exchange
Simon Property Group, L.P. 2.375% Senior Unsecured Notes due 2020 SPG/20 New York Stock Exchange
Securities registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act: None
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer (as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act). 
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark if the Registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or Section 15(d) of the Act.
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ◻    No ☒ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ◻    No ⌧
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such
shorter period that the Registrant was required to file such reports), and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days.
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant has submitted electronically every Interactive Data File required to be submitted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T (§232.405 of this chapter)
during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the Registrant was required to submit such files). 
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ☒    No ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ⌧    No ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, a non-accelerated filer, smaller reporting company, or an emerging growth company. See the
definitions of “large accelerated filer,” “accelerated filer,” “smaller reporting company,” and “emerging growth company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act (check one):
Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Large accelerated filer ☒ Accelerated filer ◻ Non-accelerated filer ◻ Smaller reporting company ◻
Emerging growth company ◻
Simon Property Group, L.P.:
Large accelerated filer ◻ Accelerated filer ◻ Non-accelerated filer ☒ Smaller reporting company ◻
Emerging growth company ◻
If an emerging growth company, indicate by check mark if the Registrant has elected not to use the extended transition period for complying with any new or revised financial accounting standards
provided pursuant to Section 13(a) of the Exchange Act.  
Simon Property Group, Inc.    ◻ Simon Property Group, L.P.    ◻
Indicate by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as defined in rule 12-b of the Act).
Simon Property Group, Inc.    Yes ◻    No ⌧ Simon Property Group, L.P.    Yes ◻    No ⌧
The aggregate market value of shares of common stock held by non-affiliates of Simon Property Group, Inc. was approximately $48,849 million based on the closing sale price on the New York
Stock Exchange for such stock on June 30, 2019.
As of January 31, 2020, Simon Property Group, Inc. had 306,860,960 and 8,000 shares of common stock and Class B common stock outstanding, respectively.
Simon Property Group, L.P. had no publicly-traded voting equity as of June 30, 2019.  Simon Property Group, L.P. has no common stock outstanding.
Documents Incorporated By Reference
Portions of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Proxy Statement in connection with its 2020 Annual Meeting of Stockholders are incorporated by reference in Part III.
Table of Contents
2EXPLANATORY NOTE
This report combines the annual reports on Form 10-K for the annual period ended December 31, 2019 of Simon
Property Group, Inc., a Delaware corporation, and Simon Property Group, L.P., a Delaware limited partnership. Unless stated
otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to “Simon” mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the
“Operating Partnership” mean Simon Property Group, L.P. References to “we,” “us” and “our” mean collectively Simon, the
Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by Simon and/or the Operating Partnership.
Simon is a real estate investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the Internal
Revenue Code. We are structured as an umbrella partnership REIT under which substantially all of our business is conducted
through the Operating Partnership, Simon’s majority-owned partnership subsidiary, for which Simon is the general partner. As of
December 31, 2019, Simon owned an approximate 86.8% ownership interest in the Operating Partnership, with the remaining
13.2% ownership interest owned by limited partners. As the sole general partner of the Operating Partnership, Simon has
exclusive control of the Operating Partnership’s day-to-day management.
We operate Simon and the Operating Partnership as one business. The management of Simon consists of the same
members as the management of the Operating Partnership. As general partner with control of the Operating Partnership, Simon
consolidates the Operating Partnership for financial reporting purposes, and Simon has no material assets or liabilities other
than its investment in the Operating Partnership. Therefore, the assets and liabilities of Simon and the Operating Partnership are
the same on their respective financial statements.
We believe that combining the annual reports on Form 10-K of Simon and the Operating Partnership into this single
report provides the following benefits:
●enhances investors’ understanding of Simon and the Operating Partnership by enabling investors to view the
business as a whole in the same manner as management views and operates the business;
●eliminates duplicative disclosure and provides a more streamlined presentation since substantially all of the disclosure
in this report applies to both Simon and the Operating Partnership; and
●creates time and cost efficiencies through the preparation of one combined report instead of two separate reports.
We believe it is important for investors to understand the few differences between Simon and the Operating Partnership
in the context of how we operate as a consolidated company. The primary difference is that Simon itself does not conduct
business, other than acting as the general partner of the Operating Partnership and issuing equity or equity-related instruments
from time to time. In addition, Simon itself does not incur any indebtedness, as all debt is incurred by the Operating Partnership
or entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by the Operating Partnership.
The Operating Partnership holds, directly or indirectly, substantially all of our assets, including our ownership interests in
our joint ventures. The Operating Partnership conducts substantially all of our business and is structured as a partnership with
no publicly traded equity. Except for the net proceeds from equity issuances by Simon, which are contributed to the capital of the
Operating Partnership in exchange for, in the case of common stock issuances by Simon, common units of partnership interest
in the Operating Partnership, or units, or, in the case of preferred stock issuances by Simon, preferred units of partnership
interest in the Operating Partnership, or preferred units, the Operating Partnership, directly or indirectly, generates the capital
required by our business through its operations, the incurrence of indebtedness, proceeds received from the disposition of
certain properties and joint ventures and the issuance of units or preferred units to third parties.
The presentation of stockholders’ equity, partners’ equity and noncontrolling interests are the main areas of difference
between the consolidated financial statements of Simon and those of the Operating Partnership. The differences between
stockholders’ equity and partners’ equity result from differences in the equity issued at the Simon and Operating Partnership
levels. The units held by limited partners in the Operating Partnership are accounted for as partners’ equity in the Operating
Partnership’s financial statements and as noncontrolling interests in Simon’s financial statements. The noncontrolling interests in
the Operating Partnership’s financial statements include the interests of unaffiliated partners in various consolidated
partnerships. The noncontrolling interests in Simon’s financial statements include the same noncontrolling interests at the
Operating Partnership level and, as previously stated, the units held by limited partners of the Operating Partnership. Although
classified differently, total equity of Simon and the Operating Partnership is the same.
To help investors understand the differences between Simon and the Operating Partnership, this report provides:
●separate consolidated financial statements for Simon and the Operating Partnership;
Table of Contents
3●a single set of notes to such consolidated financial statements that includes separate discussions of noncontrolling
interests and stockholders’ equity or partners’ equity, accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and per share
and per unit data, as applicable;
●a combined Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations section that also
includes discrete information related to each entity; and
●separate Part II, Item 5. Market for Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters and Issuer Purchases
of Equity Securities sections related to each entity.
This report also includes separate Part II, Item 9A. Controls and Procedures sections and separate Exhibits 31 and 32
certifications for each of Simon and the Operating Partnership in order to establish that the requisite certifications have been
made and that Simon and the Operating Partnership are each compliant with Rule 13a-14(a) or Rule 15d-14(a) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934 and 18 U.S.C. §1350. The separate discussions of Simon and the Operating Partnership in this report
should be read in conjunction with each other to understand our results on a consolidated basis and how management operates
our business.
In order to highlight the differences between Simon and the Operating Partnership, the separate sections in this report for
Simon and the Operating Partnership specifically refer to Simon and the Operating Partnership. In the sections that combine
disclosure of Simon and the Operating Partnership, this report refers to actions or holdings of Simon and the Operating
Partnership as being “our” actions or holdings. Although the Operating Partnership is generally the entity that directly or indirectly
enters into contracts and joint ventures, holds assets and incurs debt, we believe that references to “we,” “us” or “our” in this
context is appropriate because the business is one enterprise and we operate substantially all of our business through the
Operating Partnership.
Table of Contents
4Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Annual Report on Form 10-K
December 31, 2019
TABLE OF CONTENTS
Item No.   Page No.
Part I
1. Business 5
1A. Risk Factors 11
1B. Unresolved Staf f Comments 23
2. Properties 24
3. Legal Proceedings 50
4. Mine Safety Disclosures 50
Part II
5. Market for the Registrant’ s Common Equity , Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer Purchases of
Equity Securities 51
6. Selected Financial Data 53
7. Management’ s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations 55
7A. Qualitative and Quantitative Disclosure About Market Risk 72
8. Financial Statements and Supplementary Data 73
9. Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure 124
9A. Controls and Procedures 124
9B. Other Information 126
Part III
10. Directors, Executive Of ficers and Corporate Governance 126
11. Executive Compensation 126
12. Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related
Stockholder Matters 126
13. Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence 126
14. Principal Accountant Fees and Services 126
Part IV
15. Exhibits, and Financial Statement Schedules 128
16. Form 10-K Summary 128
Signatures 134
Table of Contents
5Part I
Item 1.Business
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and self-managed real estate
investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the Internal Revenue Code. REITs will
generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they distribute not less than 100% of their REIT
taxable income. Simon Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned Delaware partnership subsidiary that owns all of our real
estate properties and other assets. Unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to "Simon" mean
Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the "Operating Partnership" mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to
"we," "us" and "our" mean collectively Simon, the Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by
Simon and/or the Operating Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's partnership agreement, the Operating
Partnership is required to pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use destinations, which consist
primarily of malls, Premium Outlets®, and The Mills®. As of December 31, 2019, we owned or held an interest in 204 income-
producing properties in the United States, which consisted of 106 malls, 69 Premium Outlets, 14 Mills, four lifestyle centers, and
11 other retail properties in 37 states and Puerto Rico. Internationally, as of December 31, 2019, we had ownership interests in
29 Premium Outlets and Designer Outlet properties primarily located in Asia, Europe and Canada. As of December 31, 2019, we
also owned a 22.2% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate company, which owns,
or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 15 countries in Europe.
For a description of our operational strategies and developments in our business during 2019, see Item 7,
“Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations” of this Form 10-K.
Other Policies
The following is a discussion of our investment policies, financing policies, conflict of interest policies and policies with
respect to certain other activities. One or more of these policies may be amended or rescinded from time to time without a
stockholder vote.
Investment Policies
While we emphasize equity real estate investments, we may also provide secured financing to or invest in equity or debt
securities of other entities engaged in real estate activities or securities of other issuers consistent with Simon’s qualification as a
REIT. However, any of these investments would be subject to the percentage ownership limitations and gross income tests
necessary for REIT qualification. These REIT limitations mean that Simon cannot make an investment that would cause its real
estate assets to be less than 75% of its total assets. Simon must also derive at least 75% of its gross income directly or indirectly
from investments relating to real property or mortgages on real property, including “rents from real property,” dividends from
other REITs and, in certain circumstances, interest from certain types of temporary investments. In addition, Simon must also
derive at least 95% of its gross income from such real property investments, and from dividends, interest and gains from the sale
or dispositions of stock or securities or from other combinations of the foregoing.
Subject to Simon’s REIT limitations, we may invest in the securities of other issuers in connection with acquisitions of
indirect interests in real estate. Such an investment would normally be in the form of general or limited partnership or
membership interests in special purpose partnerships and limited liability companies that own one or more properties. We may,
in the future, acquire all or substantially all of the securities or assets of other REITs, management companies or similar entities
where such investments would be consistent with our investment policies.
Financing Policies
Because Simon’s REIT qualification requires us to distribute at least 90% of its REIT taxable income, we regularly access
the debt markets to raise the funds necessary to finance acquisitions, develop and redevelop properties, and refinance maturing
debt. We must comply with the covenants contained in our financing agreements that limit our ratio of debt to total assets or
market value, as defined. For example, the Operating Partnership’s lines of credit and the indentures for the Operating
Partnership’s debt securities contain covenants that restrict the total amount of debt of the Operating Partnership to 65%, or 60%
in relation to certain debt, of total assets, as defined under the related agreements, and secured debt to 50% of total assets. In
addition, these agreements contain other covenants requiring compliance with financial
Table of Contents
6ratios. Furthermore, the amount of debt that we may incur is limited as a practical matter by our desire to maintain acceptable
ratings for the debt securities of the Operating Partnership. We strive to maintain investment grade ratings at all times for various
business reasons, including their effect on our ability to access attractive capital, but we cannot assure you that we will be able
to do so in the future.
If Simon’s Board of Directors determines to seek additional capital, we may raise such capital by offering equity or
incurring debt, creating joint ventures with existing ownership interests in properties, entering into joint venture arrangements for
new development projects, retaining cash flows or a combination of these methods. If Simon’s Board of Directors determines to
raise equity capital, it may, without stockholder approval, issue additional shares of common stock or other capital stock. Simon’s
Board of Directors may issue a number of shares up to the amount of our authorized capital or may issue units in any manner
and on such terms and for such consideration as it deems appropriate. We may also raise additional capital by issuing common
units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership, or units. Such securities also may include additional classes of Simon’s
preferred stock or preferred units of partnership interest in the Operating Partnership, or preferred units, which may be
convertible into common stock or units, as the case may be. Existing stockholders and unitholders have no preemptive right to
purchase shares or units in any subsequent issuances of securities by us. Any issuance of equity could dilute a stockholder’s
investment in Simon or a limited partner’s investment in the Operating Partnership.
We expect most future borrowings will be made through the Operating Partnership or its subsidiaries. We might, however,
incur borrowings through other entities that would be reloaned to the Operating Partnership. Borrowings may be in the form of
bank borrowings, publicly and privately placed debt instruments, or purchase money obligations to the sellers of properties. Any
such indebtedness may be secured or unsecured. Any such indebtedness may also have full or limited recourse to the borrower
or be cross-collateralized with other debt, or may be fully or partially guaranteed by the Operating Partnership. We issue
unsecured debt securities through the Operating Partnership, but we may issue other debt securities which may be convertible
into common or preferred stock or be accompanied by warrants to purchase common or preferred stock. We also may sell or
securitize our lease receivables. Although we may borrow to fund the payment of dividends, we currently have no expectation
that we will regularly do so.
The Operating Partnership has a $4.0 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or Credit Facility. The Credit Facility’s
initial borrowing capacity of $4.0 billion may be increased to $5.0 billion during its term. The initial maturity date of the Credit
Facility is June 30, 2021 and can be extended for an additional year to June 30, 2022 at our sole option, subject to our continued
compliance with the terms thereof. The base interest rate on the Credit Facility is LIBOR plus 77.5 basis points, with an
additional facility fee of 10 basis points. The Operating Partnership also has a $3.5 billion supplemental unsecured revolving
credit facility, or Supplemental Facility, and together with the Credit Facility, the Credit Facilities. The Supplemental Facility’s
initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5 billion during its term. The initial maturity date of the
Supplemental Facility is June 30, 2022 and can be extended for an additional year to June 30, 2023 at our sole option, subject to
our continued compliance with the terms thereof. The base interest rate on the Supplemental Facility is LIBOR plus 77.5 basis
points, with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points. The Credit Facilities provide for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars,
Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars.
The Operating Partnership also has available a global unsecured commercial paper note program, or Commercial Paper
program, of $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S. dollar equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may issue unsecured commercial
paper notes, denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro and other currencies. Notes issued in non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one
or more subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership and are guaranteed by the Operating Partnership. Notes are sold under
customary terms in the U.S. and Euro commercial paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a result of the
guarantee described above) pari passu with the Operating Partnership’s other unsecured senior indebtedness. The Commercial
Paper program is supported by the Credit Facilities and, if necessary or appropriate, we may make one or more draws under
either Credit Facility to pay amounts outstanding from time to time on the Commercial Paper program.
We may also finance our business through the following:
●issuance of shares of common stock or preferred stock or warrants to purchase the same;
●issuance of additional units;
●issuance of preferred units;
●issuance of other securities, including unsecured notes and mortgage debt;
●draws on our Credit Facilities;
Table of Contents
7●borrowings under the Commercial Paper program; or
●sale or exchange of ownership interests in properties.
The Operating Partnership may also issue units to contributors of properties or other partnership interests which may
permit the contributor to defer tax gain recognition under the Internal Revenue Code.
We do not have a policy limiting the number or amount of mortgages that may be placed on any particular property.
Mortgage financing instruments, however, typically limit additional indebtedness on such properties. Additionally, the
Credit Facilities, our unsecured note indentures and other contracts may limit our ability to borrow and contain limits on
mortgage indebtedness we may incur as well as certain financial covenants we must maintain.
Typically, we invest in or form special purpose entities to assist us in obtaining secured permanent financing at attractive
terms. Permanent financing may be structured as a mortgage loan on a single property, or on a group of properties, and
generally requires us to provide a mortgage lien on the property or properties in favor of an institutional third party, as a joint
venture with a third party, or as a securitized financing. For securitized financings, we create special purpose entities to own the
properties. These special purpose entities, which are common in the real estate industry, are structured so that they would not
be consolidated in a bankruptcy proceeding involving a parent company. We decide upon the structure of the financing based
upon the best terms then available to us and whether the proposed financing is consistent with our other business objectives.
For accounting purposes, we include the outstanding securitized debt of special purpose entities owning consolidated properties
as part of our consolidated indebtedness.
Conflict of Interest Policies
We maintain policies and have entered into agreements designed to reduce or eliminate potential conflicts of interest.
Simon has adopted governance principles governing the function, conduct, selection, orientation and duties of its subsidiaries
and Simon’s Board of Directors and the Company, as well as written charters for each of the standing Committees of Simon’s
Board of Directors. In addition, Simon’s Board of Directors has a Code of Business Conduct and Ethics, which applies to all of its
officers, directors, and employees and those of its subsidiaries. At least a majority of the members of Simon’s Board of Directors
must qualify, and do qualify, as independent under the listing standards of the New York Stock Exchange, or NYSE, and cannot
be affiliated with the Simon family, who are significant stockholders in Simon and/or unitholders in the Operating Partnership. In
addition, the Audit and Compensation Committees of Simon’s Board of Directors are comprised entirely of independent
members who meet the additional independence and financial expert requirements of the NYSE as required.
The sale by the Operating Partnership of any property that it owns may have an adverse tax impact on the Simon family
or other limited partners of the Operating Partnership. Any transaction between us and the Simon family, including property
acquisitions, service and property management agreements and retail space leases, must be approved by the Company’s Audit
Committee.
In order to avoid any conflict of interest, the Simon charter requires that at least three-fourths of Simon’s independent
directors must authorize and require the Operating Partnership to sell any property it owns. Any such sale is subject to
applicable agreements with third parties. A noncompetition agreement executed by Herbert Simon, Simon’s Chairman Emeritus,
and a noncompetition agreement executed by David Simon, Simon’s Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President, which
remains in effect notwithstanding the expiration of David Simon’s employment agreement in 2019, contain covenants limiting
their ability to participate in certain shopping center activities.
Policies With Respect To Certain Other Activities
We intend to make investments which are consistent with Simon’s qualification as a REIT, unless Simon’s Board of
Directors determines that it is no longer in Simon’s best interests to so qualify as a REIT. Simon’s Board of Directors may make
such a determination because of changing circumstances or changes in the REIT requirements. Simon has authority to issue
shares of its capital stock or other securities in exchange for property. We also have authority to repurchase or otherwise
reacquire Simon’s shares, the Operating Partnership’s units, or any other securities. On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of
Directors authorized a two-year extension of the previously authorized $2.0 billion common stock repurchase plan, or the
Repurchase Program, through March 31, 2019 and on February 11, 2019, Simon's Board of Directors authorized a new common
stock repurchase plan.  Under the new program, the Company may purchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during the
two-year period ending February 11, 2021.  Under the Repurchase Program, Simon may repurchase the shares in the open
market, or in privately negotiated transactions. At December 31, 2019, we had remaining authority to repurchase $1.6 billion of
common stock. Simon may also issue shares of its common stock, or
Table of Contents
8pay cash at its option, to holders of units in future periods upon exercise of such holders’ rights under the partnership agreement
of the Operating Partnership. Our policy prohibits us from making any loans to the directors or executive officers of Simon for
any purpose. We may make loans to the joint ventures in which we participate. Additionally, we may make or buy interests in
loans secured by real estate properties owned by others or make investments in companies that own real estate assets.
Competition
The retail real estate industry is dynamic and competitive. We compete with numerous merchandise distribution
channels, including malls, outlet centers, community/lifestyle centers, and other shopping centers in the United States and
abroad. We also compete with internet retailing sites and catalogs which provide retailers with distribution options beyond
existing brick and mortar retail properties. The existence of competitive alternatives could have a material adverse effect on our
ability to lease space and on the level of rents we can obtain. This results in competition for both the tenants to occupy the
properties that we develop and manage as well as for the acquisition of prime sites (including land for development and
operating properties). We believe that there are numerous factors that make our properties highly desirable to retailers,
including:
●the quality, location and diversity of our properties;
●our management and operational expertise;
●our extensive experience and relationships with retailers, lenders and suppliers; and
●our marketing initiatives and consumer focused strategic corporate alliances.
Certain Activities
During the past three years, we have:
●issued 617,143 shares of Simon common stock upon the exchange of units in the Operating Partnership;
●issued 219,318 restricted shares of Simon common stock and 103,941 long-term incentive performance units, or LTIP
units, net of forfeitures, under The Simon Property Group 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, as amended, or the 1998 Plan,
and the Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan, or the 2019 Plan;
●purchased 6,990,898 shares of Simon common stock in the open market for $1.1 billion pursuant to our Repurchase
Programs;
●issued 475,183 units in the Operating Partnership in exchange for the remaining interest in a former joint venture
property;
●redeemed 497,959 units in the Operating Partnership at an average price of $177.43 per unit in cash;
●amended and extended the Supplemental Facility in February 2018 to further increase our borrowing capacity, extend
its term and reduce its base interest rate;
●amended and extended the Credit Facility in March 2017 to extend its term and reduce its base interest rate;
●borrowed a maximum amount of $423.1 million under the Credit Facilities; the outstanding amount of borrowings
under the Credit Facility as of December 31, 2019 was $125.0 million and no borrowings were outstanding under the
Supplemental Facility;
●increased the borrowing capacity of the Commercial Paper program from $1.0 billion to $2.0 billion in November 2018;
the outstanding amount of Commercial Paper notes as of December 31, 2019 was $1.3 billion; and
●provided annual reports containing financial statements audited by our independent registered public accounting firm
and quarterly reports containing unaudited financial statements to our security holders.
Employees
At December 31, 2019, we and our affiliates employed approximately 4,500 persons at various properties and offices
throughout the United States, of which approximately 1,500 were part-time. Approximately 1,000 of these employees were
located at our corporate headquarters in Indianapolis, Indiana.
Table of Contents
9Corporate Headquarters
Our corporate headquarters are located at 225 West Washington Street, Indianapolis, Indiana 46204, and our telephone
number is (317) 636-1600.
Available Information
Simon is a large accelerated filer (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or the
Exchange Act) and is required, pursuant to Item 101 of Regulation S-K, to provide certain information regarding our website and
the availability of certain documents filed with or furnished to the Securities and Exchange Commission, or the SEC. Our Internet
website address is www.simon.com. Our annual reports on Form 10-K, quarterly reports on Form 10-Q, current reports on
Form 8-K and amendments to those reports filed or furnished pursuant to Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Exchange Act are
available or may be accessed free of charge through the “About Simon/Investor Relations” section of our Internet website as
soon as reasonably practicable after we electronically file such material with, or furnish it to, the SEC. Our Internet website and
the information contained therein or connected thereto are not, and are not intended to be, incorporated into this Annual Report
on Form 10-K.
The following corporate governance documents are also available through the “About Simon/Investor Relations/
Governance” section of our Internet website or may be obtained in print form by request of our Investor Relations Department:
Governance Principles, Code of Business Conduct and Ethics, Audit Committee Charter, Compensation Committee Charter, and
Governance and Nominating Committee Charter.
In addition, we intend to disclose on our Internet website any amendments to, or waivers from, our Code of Business
Conduct and Ethics that are required to be publicly disclosed pursuant to rules of the SEC and the NYSE.
Information about our Executive Officers
The following table sets forth certain information with respect to Simon’s executive officers as of February 21, 2020.
Name Age Position
David Simon 58 Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive Of ficer and President
John Rulli 63 President of Malls and Chief Administrative Of ficer
Steven E. Fivel 59 General Counsel and Secretary
Brian J. McDade 40 Executive V ice President, Chief Financial Of ficer and Treasurer
Alexander L. W . Snyder 50 Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary
Adam J. Reuille 45 Senior V ice President and Chief Accounting Of ficer
The executive officers of Simon serve at the pleasure of Simon’s Board of Directors.
Mr. Simon has served as the Chairman of Simon’s Board of Directors since 2007, Chief Executive Officer of Simon or its
predecessor since 1995 and assumed the position of President in 2019. Mr. Simon has also been a director of Simon or its
predecessor since its incorporation in 1993. Mr. Simon was the President of Simon’s predecessor from 1993 to 1996. From 1988
to 1990, Mr. Simon was Vice President of Wasserstein Perella & Company. From 1985 to 1988, he was an Associate at First
Boston Corp. He is the son of the late Melvin Simon and the nephew of Herbert Simon.
Mr. Rulli serves as Simon’s President of Malls and Chief Administrative Officer. Mr. Rulli joined Melvin Simon &
Associates, Inc., or MSA, in 1988 and held various positions with MSA and Simon thereafter. Mr. Rulli became Chief
Administrative Officer in 2007 and was promoted to Senior Executive Vice President in 2011. Mr. Rulli was promoted to
President of Malls in 2017.
Mr. Fivel serves as Simon’s General Counsel and Secretary. Prior to rejoining Simon in 2011 as Assistant General
Counsel and Assistant Secretary, Mr. Fivel served as Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary of Brightpoint,
Inc. Mr. Fivel was previously employed by MSA from 1988 until 1993 and then by Simon from 1993 to 1996.  Mr. Fivel was
promoted to General Counsel and Secretary in 2017.
Mr. McDade serves as Simon’s Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Treasurer. Mr. McDade joined
Simon in 2007 as the Director of Capital Markets and was promoted to Senior Vice President of Capital Markets in 2013.
Mr. McDade became Treasurer in 2014 and was promoted to Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer in 2018.
Mr. Snyder serves as Simon’s Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary. Mr. Snyder joined Simon in 2016 as
Senior Deputy General Counsel. Immediately prior to joining Simon, Mr. Snyder was Managing Partner of the Crimson
Table of Contents
10Fulcrum Strategic Institute. Mr. Snyder previously served as Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate
Secretary for Beechcraft Corporation as well as Chief Counsel Mergers & Acquisitions for Koch Industries, Inc.  Mr. Snyder was
promoted to Assistant General Counsel and Assistant Secretary in 2017.
Mr. Reuille serves as Simon’s Senior Vice President and Chief Accounting Officer and prior to that as Simon’s Vice
President and Corporate Controller. Mr. Reuille joined Simon in 2009 and was promoted to Senior Vice President and Chief
Accounting Officer in 2018.
Table of Contents
11Item 1A.  Risk Factors
The following factors, among others, could cause our actual results to differ materially from those expressed or implied in
forward-looking statements made in this Annual Report on Form 10 K and presented elsewhere by our management from time to
time. These factors may have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition, liquidity, results of operations, funds
from operations, or FFO, and prospects, which we refer to herein as a material adverse effect on us or as materially and
adversely affecting us, and you should carefully consider them. Additional risks and uncertainties not presently known to us or
which are currently not believed to be material may also affect our actual results. We may update these factors in our future
periodic reports.
Risks Relating to Retail Operations
Conditions that adversely affect the general retail environment could materially and adversely affect us.
Our concentration in the retail real estate market – our primary source of revenue is retail tenants – means that we could
be materially and adversely affected by conditions that materially and adversely affect the retail environment generally, including,
without limitation:
●levels of consumer spending, changes in consumer confidence, income levels, and fluctuations in seasonal spending
in the United States and internationally;
●consumer perceptions of the safety, convenience and attractiveness of our properties;
●the impact on our retail tenants and demand for retail space at our properties from the increasing use of the Internet by
retailers and consumers;
●the creditworthiness of our retail tenants and the availability of new creditworthy tenants and the related impact on our
occupancy levels and lease income;
●local real estate conditions, such as an oversupply of, or reduction in demand for, retail space or retail goods,
decreases in rental rates and declines in real estate values;
●the willingness of retailers to lease space in our properties at attractive rents, or at all;
●actual or perceived changes in national and international economic conditions, which can result from global events
such as international trade disputes, a foreign debt crisis, foreign currency volatility, natural disasters, war, epidemics
and pandemics, the fear of spread of contagious diseases, civil unrest and terrorism, as well as from domestic issues,
such as government policies and regulations, tariffs, energy prices, market dynamics, rising interest rates, inflation and
limited growth in consumer income;
●changes in regional and local economies, which may be affected by increased rates of unemployment, increased
foreclosures, higher taxes, decreased tourism, industry slowdowns, adverse weather conditions, and other factors;
●increased operating costs and capital expenditures, whether from redevelopments, replacing tenants or otherwise; and
●changes in applicable laws and regulations, including tax, environmental, safety and zoning.
Additionally, a portion of our lease income is derived from overage rents based on sales over a stated base amount that
directly depend on the sales volume of our retail tenants. Accordingly, declines in our tenants’ sales performance could reduce
the income produced by our properties.
Some of our properties depend on anchor stores or other large nationally recognized tenants to attract shoppers
and we could be materially and adversely affected by the loss of one or more of these anchors or tenants.
Our properties are typically anchored by department stores and other large nationally recognized tenants. Certain of our
anchors and other tenants have ceased their operations, downsized their brick-and-mortar presence or failed to comply with
their contractual obligations to us and others.
For example, among department stores and other national retailers — often referred to as “big box” stores — corporate
merger or consolidation activity typically results in the closure of duplicate or geographically overlapping store
Table of Contents
12locations. Further, sustained adverse pressure on the results of our department stores and other national retailers may have a
similarly sustained adverse impact upon our own results. Certain department stores and other national retailers have
experienced, and may continue to experience for the foreseeable future (given uncertainty with respect to current and future
macroeconomic conditions and consumer confidence levels), considerable decreases in customer traffic in their retail stores,
increased competition from alternative retail options such as those accessible via the Internet and other forms of pressure on
their business models. As pressure on these department stores and other national retailers increases, their ability to maintain
their stores, meet their obligations both to us and to their external lenders and suppliers, withstand takeover attempts or avoid
bankruptcy and/or liquidation may be impaired and result in closures of their stores or their seeking of a lease modification with
us. Any lease modification could be unfavorable to us as the lessor and could decrease current or future effective rents or
expense recovery charges. Other tenants may be entitled to modify the economic or other terms of, or terminate, their existing
leases with us in the event of such closures.
If a department store or large nationally recognized tenant were to close its stores at our properties, we may experience
difficulty and delay and incur significant expense in re-tenanting the space, as well as in leasing spaces in areas adjacent to the
vacant store, at attractive rates, or at all. Additionally, department store or tenant closures may result in decreased customer
traffic, which could lead to decreased sales at our properties. If the sales of stores operating in our properties were to decline
significantly due to the closing of anchor stores or other national retailers, adverse economic conditions or other reasons,
tenants may be unable to pay their minimum rents or expense recovery charges. In the event of any default by a tenant, we may
not be able to fully recover, and/or may experience delays and costs in enforcing our rights as landlord to recover, amounts due
to us under the terms of our leases with such parties.
We face potential adverse effects from tenant bankruptcies.
Bankruptcy filings by retailers can occur regularly in the course of our operations, and in recent years, a number of
companies in the retail industry, including certain of our tenants, have declared bankruptcy. If a tenant files for bankruptcy, the
tenant may have the right to reject and terminate one or more of its leases with us, and we cannot be sure that it will affirm one
or more of its leases and continue to make rental payments to us in a timely manner. A bankruptcy filing by, or relating to, one of
our tenants would generally prohibit us from evicting this tenant, and bar all efforts by us to collect pre-bankruptcy debts from
that tenant, or from their property, unless we receive an order permitting us to do so from the bankruptcy court. In addition, we
cannot evict a tenant solely because of its bankruptcy. If a lease is assumed by the tenant in bankruptcy, all pre-bankruptcy
balances due under the lease must be paid to us in full. If a lease is rejected, the unsecured claim we hold against a bankrupt
tenant might be paid only to the extent that funds are available and only in the same percentage as is paid to all other holders of
unsecured claims, and there are restrictions under bankruptcy laws that limit the amount of the claim we can make if a lease is
rejected. As a result, it is likely that we would recover substantially less than the full value of any unsecured claims we hold. In
addition, we may make lease modifications either pre- or post-bankruptcy for certain tenants undergoing significant financial
distress in order for them to continue as a going concern. Furthermore, we may be required to incur significant expense in re-
tenanting the space formerly leased to the bankrupt tenant. We continually seek to re-lease vacant spaces resulting from tenant
terminations. The bankruptcy of a tenant, particularly an anchor tenant or a national tenant with multiple locations, may require a
substantial redevelopment of its space, the success of which cannot be assured, and may make the re-tenanting of its space
difficult and costly. Any such bankruptcies also make it more difficult to lease the remainder of the space at the affected property
or properties. Future tenant bankruptcies may strain our resources and impact our ability to successfully execute our re-leasing
strategy and could materially and adversely affect us.
We face a wide range of competition that could affect our ability to operate profitably.
Our properties compete with other forms of retailing such as e-commerce websites as well as other retail properties. The
increased popularity of digital and mobile technologies has accelerated the transition of a percentage of market share from
shopping at physical stores to web-based shopping. We could be materially and adversely affected if we are unsuccessful in
adapting our business to evolving consumer purchasing habits. Competition may also come from a variety of other retail formats,
such as malls, outlet centers, community/lifestyle centers, and other shopping centers, both existing and future development and
redevelopment/expansion projects, as well as e-commerce. The presence of competitive alternatives affects our ability to lease
space and puts downward pressure on the rents we can charge our tenants. New construction, redevelopments and expansions
at competing sites could also negatively affect our properties.
We also compete with other major real estate investors and developers for attractive investment opportunities and prime
development sites. Competition for the acquisition of existing properties and development sites may result in
Table of Contents
13increased purchase prices and may adversely affect our ability to make attractive investments on favorable terms, or at all. In
addition, we compete with other retail property companies for tenants and qualified management.
Vacant space at our properties could materially and adversely affect us.
Certain of our properties have had vacant space available for prospective tenants, and those properties may continue to
experience, and other properties may commence experiencing, such oversupply in the future. Among other causes, (1) there
has been an increased number of bankruptcies of anchor stores and other national retailers, as well as store closures, and (2)
there has been lower demand from retail tenants for space, due to certain retailers increasing their use of e-commerce websites
to distribute their merchandise. As a result of the increased bargaining power of creditworthy retail tenants, there is downward
pressure on our rental rates and occupancy levels, and this increased bargaining power may also result in us having to increase
our spend on tenant improvements and potentially make other lease modifications in order to attract or retain tenants, any of
which, in the aggregate, could materially and adversely affect us.
We may not be able to lease newly developed properties or renew leases and relet space at existing properties.
We may not be able to lease new properties to an appropriate mix of tenants that generates optimal customer traffic.
Also, when leases for our existing properties expire, the premises may not be relet or the terms of reletting, including the cost of
allowances and concessions to tenants may be less favorable than the current lease terms. If we elect to pursue a “mixed use”
redevelopment we expose ourselves to risks associated with each non-retail use (e.g. office, residential, hotel and
entertainment), and the performance of our retail tenants in such properties may be negatively impacted by delays in opening
and/or the performance of such non-retail uses. To the extent that our leasing goals are not achieved, we could be materially and
adversely affected.
Risks Relating to Real Estate Investments and Operations
Our international activities may subject us to risks that are different from or greater than those associated with
our domestic operations.
As of December 31, 2019, we held interests in consolidated and joint venture properties that operate in Austria, Canada,
France, Italy, Germany, Japan, Malaysia, Mexico, the Netherlands, South Korea, and the United Kingdom. We also have an
equity stake in Klépierre, a publicly traded European real estate company, which operates in 15 countries in Europe. Accordingly,
our operating results and the value of our international operations may be impacted by any unhedged movements in the foreign
currencies in which those operations transact and in which our net investment in those international operations is held. While we
occasionally enter into hedging agreements to manage our exposure to changes in foreign exchange rates, these agreements
may not eliminate foreign currency risk entirely.
We may pursue additional investment, ownership, development and redevelopment/expansion opportunities outside the
United States. Such international activities carry risks that are different from those we face with our domestic properties and
operations. These risks include, but are not limited to:
●adverse effects of changes in exchange rates for foreign currencies;
●changes in foreign political and economic environments, regionally, nationally, and locally;
●impact from international trade disputes and the associated impact on our tenants’ supply chain and consumer
spending levels;
●challenges of complying with a wide variety of foreign laws, including corporate governance, operations, taxes and
litigation;
●differing lending practices;
●differences in cultures and consumer retail behavior;
●changes in applicable laws and regulations in the United States that affect international operations;
●changes in applicable laws and regulations in these foreign jurisdictions;
●difficulties in managing international operations;
Table of Contents
14●obstacles to the repatriation of earnings and cash; and
●labor discord, political or civil unrest, acts of terrorism, epidemics and pandemics, the fear of spread of contagious
diseases, or the threat of international boycotts.
Our international activities represented approximately 8.1% of consolidated net income and 9.3% of our net operating
income, or NOI, for the year ended December 31, 2019. To the extent that we expand our international activities, the above risks
could increase in significance, which in turn could have a material adverse effect on us.
We face risks associated with the acquisition, development, redevelopment and expansion of properties.
We regularly acquire and develop new properties and redevelop and expand existing properties, and these activities are
subject to various risks. We may not be successful in pursuing acquisition, development or redevelopment/expansion
opportunities. In addition, newly acquired, developed or redeveloped/expanded properties may not perform as well as expected,
impacting our anticipated return on investment. We are subject to other risks in connection with any acquisition, development
and redevelopment/expansion activities, including the following:
●acquisition or construction costs of a project may be higher than projected, potentially making the project unfeasible or
unprofitable;
●development, redevelopment or expansions may take considerably longer than expected, delaying the
commencement and amount of income from the property;
●we may not be able to obtain financing or to refinance loans on favorable terms, or at all;
●we may be unable to obtain zoning, occupancy or other governmental approvals;
●occupancy rates and rents may not meet our projections and the project may not be accretive; and
●we may need the consent of third parties such as department stores, anchor tenants, mortgage lenders and joint
venture partners, and those consents may be withheld.
If a development or redevelopment/expansion project is unsuccessful, either because it is not meeting our expectations
when operational or was not completed according to the project planning, we could lose our investment in the project. Further, if
we guarantee the property’s financing, our loss could exceed our investment in the project.
In the event that these risks were realized at the same time at multiple properties, we could be materially and adversely
affected.
Real estate investments are relatively illiquid.
Our properties represent a substantial portion of our total consolidated assets. These investments are relatively illiquid.
As a result, our ability to sell one or more of our properties or investments in real estate in response to any changes in economic,
industry, or other conditions may be limited. The real estate market is affected by many factors, such as general economic
conditions, availability and terms of financing, interest rates and other factors, including supply and demand for space, that are
beyond our control. If we want to sell a property, we cannot assure you that we will be able to dispose of it in the desired time
period, or at all, or that the sales price of a property will be attractive at the relevant time or exceed the carrying value of our
investment. Moreover, if a property is mortgaged, we may not be able to obtain a release of the lien on that property without the
payment of the associated debt and/or a substantial prepayment penalty, which could restrict our ability to dispose of the
property, even though the sale might otherwise be desirable.
Risks Relating to Debt and the Financial Markets
We have a substantial debt burden that could affect our future operations.
As of December 31, 2019, our consolidated mortgages and unsecured indebtedness, excluding related premium,
discount and debt issuance costs, totaled $24.2 billion. As a result of this indebtedness, we are required to use a substantial
portion of our cash flows for debt service, including selected repayment at scheduled maturities, which limits our ability to use
those cash flows to fund the growth of our business. We are also subject to the risks normally associated with debt financing,
including the risk that our cash flows from operations will be insufficient to meet required debt service or that we will be able to
refinance such indebtedness on acceptable terms, or at all. Our debt service costs generally will not be reduced if developments
at the applicable property, such as the entry of new competitors or the loss of major tenants,
Table of Contents
15cause a reduction in the income from the property. Our indebtedness could also have other adverse consequences on us,
including reducing our access to capital or increasing our vulnerability to general adverse economic, industry and market
conditions. In addition, if a property is mortgaged to secure payment of indebtedness and income from such property is
insufficient to pay that indebtedness, the property could be foreclosed upon by the mortgagee resulting in a loss of income and a
decline in our total asset value. If any of the foregoing occurs, we could be materially and adversely affected.
The agreements that govern our indebtedness contain various covenants that impose restrictions on us that
might affect our ability to operate freely.
We have a variety of unsecured debt, including the Credit Facilities, senior unsecured notes and commercial paper, and
secured property level debt. Certain of the agreements that govern our indebtedness contain covenants, including, among other
things, limitations on our ability to incur secured and unsecured indebtedness, sell all or substantially all of our assets and
engage in mergers and certain acquisitions. In addition, certain of the agreements that govern our indebtedness contain financial
covenants that require us to maintain certain financial ratios, including certain coverage ratios. These covenants may restrict our
ability to pursue certain business initiatives or certain transactions that might otherwise be advantageous to us. In addition, our
ability to comply with these provisions might be affected by events beyond our control. Failure to comply with any of our
financing covenants could result in an event of default, which, if not cured or waived, could accelerate the related indebtedness
as well as other of our indebtedness, which could have a material adverse effect on us.
Disruption in the capital and credit markets may adversely affect our ability to access external financings for our
growth and ongoing debt service requirements.
We depend on external financings, principally debt financings, to fund the growth of our business and to ensure that we
can meet ongoing maturities of our outstanding debt. Our access to financing depends on our credit ratings, the willingness of
lending institutions and other debt investors to grant credit to us and conditions in the capital markets in general. An economic
recession may cause extreme volatility and disruption in the capital and credit markets. We rely upon the Credit Facilities as
sources of funding for numerous transactions. Our access to these funds is dependent upon the ability of each of the
participants to the Credit Facilities to meet their funding commitments to us. When markets are volatile, access to capital and
credit markets could be disrupted over an extended period of time and one or more financial institutions may not have the
available capital to meet their previous commitments to us. The failure of one or more participants to the Credit Facilities to meet
their funding commitments to us could have a material adverse effect on us, including as a result of making it difficult to obtain
the financing we may need for future growth and/or meeting our debt service requirements. We cannot assure you that we will
be able to obtain the financing we need for the future growth of our business or to meet our debt service requirements, or that a
sufficient amount of financing will be available to us on favorable terms, or at all.
Adverse changes in our credit ratings could affect our borrowing capacity and borrowing terms.
The Operating Partnership’s outstanding senior unsecured notes, the Credit Facilities, the Commercial Paper program,
and Simon’s preferred stock are periodically rated by nationally recognized credit rating agencies. The credit ratings are based
on our operating performance, liquidity and leverage ratios, financial condition and prospects, and other factors viewed by the
credit rating agencies as relevant to us and our industry and the economic outlook in general. Our credit ratings can affect the
amount of capital we can access, as well as the terms of any financing we obtain. Since we depend primarily on debt financing
to fund the growth of our business, an adverse change in our credit ratings, including actual changes and changes in outlook, or
even the initiation of a review of our credit ratings that could result in an adverse change, could have a material adverse effect
on us.
An increase in interest rates would increase our interest costs on variable rate debt and could adversely impact
our ability to refinance existing debt on attractive terms, or at all; our hedging interest rate protection
arrangements may not effectively limit our interest rate risk.
As of December 31, 2019, we had approximately $865.1 million of outstanding consolidated indebtedness that bears
interest at variable rates, and we may incur more variable rate indebtedness in the future. If interest rates increase, then so
would the interest costs on our unhedged variable rate debt, which could adversely affect our cash flows and our ability to pay
principal and interest on our debt and our ability to make distributions to our stockholders. Further, rising interest rates could limit
our ability to refinance existing debt when it matures or significantly increase our future interest expense.
We selectively manage our exposure to interest rate risk by a combination of interest rate protection agreements to
effectively fix or cap all or a portion of our variable rate debt. In addition, we refinance fixed rate debt at times when we believe
rates and other terms are appropriate. Our efforts to manage these exposures may not be successful.
Table of Contents
16Our use of interest rate hedging arrangements to manage risk associated with interest rate volatility may expose us to
additional risks, including a risk that a counterparty to a hedging arrangement may fail to honor its obligations or that we could be
required to fund our contractual payment obligations under such arrangements in relatively large amounts or on short notice.
Developing an effective interest rate risk strategy is complex and no strategy can completely insulate us from risks associated
with interest rate fluctuations. There can be no assurance that our hedging activities will have the desired beneficial impact on
our results of operations, liquidity and financial condition. Termination of these hedging agreements typically involves costs, such
as transaction fees or breakage costs.
We may be adversely affected by developments in the London Inter-bank Offered Rate (LIBOR) market, changes
in the methods by which LIBOR is determined or the use of alternative reference rates.
As of December 31, 2019, approximately 2.4% or $573 million of our debt outstanding was indexed to LIBOR. In July
2017, the U.K. Financial Conduct Authority (the “FCA”), which regulates LIBOR, announced its intention to stop compelling
banks to submit rates for the calculation of LIBOR after 2021. Accordingly, there is considerable uncertainty regarding the
publication of LIBOR beyond 2021. The Federal Reserve Board convened the Alternative Reference Rates Committee (“ARRC”)
to identify a set of alternative reference rates for possible use as market benchmarks. Based on the ARRC’s recommendation,
the Federal Reserve Bank of New York began publishing the Secured Overnight Financing Rate (“SOFR”) and two other
alternative rates beginning in April 2018. Since then, certain derivative products and debt securities tied to SOFR have been
introduced, and a number of industry groups are developing transition plans to SOFR as the new market benchmark.  
We are not able to predict whether LIBOR will actually cease to be available after 2021 or whether SOFR will become the
market benchmark in its place. Any changes announced or adopted by the FCA or other authorities or institutions in the methods
used for determining LIBOR or the transition from LIBOR to a successor benchmark may result in, among other things, a sudden
or prolonged increase in LIBOR, a delay in the publication of LIBOR, higher interest obligations arising from such successor
benchmark and changes in the rules or methodologies for determining LIBOR in the overall debt capital markets, which may
discourage market participants from continuing to administer or to participate in variable rate debt tied to LIBOR or such
successor benchmark. If LIBOR as determined in accordance with the terms of our particular debt is no longer available,
whether before or after 2021, the interest rates on such debt would be determined using various alternative methods, any of
which may result in interest obligations which are more than or do not otherwise correlate over time with the payments that
would have been made on such debt if LIBOR was available in its current form. As a result, there can be no assurance that any
of the aforementioned developments or changes will not result in financial market disruptions, significant increases in benchmark
interest rates, substantially higher financing costs or a shortage of available debt financing, any of which could have an adverse
effect on us, which currently would be limited by our relatively low exposure to variable rate LIBOR-based debt.
Risks Relating to Income Taxes
Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as REITs in the United
States. The failure to maintain Simon’s or the Subsidiary REITs’ qualifications as REITs or changes in applicable
tax laws or regulations could result in adverse tax consequences.
In the United States, Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as REITs
under Sections 856 through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code. We believe that Simon and these subsidiaries, or the Subsidiary
REITs, have been organized and have operated in a manner which allows them to qualify for taxation as REITs under the
Internal Revenue Code. We intend to continue to operate in this manner. However, qualification and taxation as REITs depend
upon the ability of Simon and the Subsidiary REITs to satisfy several requirements (some of which are outside our control),
including tests related to our annual operating results, asset diversification, distribution levels and diversity of stock ownership.
The various REIT qualification tests required by the Internal Revenue Code are highly technical and complex. Accordingly, there
can be no assurance that Simon or any of the Subsidiary REITs has operated in accordance with these requirements or will
continue to operate in a manner so as to qualify or remain qualified as a REIT.
If Simon or any of the Subsidiary REITs fail to comply with those provisions, Simon or any such Subsidiary REIT may be
subject to monetary penalties or ultimately to possible disqualification as REITs. If such events occur, and if available relief
provisions do not apply:
●Simon or any such subsidiary will not be allowed a deduction for distributions to stockholders in computing taxable
income;
Table of Contents
17●Simon or any such subsidiary will be subject to corporate-level income tax on taxable income at the corporate rate;
●Simon or any such Subsidiary REIT could be subject to the federal alternative minimum tax for taxable years prior to
2018; and
●unless entitled to relief under relevant statutory provisions, Simon or any such subsidiary will also be disqualified from
treatment as a REIT for the four taxable years following the year during which qualification was lost.  
Any such corporate tax liability could be substantial and would reduce the amount of cash available for, among other
things, our operations and distributions to stockholders. In addition, if Simon fails to qualify as a REIT, it will not be required to
make distributions to our stockholders. Moreover, a failure by any subsidiary of the Operating Partnership that has elected to be
taxed as a REIT to qualify as a REIT would also cause Simon to fail to qualify as a REIT, and the same adverse consequences
would apply to it and its stockholders. Failure by Simon or any of the Subsidiary REITs to qualify as a REIT also could impair our
ability to expand our business and raise capital, which could materially and adversely affect us.
Additionally, we are subject to certain income-based taxes, both domestically and internationally, and other taxes,
including state and local taxes, franchise taxes, and withholding taxes on dividends from certain of our international investments.
We currently follow local tax laws and regulations in various domestic and international jurisdictions. Should these laws or
regulations change, the amount of taxes we pay may increase accordingly.
If the Operating Partnership fails to qualify as a partnership for federal income tax purposes, we would cease to
qualify as a REIT and suffer other adverse consequences.
We believe that the Operating Partnership is treated as a partnership for federal income tax purposes. As a partnership,
the Operating Partnership is not subject to federal income tax on its income. Instead, each of its partners, including us, is
allocated, and may be required to pay tax with respect to, such partner’s share of its income. We cannot assure you that the
Internal Revenue Service, or the IRS, will not challenge the status of the Operating Partnership or any other subsidiary
partnership or limited liability company in which we own an interest as a disregarded entity or partnership for federal income tax
purposes, or that a court would not sustain such a challenge. If the IRS were successful in treating the Operating Partnership or
any such other subsidiary as an entity taxable as a corporation for federal income tax purposes, we would fail to meet the gross
income tests and certain of the asset tests applicable to REITs and, accordingly, we would likely cease to qualify as a REIT. Also,
the failure of the Operating Partnership or any subsidiary partnerships or limited liability company to qualify as a disregarded
entity or partnership for applicable income tax purposes could cause it to become subject to federal and state corporate income
tax, which would reduce significantly the amount of cash available for debt service and for distribution to its partners or
members, including us.
Our ownership of TRSs is subject to certain restrictions, and we will be required to pay a 100% penalty tax on
certain income or deductions if our transactions with our TRSs are not conducted on arm’s-length terms.
We own securities in taxable REIT subsidiaries, or TRSs, and may acquire securities in additional TRSs in the future. A
TRS is a corporation other than a REIT in which a REIT directly or indirectly holds stock, and that has made a joint election with
such REIT to be treated as a taxable REIT subsidiary. If a TRS owns more than 35% of the total voting power or value of the
outstanding securities of another corporation, such other corporation will also be treated as a TRS. Other than some activities
relating to lodging and health care facilities, a TRS may generally engage in any business, including the provision of customary
or non-customary services to tenants of its parent REIT. A TRS is subject to federal income tax as a regular C corporation. In
addition, a 100% excise tax will be imposed on certain transactions between a TRS and its parent REIT that are not conducted
on an arm’s length basis.
A REIT’s ownership of securities of a TRS is not subject to the 5% or 10% asset tests applicable to REITs. Not more than
25% of the value of Simon’s or any Subsidiary REIT’s total assets may be represented by securities (including securities of
TRSs), other than those securities includable in the 75% asset test, and not more than 20% of the value of our total assets or the
assets of any Subsidiary REIT may be represented by securities of TRSs. We anticipate that the aggregate value of the stock
and securities of any TRS and other nonqualifying assets that Simon or each such Subsidiary REIT owns will be less than 25%
(or 20%, as applicable) of the value of Simon’s or such subsidiary’s total assets, and we will monitor the value of these
investments to ensure compliance with applicable ownership limitations. In addition, we intend to structure transactions with any
TRSs that we own to ensure that they are entered into on arm’s length terms to avoid incurring the 100% excise tax described
above. There can be no assurance, however, that we will be able to comply with the above limitations or to avoid application of
the 100% excise tax discussed above.
Table of Contents
18Dividends payable by REITs generally do not qualify for the reduced tax rates available for some dividends,
which may negatively affect the value of our shares.
Income from “qualified dividends” payable to U.S. stockholders that are individuals, trusts and estates are generally
subject to tax at preferential rates, currently at a maximum federal rate of 20%. Dividends payable by REITs, however, generally
are not eligible for the preferential tax rates applicable to qualified dividend income. Under the Tax Cuts and Jobs Act, or the
TCJA, however, U.S. stockholders that are individuals, trusts and estates generally may deduct up to 20% of the ordinary
dividends (e.g., dividends not designated as capital gain dividends or qualified dividend income) received from a REIT for
taxable years beginning after December 31, 2017 and before January 1, 2026. Although this deduction reduces the effective tax
rate applicable to certain dividends paid by REITs (generally to 29.6% assuming the shareholder is subject to the 37% maximum
rate), such tax rate is still higher than the tax rate applicable to corporate dividends that constitute qualified dividend income.
Accordingly, investors who are individuals, trusts and estates may perceive investments in REITs to be relatively less attractive
than investments in the stocks of non-REIT corporations that pay dividends, which could materially and adversely affect the
value of the shares of REITs, including the per share trading price of our common stock.
The tax imposed on REITs engaging in “prohibited transactions” may limit our ability to engage in transactions
which would be treated as sales for U.S. federal income tax purposes.
A REIT’s net income from prohibited transactions is subject to a 100% penalty tax. In general, prohibited transactions are
sales or other dispositions of property, other than foreclosure property, held primarily for sale to customers in the ordinary course
of business. Although we do not intend to hold any properties that would be characterized as held for sale to customers in the
ordinary course of our business, unless a sale or disposition qualifies under certain statutory safe harbors, such characterization
is a factual determination and no guarantee can be given that the IRS, would agree with our characterization of our properties or
that we will always be able to make use of the available safe harbors.
REIT distribution requirements could adversely affect our liquidity and our ability to execute our business plan.
In order for Simon and the Subsidiary REITs to qualify to be taxed as REITs, and assuming that certain other
requirements are also satisfied, Simon and each such Subsidiary REIT generally must distribute at least 90% of their respective
REIT taxable income, determined without regard to the dividends paid deduction and excluding any net capital gains, to their
respective equity holders each year. To this point, Simon and each such Subsidiary REIT have historically distributed at least
100% of its taxable income and thereby avoided income tax altogether. To the extent that Simon or any such Subsidiary REIT
satisfies this distribution requirement and qualifies for taxation as a REIT, but distributes less than 100% of its REIT taxable
income, Simon or such subsidiary will be subject to U.S. federal corporate income tax on its undistributed net taxable income
and could be subject to a 4% nondeductible excise tax if the actual amount that is distributed to equity holders in a calendar year
is less than the minimum required distribution amount. We intend to make distributions to the equity holders of Simon and the
Subsidiary REITs to comply with the REIT requirements of the Internal Revenue Code.
From time to time, Simon and the Subsidiary REITs might generate taxable income greater than their respective cash
flow as a result of differences in timing between the recognition of taxable income and the actual receipt of cash or the effect of
nondeductible capital expenditures, the creation of reserves, or required debt or amortization payments. If Simon or the
Subsidiary REITs do not have other funds available in these situations, Simon or such subsidiaries could be required to access
capital on unfavorable terms (the receipt of which cannot be assured), sell assets at disadvantageous prices, distribute amounts
that would otherwise be invested in future acquisitions, capital expenditures or repayment of debt, or make taxable distributions
of capital stock or debt securities to make distributions sufficient to enable them to pay out enough of their respective REIT
taxable income to satisfy the REIT distribution requirement and avoid corporate income tax and the 4% excise tax in a particular
year. These alternatives could increase costs or reduce our equity. Further, amounts distributed will not be available to fund the
growth of our business. Thus, compliance with the REIT requirements may adversely affect our liquidity and our ability to
execute our business plan.
Complying with REIT requirements might cause us to forgo otherwise attractive acquisition opportunities or
liquidate otherwise attractive investments.
To qualify to be taxed as REITs for U.S. federal income tax purposes, Simon and the Subsidiary REITs must ensure that,
at the end of each calendar quarter, at least 75% of the value of their respective assets consist of cash, cash items, government
securities and “real estate assets” (as defined in the Internal Revenue Code), including certain mortgage loans and securities.
The remainder of their respective investments (other than government securities, qualified real estate assets and securities
issued by a TRS) generally cannot include more than 10% of the outstanding voting securities of any one
Table of Contents
19issuer or more than 10% of the total value of the outstanding securities of any one issuer.
Additionally, in general, no more than 5% of the value of Simon’s and the Subsidiary REITs’ total assets (other than
government securities, qualified real estate assets and securities issued by a TRS) can consist of the securities of any one
issuer, and no more than 20% of the value of their respective total assets can be represented by securities of one or more TRSs.
If Simon or any of the Subsidiary REITs fails to comply with these requirements at the end of any calendar quarter, Simon or any
such Subsidiary REIT must correct the failure within 30 days after the end of the calendar quarter or qualify for certain statutory
relief provisions to avoid losing its REIT qualification and suffering adverse tax consequences. As a result, we might be required
to liquidate or forgo otherwise attractive investments. These actions could have the effect of reducing our income and amounts
available for distribution to equity holders. Moreover, if Simon or the Subsidiary REITs are compelled to liquidate their
investments to meet any of the asset, income or distribution tests, or to repay obligations to lenders, Simon or such subsidiaries
may be unable to comply with one or more of the requirements applicable to REITs or may be subject to a 100% tax on any
resulting gain if such sales constitute prohibited transactions.
In addition to the asset tests set forth above, to qualify to be taxed as REITs, Simon and the Subsidiary REITs must
continually satisfy tests concerning, among other things, the sources of their respective income, the amounts they distribute to
equity holders and the ownership of their respective shares. We might be unable to pursue investments that would be otherwise
advantageous to us in order to satisfy the source-of-income or asset-diversification requirements for qualifying as REITs. Thus,
compliance with the REIT requirements may hinder our ability to make certain attractive investments.
Partnership tax audit rules could have a material adverse effect on us.
The Bipartisan Budget Act of 2015 changed the rules applicable to U.S. federal income tax audits of partnerships. Under
the rules, among other changes and subject to certain exceptions, any audit adjustment to items of income, gain, loss,
deduction, or credit of a partnership (and any partner’s distributive share thereof) is determined, and taxes, interest, or penalties
attributable thereto could be assessed and collected, at the partnership level. Absent available elections, it is possible that a
partnership in which we directly or indirectly invest, could be required to pay additional taxes, interest and penalties as a result of
an audit adjustment, and we, as a direct or indirect partner of these partnerships, could be required to bear the economic burden
of those taxes, interest, and penalties even though Simon and the Subsidiary REITs, as REITs, may not otherwise have been
required to pay additional corporate-level taxes had they owned the assets of the partnership directly. The partnership tax audit
rules apply to the Operating Partnership and its subsidiaries that are classified as partnerships for U.S. federal income tax
purposes. The changes created by these rules are sweeping and, accordingly, there can be no assurance that these rules will
not have a material adverse effect on us.
Legislative, administrative, regulatory or other actions affecting REITs, including positions taken by the IRS,
could have a material adverse effect on us and our investors.
The rules dealing with U.S. federal income taxation are constantly under review by persons involved in the legislative
process, and by the IRS and the U.S. Department of the Treasury, or the Treasury. Changes to the tax laws or interpretations
thereof by the IRS and the Treasury, with or without retroactive application, could materially and adversely affect us and our
investors. New legislation (including the TCJA, and any technical corrections legislation), Treasury regulations, administrative
interpretations or court decisions could significantly and negatively affect the ability of Simon and certain subsidiaries of the
Operating Partnership to qualify to be taxed as REITs and/or the U.S. federal income tax consequences to us and our investors
of such qualification.
The TCJA has significantly changed the U.S. federal income taxation of U.S. businesses and their owners, including
REITs and their stockholders. A change made by the TCJA that could affect us and our stockholders is that it generally limits the
deduction for net business interest expense in excess of 30% of a business’s adjusted taxable income except for taxpayers that
engage in certain real estate businesses and elect out of this rule (provided that such electing taxpayers must use an alternative
depreciation system for certain property).
Risks Relating to Joint Ventures
We have limited control with respect to some properties that are partially owned or managed by third parties,
which may adversely affect our ability to sell or refinance them.
As of December 31, 2019, we owned interests in 100 income-producing properties with other parties. Of those, 18
properties are included in our consolidated financial statements. We account for the other 82 properties, or the joint venture
properties, as well as our investments in Klépierre (a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate company), Aéropostale, Authentic
Brands Group, LLC, or ABG, HBS Global Properties, or HBS, and Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG, using the equity
Table of Contents
20method of accounting. We serve as general partner or property manager for 57 of these 82 joint venture properties; however,
certain major decisions, such as approving the operating budget and selling, refinancing, and redeveloping the properties,
require the consent of the other owners. Of the joint venture properties for which we do not serve as general partner or property
manager, 21 are in our international joint ventures. These international properties are managed locally by joint ventures in which
we share control of the properties with our partner. The other owners have participating rights that we consider substantive for
purposes of determining control over the joint venture properties’ assets. The remaining joint venture properties, Klépierre, and
our joint ventures with Aéropostale, ABG, HBS, and RGG, are managed by third parties.
These investments, and other future similar investments, could involve risks that would not be present were a third party
not involved, including the possibility that partners or other owners might become bankrupt, suffer a deterioration in their
creditworthiness, or fail to fund their share of required capital contributions. If one of our partners or other owners in these
investments were to become bankrupt, we may be precluded from taking certain actions regarding our investments without prior
court approval, which at a minimum may delay the actions we would or might want to take. Additionally, partners or other owners
could have economic or other business interests or goals that are inconsistent with our own business interests or goals, and
could be in a position to take actions contrary to our policies or objectives.
These investments, and other future similar investments, also have the potential risk of creating impasses on decisions,
such as a sale, financing or development, because neither we nor our partner or other owner has full control over the partnership
or joint venture. Disputes between us and partners or other owners might result in litigation or arbitration that could increase our
expenses and prevent Simon’s officers and/or directors from focusing their time and efforts on our business. Consequently,
actions by, or disputes with, partners or other owners might result in subjecting properties owned by the partnership or joint
venture to additional risk. In addition, we risk the possibility of being liable for the actions of our partners or other owners.  
The Operating Partnership guarantees debt or otherwise provides support for a number of joint venture
properties.
Joint venture debt is the liability of the joint venture and is typically secured by a mortgage on the joint venture property,
which is non-recourse to us. Nevertheless, the joint venture’s failure to satisfy its debt obligations could result in the loss of our
investment therein. As of December 31, 2019, the Operating Partnership guaranteed joint venture-related mortgage
indebtedness of $214.8 million (of which we have a right of recovery from our joint venture partners of $10.8 million). A default by
a joint venture under its debt obligations would expose us to liability under a guaranty. We may elect to fund cash needs of a
joint venture through equity contributions (generally on a basis proportionate to our ownership interests), advances or partner
loans, although such fundings are not typically required contractually or otherwise.
Risks Relating to Environmental Matters
As owners of real estate, we can face liabilities for environmental contamination.
U.S. federal, state and local laws and regulations relating to the protection of the environment may require us, as a
current or previous owner or operator of real property, to investigate and clean up hazardous or toxic substances or petroleum
product releases at a property or at impacted neighboring properties. These laws often impose liability regardless of whether the
property owner or operator knew of, or was responsible for, the presence of hazardous or toxic substances, and under certain
circumstances, this liability can be joint and several such that one party is held responsible for the entire obligation. These laws
and regulations also may require the abatement or removal of asbestos containing materials and other hazardous building
materials in the event of damage, demolition or renovation, reconstruction or expansion of a property and also govern emissions
of and exposure to asbestos fibers in the air. Those laws and regulations also govern the installation, maintenance and removal
of underground storage tanks used to store waste oils or other petroleum products. Many of our properties contain, or at one
time contained, asbestos containing materials or underground storage tanks (primarily related to auto service center
establishments or emergency electrical generation equipment). We may be subject to regulatory action in connection with any
such laws and regulations and may also be held liable to third parties for personal injury or property damage incurred by the
parties in connection with any such hazardous or toxic substances. The costs of investigation, removal or remediation of
hazardous or toxic substances, and related liabilities, may be substantial and could materially and adversely affect us. The
presence of hazardous or toxic substances, or the failure to remediate the related contamination, may also adversely affect our
ability to sell, lease or redevelop a property or to borrow money using a property as collateral.
Table of Contents
21Our efforts to identify environmental liabilities may not be successful.
Although we believe that our portfolio is in substantial compliance with U.S. federal, state and local environmental laws
and regulations regarding hazardous or toxic substances, this belief is based on limited testing. Nearly all of our properties have
been subjected to Phase I or similar environmental audits. These environmental audits have not revealed, nor are we aware of,
any environmental liability that we believe is reasonably likely to have a material adverse effect on us. However, we cannot
assure you that:
●previous environmental studies with respect to the portfolio reveal all potential environmental liabilities;
●any previous owner, occupant or tenant of a property did not create any material environmental condition not known to
us;
●the current environmental condition of the portfolio will not be affected by tenants and occupants, by the condition of
nearby properties, or by other unrelated third parties; or
●future uses or conditions (including, without limitation, changes in applicable environmental laws and regulations or the
interpretation thereof) will not result in environmental liabilities.
We face risks associated with climate change.
To the extent climate change causes changes in weather patterns, our properties in certain markets could experience
increases in storm intensity and rising sea levels. Over time, these conditions could result in volatile or decreased demand for
retail space at certain of our properties or, in extreme cases, our inability to operate the properties at all. Climate change may
also have indirect effects on our business by increasing the cost of (or making unavailable) insurance on favorable terms, or at
all, increasing the cost of energy at our properties or requiring us to spend funds to repair and protect our properties against
such risks. Moreover, compliance with new laws or regulations related to climate change, including compliance with “green”
building codes, may require us to make improvements to our existing properties or increase taxes and fees assessed on us or
our properties.
Some of our properties are subject to potential natural or other disasters.
A number of our properties are located in areas subject to a higher risk of natural disasters such as earthquakes, fires,
hurricanes, floods, tornados or tsunamis. The occurrence of natural disasters can adversely impact operations and
development/redevelopment projects at our properties, increase investment costs to repair or replace damaged properties,
increase future property insurance costs and negatively impact the tenant demand for lease space. If insurance is unavailable to
us or is unavailable on acceptable terms, or our insurance is not adequate to cover losses from these events, we could be
materially and adversely affected.
Other Factors Affecting Our Business
Some of our potential losses may not be covered by insurance.
We maintain insurance coverage with third-party carriers who provide a portion of the coverage for specific layers of
potential losses, including commercial general liability, fire, flood, extended coverage and rental loss insurance on all of our
properties in the United States. The initial portion of coverage not provided by third-party carriers is either insured through our
wholly-owned captive insurance company or other financial arrangements controlled by us. A third party carrier has, in turn,
agreed to provide, if required, evidence of coverage for this layer of losses under the terms and conditions of the carrier’s policy.
A similar policy either written through our captive insurance company or other financial arrangements controlled by us also
provides initial coverage for property insurance and certain windstorm risks at the properties located in coastal windstorm
locations.
There are some types of losses, including lease and other contract claims, which generally are not insured or are subject
to large deductibles. If an uninsured loss or a loss in excess of insured limits occurs, we could lose all or a portion of the capital
we have invested in a property, as well as the anticipated future revenue it could generate but may remain obligated for any
mortgage debt or other financial obligation related to the property.
We currently maintain insurance coverage against acts of terrorism on all of our properties in the United States on an “all
risk” basis in the amount of up to $1 billion. Despite the existence of this insurance coverage, any threatened or actual terrorist
attacks where we operate could materially and adversely affect us.
Table of Contents
22We face risks associated with security breaches through cyber ‑attacks, cyber intrusions or otherwise, as well as
other significant disruptions of our information technology (IT) networks and related systems.
Our IT networks and related systems are essential to the operation of our business and our ability to perform day-to-day
operations and, in some cases, may be critical to the operations of certain of our tenants. We face risks associated with security
breaches, whether through cyber-attacks or cyber intrusions over the Internet, malware, computer viruses, hardware or software
corruption or failure or poor product or vendor/developer selection (including a failure of security controls incorporated into or
applied to such hardware or software), service provider error or failure, intentional or unintentional actions by employees
(including the failure to follow our security protocols) and other significant disruptions of our IT networks and related systems.
Although we make efforts to maintain the security and integrity of these types of IT networks and related systems, and we have
implemented various measures to manage the risk of a security breach or disruption, there can be no assurance that our
security efforts and measures will be effective or that attempted security breaches or disruptions would not be successful or
damaging. Even the most well protected information, networks, systems and facilities remain potentially vulnerable because the
techniques used in such attempted security breaches evolve and generally are not recognized until launched against a target,
and in some cases are designed not to be detected and, in fact, may not be detected. Accordingly, we may be unable to
anticipate these techniques or to implement adequate security barriers or other preventative measures, and thus it is impossible
for us to entirely mitigate this risk.
The risk of a security breach or significant disruption has generally increased due to our increased reliance on technology
and due to a rise in the number, intensity, and sophistication of attempted attacks globally. A breach or significant and extended
disruption in the functioning of our systems, including our primary website, could damage our reputation and cause us to lose
customers, tenants and revenues, generate third party claims, cause operational disruption, result in the unintended and/or
unauthorized public disclosure or the misappropriation of proprietary, personal identifying and confidential information, and
require us to incur significant expenses to address and remediate or otherwise resolve these kinds of issues. We may not be
able to recover these expenses in whole or in any part from our service providers or responsible parties, or their or our insurers.
Additionally, cyber-attacks perpetrated against our tenants, including unauthorized access to customers’ credit card data and
other confidential information, could diminish consumer confidence and spending and materially and adversely affect us.
Our success depends, in part, on our ability to attract and retain talented employees, and the loss of any one of
our key personnel could adversely impact our business.
The success of our business depends, in part, on the leadership and performance of our executive management team
and key employees, and our ability to attract, retain and motivate talented employees could significantly impact our future
performance. Competition for these individuals is intense, and we cannot assure you that we will retain our executive
management team and other key employees or that we will be able to attract and retain other highly qualified individuals for
these positions in the future. Losing any one or more of these persons could have a material adverse effect on us.
Provisions in Simon’s charter and by ‑laws and in the Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement could
prevent a change of control.
Simon’s charter contains a general restriction on the accumulation of shares in excess of 8% of its capital stock. The
charter permits the members of the Simon family and related persons to own up to 18% of Simon’s capital stock. Ownership is
determined by the lower of the number of outstanding shares, voting power or value controlled. Simon’s Board of Directors may,
by majority vote, permit exceptions to those levels in circumstances where Simon’s Board of Directors determines that Simon’s
ability to qualify as a REIT will not be jeopardized. These restrictions on ownership may have the effect of delaying, deferring or
preventing a transaction or a change in control that might otherwise be in the best interest of Simon’s stockholders or the
Operating Partnership’s unitholders or preferred unitholders. Other provisions of Simon’s charter and by-laws could have the
effect of delaying or preventing a change of control even if some of Simon’s stockholders or the Operating Partnership’s
unitholders or preferred unitholders deem such a change to be in their best interests. These include provisions preventing
holders of Simon’s common stock from acting by written consent and requiring that up to four directors in the aggregate may be
elected by holders of Class B common stock. In addition, certain provisions of the Operating Partnership’s partnership
agreement could have the effect of delaying or preventing a change of control. These include a provision requiring the consent of
a majority in interest of units in order for Simon, as general partner of the Operating Partnership, to, among other matters,
engage in a merger transaction or sell all or substantially all of its assets.
Table of Contents
23The United Kingdom’s departure from the European Union could have a material adverse effect on us.
Following a national referendum and enactment of legislation by the government of the United Kingdom, the United
Kingdom formally withdrew from the European Union on January 31, 2020 and entered into a transition period during which it will
continue its ongoing and complex negotiations with the European Union relating to the future trading relationship between the
parties.  Significant political and economic uncertainty remains about whether the terms of the relationship will differ materially
from the terms before withdrawal, as well as about the possibility that a so-called “no deal” separation will occur if negotiations
are not completed by the end of the transition period.  
These developments, or the perception that any of them could occur, may have a material adverse effect on global
economic conditions and the stability of global financial markets, and may significantly reduce global market liquidity, restrict the
ability of key market participants to operate in certain financial markets or restrict our access to capital.  Any of these factors
could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations and reduce the price of our
securities.
We currently hold, and may acquire additional, equity interests in properties located in the United Kingdom and Europe,
as well as other investments that are denominated in Pounds Sterling and Euro. In addition, our Operating Partnership and its
subsidiaries have issued, and may issue in the future, senior unsecured notes denominated in Euro. Any of the effects of Brexit
described above, and others we cannot anticipate, could have a material adverse effect on us, including the value of our
properties and investments and our potential growth in Europe, as well as on our tenants’ businesses, and could amplify the
currency risks faced by us.
Any failure to comply with anti-corruption laws and regulations could materially and adversely affect us.
We are subject to laws concerning our business operations and marketing activities in foreign countries where we
conduct business. For example, we are subject to the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act, or the FCPA, which generally prohibits
U.S. companies or persons and any individuals or entities acting on their behalf from offering or making improper payments or
providing benefits to foreign officials for the purpose of obtaining or keeping business. We are also subject to various other anti-
bribery, anti-corruption and international trade laws in the U.S. and certain foreign countries, such as the U.K. Bribery Act. There
is a risk that our employees, business partners and other third parties could violate these laws, and we could be sanctioned or
held liable for actions taken by our employees, business partners and other third parties with respect to our business. Any
allegations, settlements or violations regarding such laws could negatively impact our reputation, and we could incur significant
expenses in investigating any potential violation and face severe criminal or civil sanctions and/or fines as a result of violations
or settlements, any of which could materially and adversely affect us.  
Item 1B.  Unresolved Staff Comments
None.
Table of Contents
24Item 2.  Properties
United States Properties
Our U.S. properties primarily consist of malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills, lifestyle centers and other retail properties.
These properties contain an aggregate of approximately 181.2 million square feet of gross leasable area, or GLA.
Malls typically contain at least one department store anchor or a combination of anchors and big box retailers with a wide
variety of smaller stores connecting the anchors. Additional stores are usually located along the perimeter of the parking area.
Our 106 malls are generally enclosed centers and range in size from approximately 260,000 to 2.7 million square feet of GLA.
Premium Outlets generally contain a wide variety of designer and manufacturer stores located in open-air centers. Our 69
Premium Outlets range in size from approximately 150,000 to 900,000 square feet of GLA. The Premium Outlets are generally
located within a close proximity to major metropolitan areas and/or tourist destinations.
The 14 properties in The Mills generally range in size from 1.2 million to 2.3 million square feet of GLA and are located in
major metropolitan areas. They have a combination of traditional mall, outlet center, and big box retailers and entertainment
uses.
We also have interests in four lifestyle centers and 11 other retail properties. The lifestyle centers range in size from
170,000 to 930,000 square feet of GLA. The other retail properties range in size from approximately 160,000 to 850,000 square
feet of GLA and are considered non-core to our business model.
As of December 31, 2019, approximately 95.1% of the owned GLA in malls and Premium Outlets was leased and
approximately 97.0% of the owned GLA for The Mills was leased.
We wholly own 133 of our properties, effectively control 12 properties in which we have a joint venture interest, and hold
the remaining 59 properties through unconsolidated joint venture interests. We are the managing or co-managing general
partner or member of 200 properties in the United States. Certain of our joint venture properties are subject to various rights of
first refusal, buy-sell provisions, put and call rights, or other sale or marketing rights for partners which are customary in real
estate partnership agreements and the industry. We and our partners in these joint ventures may initiate these provisions
(subject to any applicable lock up or similar restrictions) which may result in either the sale of our interest or the use of available
cash or borrowings, or the use of Operating Partnership units, to acquire the joint venture interest from our partner.
  
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
25The following property table summarizes certain data for our malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills, lifestyle centers and other retail properties located in
the United States, including Puerto Rico, as of December 31, 2019.
Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
Malls
1.Apple Blossom Mall  VA Winchester  Fee   49.1 % (4) Acquired
1999  87.6 %  473,990  Belk, JCPenney , Sears (13), AMC Cinemas
2.Auburn Mall  MA  Auburn  Fee   56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  97.0 %  584,602  Macy's, Sears (13), Reliant Medical Group
3.Aventura Mall (1)  FL Miami Beach
(Miami) Fee   33.3 % (4) Built 1983   94.4 %  2,127,254  Bloomingdale's, Macy's (8), JCPenney , Nordstrom,
Equinox Fitness Clubs, AMC Theatres
4.Barton Creek Square  TX Austin  Fee   100.0 % Built 1981   98.2 %  1,452,408  Nordstrom, Macy 's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , AMC
Theatre
5.Battlefield Mall  MO  Springfield  Fee and Ground Lease
(2056)  100.0 % Built 1970   91.5 %  1,201,828  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , Sears
6.Bay Park Square  WI Green Bay  Fee   100.0 % Built 1980   96.0 %  680,542  Kohl's, Marcus Cinema 16, Dave & Buster's (6)
7.Brea Mall  CA  Brea (Los
Angeles) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  93.5 %  1,319,214  Nordstrom, Macy's (8), JCPenney , LifeT ime (6), (6)
8.Briarwood Mall  MI Ann Arbor  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  98.9 %  977,987  Macy's, JCPenney , Von Maur , Hilton Garden Inn (15),
Towne Place Suites by Marriott (15)
9.Brickell City Centre  FL Miami  Fee   25.0 % (4) Built 2016   85.6 %  476,251  Saks Fifth Avenue, Cinemex, EAST  Miami Hotel (15), La
Centrale
10.Broadway Square  TX Tyler  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1994  98.8 %  604,870  Dillard's, JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods (6),
HomeGoods (6), Party City (6)
11.Burlington Mall  MA  Burlington
(Boston) Fee and Ground Lease
(2026) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  96.0 %  1,138,385  Macy's, Lord & Taylor , Nordstrom, Crate & Barrel,
Primark, Arhaus Furniture
12.Cape Cod Mall  MA  Hyannis  Fee and Ground Leases
(2029-2073) (7)  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  92.6 %  707,681  Macy's (8), Best Buy, Marshalls, Barnes & Noble, Regal
Cinema, Target, Dick's Sporting Goods (6), Planet
Fitness
13.Castleton Square  IN Indianapolis  Fee   100.0 % Built 1972   95.6 %  1,384,718  Macy's, Von Maur , JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods,
AMC Theatres
14.Cielo V ista Mall  TX El Paso  Fee and Ground Lease
(2027) (7)  100.0 % Built 1974   99.2 %  1,244,344  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , Sears, Cinemark
Theatres
15.Coconut Point  FL Estero  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2006   87.5 %  1,204,901  Dillard's, Barnes & Noble, Bed Bath & Beyond, Best Buy,
DSW , Office Max, PetSmart, Ross, T.J. Maxx, Hollywood
Theatres, Super Target, Michael's, Total Wine & More,
Tuesday Morning,  JoAnn Fabrics, Hyatt Place Coconut
Point (15), TownePlace Suites by Marriott (15)
16.College Mall  IN Bloomington  Fee and Ground Lease
(2048) (7)  100.0 % Built 1965   85.5 %  609,768  Macy's, Target, Dick's Sporting Goods, Bed Bath &
Beyond, Ulta, Fresh Thyme
17.Columbia Center  WA Kennewick  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1987  91.1 %  806,481  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Barnes & Noble, DSW , Home
Goods, Dick's Sporting Goods
18.Copley Place  MA  Boston  Fee   94.4 % (11) Acquired
2002  96.2 %  1,264,047  Neiman Marcus, Barneys New York (13), Boston Marriott
Copley Place (15), The W estin Copley Place (15)
19.Coral Square  FL Coral Springs
(Miami) Fee   97.2 % Built 1984   92.9 %  943,940  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Sears, Kohl's
20.Cordova Mall  FL Pensacola  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  96.4 %  927,148  Dillard's, Belk, Best Buy, Bed Bath & Beyond, Cost Plus
World Market, Ross, Dick's Sporting Goods
21.Crystal Mall  CT Waterford  Fee   78.2 % (4) Acquired
1998  83.4 %  782,704  Macy's, JCPenney , Bed Bath & Beyond, Christmas Tree
Shops
22.Dadeland Mall  FL Miami  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
1997  98.6 %  1,488,746  Saks Fifth Avenue , Nordstrom, Macy's (8), JCPenney ,
AC Hotel by Marriott (6)
23.Del Amo Fashion Center  CA  Torrance
(Los
Angeles) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  89.2 %  2,518,899  Nordstrom, Macy's (8), JCPenney , Sears, Marshalls,
Barnes & Noble, JoAnn Fabrics, AMC Theatres, Dick's
Sporting Goods, Dave & Buster's, Mitsuwa Marketplace
(6)
24.Domain, The  TX Austin  Fee   100.0 % Built 2006   93.5 %  1,236,238  Neiman Marcus, Macy's, Dillard' s, Dick's Sporting
Goods, iPic Theaters, Arhaus Furniture, Punch Bowl
Social, W estin Austin at The Domain, (16)
25.Dover Mall  DE  Dover  Fee and Ground Lease  
(2041)  (7)   68.1 % (4) Acquired
2007  89.0 %  927,245  Macy's, JCPenney , Boscov's, AMC Cinemas, Dick's
Sporting Goods
26.Emerald Square  MA  North
Attleboro
(Providence,
RI) Fee   56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  84.6 %  1,022,293  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Sears
27.Empire Mall  SD  Sioux Falls  Fee and Ground Lease
(2033) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  94.6 %  1,124,707  Macy's, JCPenney , Gordmans, Hy-V ee, Dick's Sporting
Goods
28.Falls, The  FL Miami  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007 98.4 %  831,327  Bloomingdale's (13), Macy's, Regal Cinema, The Fresh
Market
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
26Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
29.Fashion Centre at Pentagon
City, The VA Arlington
(Washington,
DC) Fee   42.5 % (4) Built 1989   96.9 %  1,037,258  Nordstrom, Macy's, The Ritz-Carlton (15)
30.Fashion Mall at Keystone, The  IN Indianapolis  Fee and Ground Lease
(2067) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1997  96.1 %  716,548  Saks Fifth Avenue, Crate & Barrel, Nordstrom, Keystone
Art Cinema
31.Fashion V alley  CA  San Diego  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2001  96.9 %  1,724,929  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Macy's,
JCPenney , AMC Theatres, Forever 21
32.Firewheel Town Center  TX Garland
(Dallas) Fee   100.0 % Built 2005   94.0 %  995,914  Dillard's, Macy's, Barnes & Noble , DSW , Cost Plus
World Market (13), AMC Theatre s, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Fairfield Inn by Marriott (14), (16)
33.Florida Mall, The  FL Orlando  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 1986   96.3 %  1,725,988  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Sears, H&M, Forever 21,
Zara, American Girl, Dick's Sporting Goods, Crayola
Experience, The Florida Hotel and Conference Center
(15)
34.Forum Shops at Caesars
Palace, The NV  Las V egas  Ground Lease (2050)   100.0 % Built 1992   98.2 %  667,468  Caesars Palace Las V egas Hotel and Casino (15)
35.Galleria, The  TX Houston  Fee   50.4 % (4) Acquired
2002  93.7 %  2,017,207  Saks Fifth Avenue , Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom, Macy's,
The Westin Galleria (15), The Westin Oaks (15), Life
Time Tennis
36.Greenwood Park Mall  IN Greenwood
(Indianapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1979  97.5 %  1,288,862  Macy's, Von Maur, JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods,
Barnes & Noble, Regal Cinema, Dave & Buster's (6)
37.Haywood Mall  SC  Greenville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2067) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  97.9 %  1,237,536  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Sears, Belk
38.Ingram Park Mall  TX San Antonio  Fee   100.0 % Built 1979   91.6 %  1,125,086  Dillard's, Macy's, JCPenney
39.King of Prussia  PA King of
Prussia
(Philadelphia) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2003  96.6 %  2,669,573  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Lord &
Taylor , Macy's, Arhaus Furniture, Dick's Sporting Goods,
Primark
40.La Plaza Mall  TX McAllen  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (7)  100.0 % Built 1976   96.4 %  1,313,115  Macy's (8), Dillard's, JCPenney , CUT! by Cinemark (6)
41.Lakeline Mall  TX Cedar Park
(Austin) Fee   100.0 % Built 1995   95.2 %  1,099,657  Dillard's (8), Macy's, JCPenney , AMC Theatres
42.Lehigh V alley Mall  PA Whitehall  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2003  97.2 %  1,190,538  Macy's, JCPenney , Boscov's, Barnes  & Noble, Michael's
(6), Dave & Buster's (6)
43.Lenox Square  GA  Atlanta  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  96.5 %  1,557,079  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Macy's, JW Marriott
(15)
44.Livingston Mall  NJ Livingston
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  90.4 %  968,882  Macy's, Lord & Taylor , Sears, Barnes & Noble
45.Mall at Rockingham Park, The  NH  Salem
(Boston) Fee   28.2 % (4) Acquired
1999  98.9 %  1,064,875  JCPenney , Macy's, Lord & Taylor , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Cinemark Theatre
46.Mall at Tuttle Crossing, The  OH  Dublin
(Columbus) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  91.6 %  1,119,920  Macy's, JCPenney , Scene 75
47.Mall of Georgia  GA  Buford
(Atlanta) Fee   100.0 % Built 1999   96.1 %  1,853,663  Dillard's, Macy's,  JCPenney , Belk, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Barnes & Noble, Haverty s Furniture, Regal
Cinema, V on Maur
48.Mall of New Hampshire, The  NH  Manchester  Fee and Ground Lease
(2024-2027) (7)  56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  97.3 %  804,828  Macy's, JCPenney , Best Buy, Dick's Sporting Goods,
Dave & Buster's (6)
49.McCain Mall  AR  N. Little Rock  Fee   100.0 % Built 1973   94.1 %  793,612  Dillard's, JCPenney , Sears (13), Regal Cinema
50.Meadowood Mall  NV  Reno  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  96.5 %  928,924  Macy's (8), JCPen ney, Dick's Sporting Goods, Crunch
Fitness, Round 1
51.Menlo Park Mall  NJ Edison (New
York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1997  94.6 %  1,331,788  Nordstrom, Macy 's, Barnes & Noble, AMC Dine-In
Theatre
52.Miami International Mall  FL Miami  Fee   47.8 % (4) Built 1982   97.6 %  1,083,592  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Kohl's
53.Midland Park Mall  TX Midland  Fee   100.0 % Built 1980   99.6 %  643,702  Dillard's (8), JCPenney , Bealls (13), Ross, Dick's
Sporting Goods (6)
54.Miller Hill Mall  MN  Duluth  Fee   100.0 % Built 1973   97.6 %  831,453  JCPenney , Barne s & Noble, DSW , Dick's Sporting
Goods, Essentia Health
55.Montgomery Mall  PA North W ales
(Philadelphia) Fee   79.4 % Acquired
2003  80.7 %  1,101,907  Macy's, JCPenney , Sears (13), Dick's Sporting Goods,
Wegmans
56.North East Mall  TX Hurst (Dallas)  Fee   100.0 % Built 1971   97.2 %  1,667,775  Nordstrom (13), Dillard's, Macy's,  JCPenney , Dick's
Sporting Goods, Rave Theatre
57.Northgate  WA Seattle  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1987  —(17)  1,045,724 (17)Barnes & Noble, Bed Bath & Beyond, DSW , Nordstrom
Rack, NHL  Seattle (6)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
27Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
58.Northshore Mall  MA  Peabody
(Boston) Fee   56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  92.1 %  1,503,800  JCPenney , Nordstrom, Macy's (8), Barnes & Noble,
Shaw's Grocery , The Container Store, Tesla Sales and
Service (6), Life Time Athletic (6)
59.Ocean County Mall  NJ Toms River
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  94.9 %  859,498  Macy's, Boscov' s, JCPenney , LA Fitness (6),
HomeSense (6), Ulta (6)
60.Orland Square  IL Orland Park
(Chicago) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1997  98.2 %  1,229,928  Macy's, JCPenney , Dave & Buster's, AMC Theatre (6),
Von Maur
61.Oxford V alley Mall  PA Langhorne
(Philadelphia) Fee   85.5 % Acquired
2003  93.2 %  1,338,633  Macy's, JCPenney , United Artists Theatre
62.Penn Square Mall  OK  Oklahoma
City Ground Lease (2060)   94.5 % Acquired
2002  99.0 %  1,083,753  Macy's, Dillard's (8), JCPenney , AMC Theatres, The
Container Store
63.Pheasant Lane Mall  NH  Nashua  -   —% (12) Acquired
2002  98.8 %  979,555  JCPenney , Sears (13), Target, Macy's, Dick's Sporting
Goods
64.Phipps Plaza  GA  Atlanta  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  97.1 %  788,410  Saks Fifth Avenue , Nordstrom, AMC Theatres, Arhaus
Furniture, Legolan d Discovery Center , AC Hotel by
Marriott, Life Time Athletic (6), Life Time Work (6),
Pinstripes (6), Nobu Hotel and Restaurant (6), (16)
65.Plaza Carolina  PR  Carolina (San
Juan) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  84.3 %  1,158,376  JCPenney , Sears,  Tiendas Capri, Econo, Best Buy (13),
T.J. Maxx, Caribbean Cinemas
66.Prien Lake Mall  LA Lake Charles  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (7)  100.0 % Built 1972   94.4 %  842,677  Dillard's, JCPenne y, Cinemark Theatres, Kohl's, Dick's
Sporting Goods, T.J. Maxx/HomeGoods
67.Quaker Bridge Mall  NJ Lawrenceville  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2003  96.2 %  1,081,265  Macy's, Lord & Taylor , JCPenney
68.Rockaway Townsquare  NJ Rockaway
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  92.8 %  1,246,417  Macy's, Lord & Taylor , JCPenney , Sears, Raymour &
Flanigan
69.Roosevelt Field  NY  Garden City
(New York) Fee and Ground Lease
(2090) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  96.8 %  2,345,983  Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Macy's, JCPenney , Dick's
Sporting Goods, AMC Entertainme nt, XSport Fitness,
Neiman Marcus, Residence Inn by Marriott (6)
70.Ross Park Mall  PA Pittsburgh  Fee   100.0 % Built 1986   97.0 %  1,061,790  JCPenney , Nordst rom, L.L. Bean, Macy's (8), Crate &
Barrel
71.Santa Rosa Plaza  CA  Santa Rosa  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  87.0 %  692,050  Macy's, Forever 21
72.Shops at Chestnut Hill, The  MA  Chestnut Hill
(Boston) Fee   94.4 % Acquired
2002  96.9 %  470,073  Bloomingdale's (8)
73.Shops at Clearfork, The  TX Fort W orth  Fee   45.0 % (4) Built 2017   89.5 %  550,029  Neiman Marcus, Arhaus Furnitu re, AMC Theatre,
Pinstripes,
74.Shops at Crystals, The  NV  Las V egas  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2016  97.3 %  300,381  Aria Resort and Casino (15)
75.Shops at Nanuet, The  NY  Nanuet  Fee   100.0 % Redeveloped
2013  92.4 %  757,927  Regal Cinema, 24 Hour Fitness, At Home (6)
76.Shops at Mission V iejo, The  CA  Mission V iejo
(Los Angeles) Fee   51.0 % (4) Built 1979   95.9 %  1,253,995  Nordstrom, Macy's (8)
77.Shops at Riverside, The  NJ Hackensack
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  94.7 %  694,434  Bloomingdale's, Barnes & Noble, Arhaus Furniture,
AMC Theatre
78.Smith Haven Mall  NY  Lake Grove
(New York) Fee   25.0 % (4) (2) Acquired
1995  95.9 %  1,295,843  Macy's (8), Sears, Dick's Sporting Goods, Barnes &
Noble, L.L. Bean
79.Solomon Pond Mall  MA  Marlborough
(Boston) Fee   56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  95.0 %  886,479  Macy's, JCPenney , Sears, Regal Cinema
80.South Hills V illage  PA Pittsburgh  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1997  96.0 %  1,128,101  Macy's (8), Barnes & Noble, AMC Cinemas, Dick's
Sporting Goods, Target, DSW , Ulta
81.South Shore Plaza  MA  Braintree
(Boston) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  95.6 %  1,590,390  Macy's, Lord & Taylor , Sears, Nordstrom, Target,
Primark
82.Southdale Center  MN  Edina
(Minneapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  89.1 %  1,246,585  Macy's, AMC Theatres, Dave & Buster's, Restoration
Hardware, Life Time Athletic, Life Time Work/Sport,
Homewood Suites by Hilton, (16)
83.SouthPark  NC  Charlotte  Fee and Ground Lease
(2040) (9)  100.0 % Acquired
2002  100.0 %  1,684,152  Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom, Macy's, Dillard's, Belk,
Dick's Sporting Goods, Crate & Barrel, The Container
Store, Reid's Fine Foods & Wine Bar (15), (16)
84.Southridge Mall  WI Greendale
(Milwaukee) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  91.9 %  1,221,169  JCPenney , Macy' s, Marcus Cinema, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Round 1, TJ Maxx
85.Springfield Mall (1)  PA Springfield
(Philadelphia) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2005  91.9 %  610,180  Macy's, Target
86.Square One Mall  MA  Saugus
(Boston) Fee   56.4 % (4) Acquired
1999  93.9 %  930,295  Macy's, Sears, Best Buy, T.J. Maxx N More, Dick's
Sporting Goods
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
28Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected Larger Retailers and Uses
87.St. Charles Towne Center  MD  Waldorf
(Washington,
DC) Fee   100.0 % Built 1990   89.7 %  980,344  Macy's (8), JCPenney , Sears, Kohl's, Dick Sporting
Goods, AMC Theatres
88.St. Johns Town Center  FL Jacksonville  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2005   98.2 %  1,390,687  Nordstrom, Dillard's, Arhaus Furniture, Dick's Sporting
Goods, Barnes & Noble, Restora tion Hardware (6),
Pinstripes (6), Homewood Suites by Hilton (15),
 Target, Ashley Furniture Home Store, Ross, Staples
(13), DSW , JoAnn Fabrics, PetsMart
89.Stanford Shopping Center  CA  Palo Alto
(San Jose) Ground Lease (2064)   94.4 % (11) Acquired
2003  99.8 %  1,288,163  Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's, Nordstrom, Macy's,
Crate and Barrel, The Container Store, Restoration
Hardware (6)
90.Stoneridge Shopping Center  CA  Pleasanton
(San
Francisco) Fee   49.9 % (4) Acquired
2007  97.9 %  1,299,686  Macy's (8), Nordstrom, JCPenney , Arhaus Furniture (6)
91.Summit Mall  OH  Akron  Fee   100.0 % Built 1965   90.6 %  777,524  Dillard's (8), Macy's
92.Tacoma Mall  WA Tacoma
(Seattle) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1987  93.5 %  1,239,523  Nordstrom, Macy's , JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods,
Marcus Cinema (6), Nordstrom Rack (6), Total Wine
and More (6), Ulta (6)
93.Tippecanoe Mall  IN Lafayette  Fee   100.0 % Built 1973   89.9 %  863,719  Macy's, JCPenney , Kohl's, Dick's Sporting Goods
94.Town Center at Boca Raton  FL Boca Raton
(Miami) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  99.1 %  1,778,727  Saks Fifth Avenue, Neiman Marcus, Bloomingdale's,
Nordstrom, Macy's, Crate & Barrel, The Container
Store, Joseph's Classic Market (6), Arhaus Furniture (6)
95.Town Center at Cobb  GA  Kennesaw
(Atlanta) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
1998  95.5 %  1,281,736  Belk, Macy's (8), JCPenney , Sears
96.Towne East Square  KS Wichita  Fee   100.0 % Built 1975   99.0 %  1,145,109  Dillard's, V on Maur , JCPenney , Round 1 (6)
97.Treasure Coast Square  FL Jensen
Beach Fee   100.0 % Built 1987   92.9 %  876,113  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Regal Cinema
98.Tyrone Square  FL St.
Petersburg
(Tampa) Fee   100.0 % Built 1972   94.0 %  960,215  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , DSW , Cobb 10 Luxury
Theatres, Dick's Sporting Goods , Lucky's Market,
PetSmart
99.University Park Mall  IN Mishawaka  Fee   100.0 % Built 1979   95.6 %  918,532  Macy's, JCPenney , Barnes & Noble
100. Walt Whitman Shops  NY  Huntington
Station (New
York) Fee and Ground Lease
(2032) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
1998  98.8 %  1,084,455  Saks Fifth Avenue, Bloomingdale’ s, Lord & Taylor ,
Macy’ s
101. West Town Mall  TN Knoxville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2042)  50.0 % (4) Acquired
1991  98.7 %  1,281,469  Belk (8), Dillard’ s, JCPenney , Regal  Cinebarre Theatre,
Dick's Sporting Goods (6)
102. Westchester , The  NY  White Plains
(New York) Fee   40.0 % (4) Acquired
1997  94.6 %  809,360  Neiman Marcus, Nordstrom, Crate and Barrel
103. White Oaks Mall  IL Springfield  Fee   80.7 % Built 1977   79.5 %  925,382  Macy's, Dick's Sporting Goods, LA  Fitness, Michael's
104. Wolfchase Galleria  TN Memphis  Fee   94.5 % Acquired
2002  97.0 %  1,151,500  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Malco Theatres, Courtyard
by Marriott (14)
105. Woodfield Mall  IL Schaumburg
(Chicago) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2012  95.8 %  2,154,882  Nordstrom, Macy's, Lord & Taylor , JCPenney , Sears,
Arhaus Furniture, P AC-MAN Entertainment
106. Woodland Hills Mall  OK  Tulsa  Fee   94.5 % Acquired
2002  94.0 %  1,097,833  Macy's, Dillard's, JCPenney , Holiday Inn Express (15),
Courtyard by Marriott (15)
Total Mall GLA  119,807,048 (18)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
29Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
Premium Outlets
1.Albertville Premium Outlets  MN  Albertville
(Minneapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  80.4 %  429,553  Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Lululemon, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Tommy Hilfiger , The North Face, Under Armour
2.Allen Premium Outlets  TX Allen (Dallas)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  96.9 %  544,219  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap
Outlet, Giorgio Armani, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Levi's, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Staybridge
Suites (14), The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch,
Under Armour
3.Aurora Farms Premium Outlets  OH  Aurora (Cleveland)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  93.9 %  271,516  Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
4.Birch Run Premium Outlets  MI Birch Run (Detroit)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  93.7 %  604,462  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Pottery
Barn/Williams-Sonoma Outlet, Tommy Hilfiger , The North
Face, Under Armour
5.Camarillo Premium Outlets  CA  Camarillo (Los
Angeles) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  97.2 %  686,299  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Giorgio Armani, H&M, Kate Spade New York, Lululemon,
Michael Kors, Neiman Marcus Last Call, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
6.Carlsbad Premium Outlets  CA  Carlsbad (San
Diego) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  96.0 %  289,209  Adidas, Barneys New York Warehouse, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Crate & Barrel, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tory Burch,
Under Armour
7.Carolina Premium Outlets  NC  Smithfield
(Raleigh) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  96.0 %  438,840  Adidas, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet,
J.Crew , Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
8.Charlotte Premium Outlets  NC  Charlotte  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2014   98.7 %  398,695  Adidas, Coach, Columbia Sportswea r, Gap Outlet, Guess,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
9.Chicago Premium Outlets  IL Aurora (Chicago)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2004   93.5 %  687,362  Adidas, Arc'teryx, Calvin Klein,  Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Restoration
Hardware, Saks Fifth Avenue Of f 5th, Under Armour
10.Cincinnati Premium Outlets  OH  Monroe
(Cincinnati) Fee   100.0 % Built 2009   97.9 %  398,809  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
11.Clarksburg Premium Outlets  MD  Clarksburg
(Washington, DC) Fee   66.0 % (4) Built 2016   90.9 % 390,128  Armani Outlet, A/X Armani Excha nge, Adidas, Calvin
Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Eredi Pisano,
Ermenegildo Zegn a, Express, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferrag amo, Thomas Pink,
Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
12.Clinton Crossing Premium
Outlets CT  Clinton  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  97.5 % 276,117  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Saks Fifth Avenue Of f 5th, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
13.Denver Premium Outlets  CO  Thornton (Denver)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2018   97.6 % 328,120  A/X Arma ni Excha nge, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet,
H&M, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour ,
Vineyard V ines
14.Desert Hills Premium Outlets  CA  Cabazon (Palm
Springs) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  99.8 % 655,261  Agent Provocateu r, Alexander McQueen, Armani Outlet,
Balenciaga, Bottega Veneta, Brion i, Brunello Cucinelli,
Burberry , Coach, Ermenegildo Zegna, Fendi, Gucci,
Jimmy Choo, Loro Piana, Marc Jacobs, Moncler ,
Mulberry , Neiman Marcus Last Call, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Prada, Saint Laurent Paris, Saks Fifth Avenue Off
5th, Salvatore Ferragamo, Stuart Weitzman, Tory Burch,
Valentino
15.Ellenton Premium Outlets  FL Ellenton (T ampa)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  95.5 % 477,050  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
16.Folsom Premium Outlets  CA  Folsom
(Sacramento) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  91.3 % 297,597  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap
Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
30Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
17.Gilroy Premium Outlets  CA  Gilroy (San Jose)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  90.2 % 578,326  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Lululemon, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off
5th, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger
18.Gloucester Premium Outlets  NJ Blackwood
(Philadelphia) Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2015   87.4 % 369,686  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks  Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, Guess, Levi's,
J. Crew , Loft Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour , Vera Bradley
19.Grand Prairie Premium Outlets  TX Grand Prairie (Dallas)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2012   95.8 % 423,679  Banana Republic,  Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store,
Calvin Klein, Coac h, Columbia Sportswear , Kate Spade
New York, J.Crew , Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Bahama,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
20.Grove City Premium Outlets  PA Grove City (Pittsburgh)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  92.3 % 530,748  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coac h, Gap Outlet, Guess, J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
21.Gulfport Premium Outlets  MS  Gulfport  Ground Lease (2059)   100.0 % Acquired
2010  89.9 % 300,009  Banana Republic, Chico's, Coach, Gap Outlet, H&M,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
22.Hagerstown Premium Outlets  MD  Hagerstown
(Baltimore/W ashington,
DC) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  84.9 % 485,104  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitters, Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Gap Outlet, Guess, J.Crew , Kate Spade
New York, Loft Outlet, New Balance, The North Face,
Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
23.Houston Premium Outlets  TX Cypress (Houston)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2008   99.1 % 542,381  Ann Taylor, A/X Armani Exchange,  Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Furla,
Gap Outlet, Giorg io Armani, Holiday Inn Express (15),
Kate Spade New York, Lululemon, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, V ictoria's Secret
24.Indiana Premium Outlets  IN Edinburgh
(Indianapolis) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  94.5 % 378,029  Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
Gap Outlet, Guess, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
25.Jackson Premium Outlets  NJ Jackson (New York)  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  96.2 % 285,606  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitters, Ann Taylor , Banana
Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap
Outlet, J.Crew , Loft Outlet, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
26.Jersey Shore Premium Outlets  NJ Tinton Falls (New York) Fee   100.0 % Built 2008   98.6 % 434,462  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Burberry , Brooks
Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear ,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
27.Johnson Creek Premium
Outlets WI Johnson Creek  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  91.3 % 277,672  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Gap Outlet, Loft
Outlet, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
28.Kittery Premium Outlets  ME  Kittery  Fee and Ground Lease
(2049) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
2004  87.0 % 259,361  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportsw ear, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate Spade
New York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Swarovski, Tommy
Hilfiger
29.Las Americas Premium Outlets  CA  San Diego  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  98.9 % 553,933  Adidas, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportsw ear, Gap Outlet, Giorgio Armani,
Guess, Kate Spade New York, Laco ste, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
30.Las V egas North Premium
Outlets NV  Las V egas  Fee   100.0 % Built 2003   99.3 % 676,322  All Saint s, Arma ni Outlet, A/X Armani Exchange,
Banana Republic, Burberry , Canali, CH Carolina
Herrera, Cheesecake Factory , Coach, David Yurman,
Dolce & Gabbana, Etro, Jimmy Choo, John Varvatos,
Lululemon, Kate Spade New York, Marc Jacobs,
Neiman Marcus Last Call, Michae l Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Roberto Cavalli, Saks Fifth Avenue Off
5th, Salvatore Ferragamo, Shake Shack, Tory Burch
31.Las V egas South Premium
Outlets NV  Las V egas  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  99.3 %  535,618  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet,
Guess, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
31Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
32.Lee Premium Outlets  MA  Lee  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  94.2 %  224,796  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin
Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
33.Leesburg Premium Outlets  VA Leesburg
(Washington, DC) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  97.9 %  478,311  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Armani Outlet, A/X Armani Exchange,
Brooks Brothers, Burberry , Coach, Design Within Reach,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Restoration Hardware, Tory Burch, Under Armour ,
Vineyard V ines, Williams-Sonoma
34.Lighthouse Place Premium
Outlets IN Michigan City
(Chicago, IL) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  87.2 %  454,780  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess, H&M, J.Crew , Kate Spade
New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The
North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
35.Merrimack Premium Outlets  NH  Merrimack  Fee   100.0 % Built 2012   98.4 %  408,896  Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Barbour, Bloomingdale's
The Outlet Store, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach,
J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Tory Burch, Under Armour , Vineyard V ines
36.Napa Premium Outlets  CA  Napa  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  92.8 %  179,379  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Micha el Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger
37.Norfolk Premium Outlets  VA Norfolk  Fee   65.0 % (4) Built 2017   83.3 %  332,087  A/X Armani Exchange, Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Columbia  Sportswear , Gap Outlet, H&M, Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under
Armour
38.North Bend Premium Outlets  WA North Bend
(Seattle) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  91.7 %  223,560  Banana Republic, Coach, Gap Outlet, Levi's, Kate Spade
New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Skechers, Under Armour
39.North Georgia Premium Outlets  GA  Dawsonville
(Atlanta) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  92.8 % 540,724  Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, Banan a Republic, Brooks
Brothers, Burber ry, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , J.Cre w, Kate Spade New York, Lululemon,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Pottery Barn,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Williams-Sonoma
40.Orlando International Premium
Outlets FL Orlando  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  99.0 % 772,891  Adidas, Armani Outlet, Calvin Klein, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Invicta, Havaianas, H&M,  J.Crew , Karl
Lagerfeld, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Panera Bread, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth Avenue Off
5th, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under
Armour
41.Orlando V ineland Premium
Outlets FL Orlando  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  100.0 % 656,892  Adidas, All Saints , Armani Outlet, Bally , Bottega Veneta,
Brunello Cucinell i, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Carolina
Herrera, Coach, Ermenegildo Zegna, Jimmy Choo, John
Varvatos, Kate Spade New York, Lacoste, Lululemon,
Michael Kors, Nike, Prada, Polo Ralph Lauren, Roberto
Cavalli, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferragamo,
TAG Heuer , The North Face, Tod's, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour
42.Petaluma V illage Premium
Outlets CA  Petaluma (San
Francisco) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  95.7 % 201,694  Adidas,  Ann Taylor , Banana Repub lic, Brooks Brothers,
Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Saks Fifth Avenue Of f 5th, Tommy Hilfiger
43.Philadelphia Premium Outlets  PA Limerick
(Philadelphia) Fee   100.0 % Built 2007   97.7 % 549,154  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, Guess, H&M, J.Crew ,
Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Restoration Hardw are, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Tory Burch, Under Armour
44.Phoenix Premium Outlets  AZ Chandler
(Phoenix) Ground Lease (2077)   100.0 % Built 2013   98.1 %  356,506  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Factory Store, Guess,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Bahama, Tommy Hilfiger , Tumi,
Under Armour
45.Pismo Beach Premium Outlets  CA  Pismo Beach  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  96.4 %  147,417  Calvin Klein, Coach, Guess, Kate Spade New York,
Levi's, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy
Hilfiger , Van Heusen
46.Pleasant Prairie Premium
Outlets WI Pleasant Prairie
(Chicago,
IL/Milwaukee) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  99.3 %  402,626  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York, J.Crew ,
Lacoste, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch,
Under Armour
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
32Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
47.Puerto Rico Premium Outlets  PR  Barceloneta  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  97.2 % 350,091  Adidas,  Ann Taylor , Calvin Klein, Coach, Disney Store
Outlet, Gap Outle t, Invicta, Lacoste, Loft Outlet, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, Tommy Hilfiger
48.Queenstown Premium Outlets  MD  Queenstown
(Baltimore) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  97.5 % 289,601  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, St. John, Tommy Bahama, Under Armour
49.Rio Grande V alley Premium
Outlets TX Mercedes
(McAllen) Fee   100.0 % Built 2006   87.4 % 603,929  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, A/X Armani Exchange,
Banana Republic, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, H&M,
Kate Spade New York, Levi's, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors,
Nike, Pandora, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
50.Round Rock Premium Outlets  TX Round Rock
(Austin) Fee   100.0 % Built 2006   99.0 % 498,363  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, Duluth Trading Company , Gap
Outlet, J.Crew , Kate Spade New York, Loft Outlet,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
51.San Francisco Premium Outlets  CA  Livermore (San
Francisco) Fee and Ground Lease
(2021) (9)  100.0 % Built 2012   100.0 % 696,904  All Saints, Arc'teryx, Athleta, A/X Armani Exchange,
Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store, Bottega Veneta,
Brunello Cucinelli, Burberry , CH Carolina Herrera, Coach,
Ermenegildo Zegna, Etro, Furla, Gucci, H&M, Jimmy
Choo, John Varvatos, Kate Spade New York, Lacoste,
Longchamp, MaxM ara, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Prada, Roger Vivier, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Sandro & Maje, Salvatore Ferragam o, Stuart Weitzman,
The North Face,  Tod's, Tory Burch, Under Armour ,
Versace, Zadig et V oltaire
52.San Marcos Premium Outlets  TX San Marcos
(Austin/San
Antonio) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  97.2 % 731,377  Armani Outlet, Banana Republic, Burberry , CH Carolina
Herrera, Diane Von Furstenberg, Etro, Gucci, J. Crew ,
Jimmy Choo, Johnny Rockets, Kate Spade New York,
Lacoste, Lululemo n, Neiman Marcus Last Call, Michael
Kors, Pandora, Polo Ralph Lauren,  Pottery Barn, Prada,
Restoration Hardware, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Saint
Laurent Paris, Salvatore Ferragam o, Stuart Weitzman,
The North Face, Tommy Bahama, Tory Burch, Versace,
Vineyard V ines
53.Seattle Premium Outlets  WA Tulalip (Seattle)  Ground Lease (2079)   100.0 % Built 2005   98.8 % 554,751  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Arc'teryx, Armani Outlet, Banana
Republic, Burberry , Calvin Klein , Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Kate Spade New York, Lululemon, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren , St. John, Stuart
Weitzman, The North Face, Tomm y Bahama, Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
54.Silver Sands Premium Outlets  FL Destin  Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2012  94.5 % 450,954  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , J.Cre w, Kate Spade New
York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour
55.St. Augustine Premium Outlets  FL St. Augustine
(Jacksonville) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  95.7 % 327,699  Adidas,  Ann Taylor , Banana Repub lic, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet,  J.Crew , Kate Spade
New York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
56.St. Louis Premium Outlets  MO  St. Louis
(Chesterfield) Fee   60.0 % (4) Built 2013   96.0 %  351,495  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Brooks Brothers, Coach, Gap Outlet,
J. Crew , Kate Spade New York, Levi's, Michael Kors,
Nike, Puma, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Ugg, Under Armour
57.Tampa Premium Outlets  FL Lutz (T ampa)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2015   100.0 %  459,485  Adidas, Armani Outlet, Banana Republic, BJ's Restaurant
and Brewhouse, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach,
Columbia Sportsw ear, Gap Outlet, J. Crew , Kate Spade
New York, Lucky Brand, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Puma, Saks 5th Avenue Off 5th, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Tumi, Under Armour
58.Tanger Outlets - Columbus (1)  OH  Sunbury
(Columbus) Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2016   95.0 %  355,255  Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,  Coach, Kate Spade
New York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Under Armour
59.Tanger Outlets -
Galveston/Houston (1) TX Texas City  Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2012   95.9 %  352,705  Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,  Coach, Gap Outlet,
Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Tommy
Hilfiger
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
33Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal Or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
60.The Crossings Premium Outlets  PA Tannersville  Fee and Ground Lease
(2029) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
2004  98.1 %  411,747  Adidas, Ann Taylor, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers,
Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew , Johnny Rockets, Kate
Spade New York, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
61.Tucson Premium Outlets  AZ Marana (T ucson)  Fee   100.0 % Built 2015   89.3 %  363,437  Adidas, Banana Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, Godiva, Guess, J. Crew , Johnny
Rockets, Levi’s, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Saks 5th Avenue Off 5th, Skechers, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
62.Twin Cities Premium Outlets  MN  Eagan  Fee   35.0 % (4) Built 2014   95.7 %  408,931  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Outlet, J.
Crew , Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Robert Graham, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th,
Talbots,  Under Armour
63.Vacaville Premium Outlets  CA  Vacaville  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  94.7 %  445,400  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Columbia Sportswear , Gap Outlet, J.Crew , Kate
Spade New York, Lacoste, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Skechers, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour , West Elm Outlet
64.Waikele Premium Outlets  HI Waipahu
(Honolulu) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  95.8 %  219,480  Adidas, All Saints, Armani Outle t, Banana Republic,
Barney's New York, Calvin Klein, Coach, Furla, Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks
Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Swarovski, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch
65.Waterloo Premium Outlets  NY  Waterloo  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  94.1 %  421,436  American Eagle Outfitters, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic,
Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Chico’ s, Coach, Columbia
Sportswear , Gap Outlet, H&M, J.Cre w, Levi's, Loft Outlet,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Skechers, Tommy
Hilfiger , Under Armour
66.Williamsburg Premium Outlets  VA Williamsburg  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2010  95.0 %  522,562  Adidas, American Eagle Outfitters,  Ann Taylor , Banana
Republic, Brooks Brothers, Calvin Klein, Coach, J.Crew ,
Kate Spade New York, Levi's, Loft Outlet, Michael Kors,
New Balance, Nike, Pandora, Polo Ralph Lauren, The
North Face, Timbe rland, Tommy Bahama, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
67.Woodburn Premium Outlets  OR  Woodburn
(Portland) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2013  98.6 %  389,722  Adidas, Ann Taylor , Banana Republic, Calvin Klein,
Coach, Gap Outlet, J. Crew , Levi's, Michael Kors, Nike,
The North Face, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory
Burch, Under Armour
68.Woodbury Common Premium
Outlets NY  Central V alley
(New York) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  98.5 %  909,342  Arc'teryx, Armani Outlet, Balenciaga, Bottega Veneta,
Breitling, Brioni, Brunello Cucinel li, Burberry , Canali,
Celine, Chloe, Coach, Dior, Dolce & Gabbana, Dunhill,
Fendi, Givenchy , Golden Goose, Gucci, Jimmy Choo,
Lacoste, Le Pain Quotidien, Loew e, Longchamp, Loro
Piana, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors, Moncler , Mulberry ,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Saint Laurent, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferrag amo, Shake Shack,
Stuart Weitzman, Theory , Tod's, Tom Ford, Tory Burch,
Valentino, V ersace, Zegna
69.Wrentham V illage Premium
Outlets MA  Wrentham
(Boston) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2004  94.5 %  672,857  Adidas, All Saints, Ann Taylor , Armani Outlet, Banana
Republic, Bloomingdale's The Outlet Store, Brooks
Brothers, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, David Yurman,
J.Crew , Karl Lagerfeld, Kate Spade  New York, Lacoste,
Lululemon, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Restoration Hardware, Robe rt Graham, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Salvatore Ferraga mo, Theory , Tommy
Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour , Vineyard V ines
Total U.S. Premium Outlets
GLA30,521,409
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
34Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
The Mills
1.Arizona Mills  AZ  Tempe
(Phoenix) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  97.1 %  1,237,900  Marshalls, Burlington Coat Factory, Ross, Harkins
Cinemas & IMAX, Sea Life Center , Conn's, Legoland,
 Forever 21, Rainforest Café, Fieldhouse USA  (6)
2.Arundel Mills  MD  Hanover
(Baltimore) Fee   59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007  99.5 %  1,931,034  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Bed Bath & Beyond, Best
Buy, Burlington Coat Factory , Dave  & Buster's, Medieval
Times, Modell's, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Off Broadway
Shoe Warehouse, T.J. Maxx, Cinemark Egyptian 24
Theatres, Maryland Live! Casino, Forever 21, Ulta, Live!
Hotel (14)
3.Colorado Mills  CO  Lakewood
(Denver) Fee   37.5 % (4) Acquired
2007  90.6 %  1,414,545  Forever 21, Jump street, Off Broadway Shoe Warehouse,
Super Target, United Artists Thea tre, Burlington Coat
Factory , H&M, Dick's Sporting Goods
4.Concord Mills  NC  Concord
(Charlotte) Fee   59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007  99.5 %  1,362,549  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Burlington Coat Factory ,
Dave & Buster's, Nike Factory Store, Off Broadway
Shoes, Bed Bath & Beyond, AMC Theatres, Best Buy,
Forever 21, Sea Life Center , H&M
5.Grapevine Mills  TX  Grapevine
(Dallas) Fee   59.3 % (4) Acquired
2007  99.4 % 1,781,293  Burlington Coat Factory , Marshalls, Saks Fifth Avenue Off
5th, AMC Theatres, Sun & Ski Sports, Neiman Marcus
Last Call, Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Legoland
Discovery Center , Sea Life Center , Ross, H&M, Round 1
Entertainment, Fieldhouse USA, Rainforest Café
6.Great Mall  CA  Milpitas (San
Jose) Fee and Ground Lease
(2049) (7)  100.0 % Acquired
2007  99.2 % 1,368,381  Neiman Marcus Last Call, Camille La Vie, Kohl's, Dave &
Buster's, Burlingto n Coat Factory , Marshalls, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Nike Factory Store, Century Theatres,
Bed Bath & Beyond, Dick's Sporting Goods, Legoland
Discovery Center (6)
7.Gurnee Mills  IL Gurnee
(Chicago) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007  82.1 % 1,936,003  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Bed Bath & Beyond/Buy
Buy Baby , Burlington Coat Facto ry, Kohl's, Marshalls
Home Goods, Marcus Cinemas, Value City Furniture, Off
Broadway Shoe Warehouse, Macy's, Floor & Decor , Dick's
Sporting Goods, Tilt/Rink Side Sports & Family
Entertainment Center , Rainforest Café, The Room Place
8.Katy Mills  TX  Katy
(Houston) Fee   62.5 % (4) (2) Acquired
2007  94.7 % 1,787,908  Bass Pro Shops Outdoor World, Burlington Coat Factory ,
Marshalls, Neiman  Marcus Last Call, Saks Fifth Avenue
Off 5th, Sun & Ski Sports, AMC Thea tres, Tilt, Ross, H&M,
RH Outlet, Rainforest Café
9.Mills at Jersey Gardens, The  NJ Elizabeth  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2015  96.1 % 1,303,749  Bed Bath & Beyond, Burlington Coat Factory , Century 21
Department Store , Cohoes, Forever 21, AMC Theatres,
Marshalls, Nike Factory Store, Saks 5th Avenue Of f 5th,
10.Ontario Mills  CA  Ontario
(Riverside) Fee   50.0 % (4) Acquired
2007  99.1 % 1,421,750  Burlington Coat Factory , Nike Factory Store, Marshalls,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Nordstrom Rack, Dave &
Buster's, Camille La Vie, Sam Ash Music, AMC Theatres,
Forever 21, Uniqlo, Restoration  Hardware Outlet,
Skechers Superstore, Rainforest Café, Aki-Home
11.Opry Mills  TN  Nashville  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 99.9 % 1,168,427  Regal Cinema & IMAX, Dave & Buster's, Sun & Ski, Bass
Pro Shop s Outdoor World, Bed Bath & Beyond, Saks Fifth
Avenue Off 5th, Madame Tussau ds, Rainforest Café,
Aquarium Restaurant
12.Outlets at Orange, The  CA  Orange (Los
Angeles) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 99.8 %  866,975  Dave & Buster ’s, Vans Skatepark,  Lucky Strike Lanes,
Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, AMC Theatres, Neiman Marcus
Last Call, Nordstrom Rack, Bloom ingdale's the Outlet
Store
13.Potomac Mills  VA Woodbridge
(Washington,
DC) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 99.1 %  1,560,052  Marshalls, T.J. Maxx, JCPenney , Burlington Coat Factory ,
Nordstrom Rack, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th Outlet, Costco
Warehouse, AMC Theatres, Bloom ingdale's Outlet, Buy
Buy Baby/and That!, Round 1 (6)
14.Sawgrass Mills  FL Sunrise
(Miami) Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2007 97.8 % 2,369,306  Bed Bath & Beyond, BrandsMart USA, Burlington Coat
Factory , Marshalls, Neiman Marcus  Last Call, Nordstrom
Rack, Saks Fifth Avenue Off 5th, Super Target, T.J. Maxx,
Regal Cinema, Bloomingdale's Outlet, Century 21
Department Store, Dick's Sporting Goods, Primark (6), AC
Hotel by Marriott (6)
Total Mills Properties GLA 21,509,872
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
35Ownership Interest Year Built
(Expiration if Legal or
Property Name   State   City (CBSA)   Lease) (3)   Ownership   Acquired   Occupancy (5)   Total GLA   Selected T enants
Lifestyle Centers
1.ABQ Uptown  NM  Albuquerque  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2011 98.8 % 229,530  Anthropologie, Apple, Pottery Barn
2.Hamilton Town Center  IN Noblesville
(Indianapolis) Fee   50.0 % (4) Built 2008  96.6 % 674,905  JCPenney , Dick's Sporting Goods, Stein Mart, Bed Bath
& Beyond, DSW , Hamilton 16 IMAX, Earth Fare (13)
3.Pier Park  FL Panama City
Beach Fee   65.6 % (4) Built 2008  98% 947,992  Dillard's, JCPenne y, Target, Grand Theatres, Ron Jon
Surf Shop, Marga ritaville, Marshall s, Dave & Buster's,
Skywheel
4.University Park V illage  TX Fort W orth  Fee   100.0 % Acquired
2015  100.0 % 169,940  Anthropologie, Apple, Pottery Barn
Total Lifestyle Centers GLA 2,022,367
Other Properties
1 - 9. Other Properties  4,387,656  
10 - 11. TMLP  Acquired
2007 2,913,691  
Total Other GLA 7,301,347 (18)
Total U.S. Properties GLA 181,162,043
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
U.S. Properties
36FOOTNOTES:
(1)This property is managed by a third party .
(2)Our direct and indirect interests in some of the properties held as joint venture interests are subject to preferences on distributions in favor of other partners or us.
(3)The date listed is the expiration date of the last renewal option available to the operating entity under the ground lease. In a majority of the ground leases, we have a right to  
purchase the lessor ’s interest under an option, right of first refusal or other provision.  Unless otherwise indicated, each ground lease listed in this column covers at least  
50% of its respective property .
(4)Joint venture properties accounted for under the equity method.
(5)Malls - Executed leases for all company-owned GLA  in mall stores, excluding majors and anchors. Premium Outlets and The Mills - Executed leases for all company-owned
GLA (or total center GLA).
(6)Indicates box, anchor , major or project currently under development/construction or has announced plans for development.
(7)Indicates ground lease covers less than 50% of the acreage of this property .
(8)Tenant has multiple locations at this center .
(9)Indicates ground lease covers outparcel only .
(10)Tenant has an existing store at this center but will move to a new location.
(11)We receive substantially all the economic benefit of the property due to a preference or advance.
(12)We own a mortgage note that encumbers Pheasant Lane Mall that entitles us to 100% of the economics of this property .
(13)Indicates anchor has announced its intent to close this location.
(14)Indicates box, anchor , major or project currently under development/construction by a third party .
(15)Owned by a third party .
(16)Includes multi-family tenant on-site.
(17)This property is undergoing significant renovation.
(18)GLA includes of fice space.  Centers with more than 75,000 square feet of of fice space are listed below:
Auburn Mall - 85,619 sq. ft.
Circle Centre – 138,390 sq. ft.
Copley Place - 893,439 sq. ft.
Domain, The - 156,240 sq. ft.
Fashion Centre at Pentagon City , The - 169,089 sq. ft.
Oxford V alley Mall - 137,862 sq. ft.
Shops at Clearfork, The - 146,571 sq. ft.
Southdale Center - 101,560 sq. ft.
Table of Contents
37United States Lease Expirations
The following table summarizes lease expiration data for our U.S. malls and Premium Outlets, including Puerto Rico, as
of December 31, 2019. The data presented does not consider the impact of renewal options that may be contained in leases.
U.S. MALLS AND PREMIUM OUTLETS LEASE EXPIRATIONS (1)
            Avg. Base     Percentage of Gross
Number of Minimum Rent Annual Rental
Year Leases Expiring Square Feet PSF at 12/31/18 Revenues (2)
Inline Stores and Freestanding
Month to Month Leases  651  2,021,771 $  58.01  2.0%
2020  2,473  8,606,035 $  50.60  7.6%
2021  2,424  9,066,802 $  50.64  8.0%
2022  2,326  8,754,342 $  49.66  7.7%
2023  2,277  9,381,279 $  56.10  9.1%
2024  1,919  7,462,106 $  59.29  7.6%
2025  1,478  5,658,208 $  63.78  6.4%
2026  1,275  4,630,900 $  63.93  5.2%
2027  985  3,708,647 $  65.27  4.2%
2028  851  3,660,770 $  59.68  3.8%
2029  723  3,132,495 $  62.27  3.2%
2030 and Thereafter  445  2,853,217 $  41.65  2.2%
Specialty Leasing Agreements w/ terms in
excess of 12 months  1,836  4,658,652 $  18.28  1.6%
Anchors
2020  5  524,702 $  6.01 0.1%
2021  10  1,113,351 $  6.32  0.1%
2022  16  2,033,754 $  6.14  0.2%
2023  17  2,386,762 $  6.67  0.3%
2024  24  2,027,154 $  8.30  0.3%
2025  16  1,480,858 $  7.21  0.2%
2026  7  804,111 $  4.30  0.1%
2027  6  920,224 $  4.16  0.1%
2028  9  857,119 $  7.58  0.1%
2029  5  577,818 $  5.02  0.1%
2030 and Thereafter  25  2,455,938 $  8.50  0.4%
(1)Does not consider the impact of renewal options that may be contained in leases.
(2)Annual rental revenues represent domestic 2019 consolidated and joint venture combined base rental revenue.
Table of Contents
38International Properties
Our ownership interests in properties outside the United States are primarily owned through joint venture arrangements.
 With the exception of our Premium Outlets in Canada, all of our international properties are managed by related parties.  
European Investments
At December 31, 2019, we owned 63,924,148 shares, or approximately 22.2%, of Klépierre, which had a quoted market
price of $37.96 per share. Klépierre is a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate company, which owns, or has an interest in
shopping centers located in 15 countries.
As of December 31, 2019, we had a controlling interest in a European investee with interests in nine Designer Outlet
properties. Eight of the outlet properties are located in Europe and one outlet property is located in Canada. Of the eight
properties in Europe, two are in Italy, two are in the Netherlands, and one each is in Austria, France, Germany and the United
Kingdom. As of December 31, 2019, our legal percentage ownership interests in these entities ranged from 45% to 94%.
We own a 14.6% interest in Value Retail PLC and affiliated entities, which own and operate nine luxury outlets throughout
Europe. We also have a minority direct ownership in three of those outlets.
Other International Investments
We hold a 40% interest in nine operating joint venture properties in Japan, a 50% interest in four operating joint venture
properties in South Korea, a 50% interest in two operating joint venture properties in Mexico, a 50% interest in two operating
joint venture properties in Malaysia, and a 50% interest in three Premium Outlet operating joint venture properties in Canada.
The nine Japanese Premium Outlets operate in various cities throughout Japan and comprise over 3.3 million square feet of
GLA and were 99.5% leased as of December 31, 2019.
The following property tables summarize certain data for our international properties as of December 31, 2019 and do not
include our equity investment in Klépierre or our investment in Value Retail PLC and affiliated entities.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
39     City     Ownership     SPG Effective         Total Gross      
COUNTR Y/Property Name (Metropolitan area) Interest Ownership Year Built Leasable Area (1) Selected T enants  
JAPAN
 1.Ami Premium Outlets Ami (T okyo) Fee  40.0 %  2009  315,000 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New
York, McGregor , Michael Kors, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma,
TaylorMade, Tommy Hilfiger
2.Gotemba Premium Outlets (3) Gotemba City (T okyo) Fee  40.0 %  2000  481,500 Adidas, Armani, Balenciaga, Bally, Beams, Bottega
Veneta, Burberry , Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Dunhill, Gap
Outlet, Gucci, Jill Stuart, Loro Piana, Michael Kors,
Moncler , Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu, Puma,
Salvatore Ferragamo, Tod's, United Arrows
3.Kobe-Sanda Premium Outlets Hyougo-ken (Osaka) Ground Lease (2026)  40.0 %  2007  441,000 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Beams, Coac h, Dolce & Gabbana,
Gap Outlet, Gucci, Kate Spade New York, Marc Jacobs,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu,
Salvatore Ferragamo, Tod's, Tommy Hilfiger , United
Arrows, V alentino
4.Rinku Premium Outlets (3) Izumisano (Osaka) Ground Lease (2031)  40.0 %  2000  402,500 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Beams, Coac h, Dolce & Gabbana,
Dunhill, Eddie Bauer , Furla, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New
York, Lanvin Collection, Michael Kors, Nike, Olive des
Olive, Polo Ralph Lauren, Salvatore Ferragamo,
TaylorMade, Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows
5.Sano Premium Outlets Sano (T okyo) Fee  40.0 %  2003  390,800 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Dunhill, Eddie Bauer , Etro, Furla,
Gap Outlet, Gucci, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada/Miu Miu, TaylorMade
6.Sendai-Izumi Premium Outlets Izumi Park Town (Sendai) Ground Lease (2027)  40.0 %  2008  164,200 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Gap, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy
Hilfiger , United Arrows
7.Shisui Premium Outlets Shisui (Chiba), Japan Ground Lease (2033)  40.0 %  2013  434,600 Adidas, Beams, Citizen, Coach, Dunhill, Furla, Gap, Kate
Spade New York, Marmot, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Samsonite, Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows
8.Toki Premium Outlets Toki (Nagoya) Ground Lease (2033)  40.0 %  2005  367,700 Adidas, Beams, Coach, Furla, Gap Outlet, Kate Spade
New York, Nike, Olive des Olive, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Timberland, Tommy Hilfiger , United Arrows
9.Tosu Premium Outlets (2) Fukuoka (Kyushu) Fee  40.0 %  2004  328,400 Adidas, Beams, Bose, Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Furla,
Gap Outlet, Kate Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike,
Olive des Olive, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma, Tommy
Hilfiger , United Arrows
Phase 4 - 2019
Subtotal Japan 3,325,700
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
40     City     Ownership     SPG Effective         Total Gross      
COUNTR Y/Property Name (Metropolitan area) Interest Ownership Year Built Leasable Area (1) Selected T enants  
MEXICO
10.Punta Norte Premium Outlets Mexico City Fee  50.0 %  2004  333,000 Adidas, Calvin Klein, CH Carolina Herrera, Coach, Dolce
& Gabbana, Kate Spade New York, Nautica, Nike, Palacio
Outlet, Salvatore Ferragamo, Zegna
11.Premium Outlets Querétaro Querétaro Fee  50.0 %  2019  274,800 Adidas, Adrianna Papell, Calvin Klein, Guess, Levi's,
Nike, Tommy Hilfiger , True Religion, Under Armour
Subtotal Mexico  607,800
SOUTH KOREA
12.Yeoju Premium Outlets Yeoju (Seoul) Fee  50.0 %  2007  551,600 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Chloe, Coach, Fendi, Gucci,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Salvatore
Ferragamo, Tod's, Under Armour , Valentino, Vivienne
Westwood
13.Paju Premium Outlets (2) Paju (Seoul) Ground Lease (2040)  50.0 %  2011  558,900 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein, Coach, Jill
Stuart, Lanvin Collection, Marc Jacobs, Michael Kors,
Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma,  Tory Burch, Under
Armour , Vivienne W estwood
Phase 3 - 2019
14.Busan Premium Outlets Busan Fee  50.0 %  2013  360,200 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein, Coach, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, The North Face, Tommy
Hilfiger
15.Siehung Premium Outlets Siehung Fee  50.0 %  2017  444,400 Adidas, Armani, Bean Pole, Calvin Klein, Coach, Michael
Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Salva tore Ferragamo, The
North Face, Under Armour
Subtotal South Korea  1,915,100
MALA YSIA
16.Johor Premium Outlets Johor (Singapore) Fee  50.0 %  2011  309,400 Adidas, Armani, Calvin Klein, Coach, DKNY , Furla, Gucci,
Guess, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada,
Puma, Salvatore Ferragamo, Timbe rland, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Tory Burch, Zegna
17.Genting Highlands Premium Outlets Kuala Lumpur Fee  50.0 %  2017  277,500 Adidas, Coach, Furla, Kate Spade New York, Michael
Kors, Padini, Polo Ralph Lauren, Puma
Subtotal Malaysia  586,900
CANADA
18.Toronto Premium Outlets Toronto (Ontario) Fee  50.0 %  2013  504,900 Adidas, Armani, Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach, Eddie
Bauer , Gap, Gucci, Guess, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Saks Fifth
Avenue, Tommy Hilfiger , Tory Burch, Under Armour
19.Premium Outlets Montreal Montreal (Quebec) Fee  50.0 %  2014  367,400 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap, Kate Spade New York,
Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph  Lauren, Salvatore
Ferragamo, The North Face, Tommy Hilfiger , Under
Armour
20.Premium Outlet Collection
Edmonton International AirportEdmonton (Alberta) Ground Lease (2072)  50.0 %  2018  424,000 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap Factory , Kate Spade
New York, Nike, Polo Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger ,
Under Armour
Subtotal Canada  1,296,300
TOTAL INTERNA TIONAL  PREMIUM OUTLETS  7,731,800
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Property Table
International Properties
41     City     Ownership     SPG Effective         Total Gross      
COUNTR Y/Property Name (Metropolitan area) Interest Ownership Year Built Leasable Area (1) Selected T enants  
INTERNA TIONAL  DESIGNER OUTLETS
AUSTRIA                             
1.Parndorf Designer Outlet  Vienna Fee  90.0 %  2005  118,000 Adidas, Armani, Bally , Burberry , Calvin Klein,
Coach, Dolce & Gabbana, Furla, Geox, Gucci,
Guess, Michael Kors, Moncler , Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Porsche Design, Prada, Tommy Hilfiger ,
 Zegna
Subtotal Austria  118,000
ITALY
2.La Reggia Designer Outlet Phases 1 & 2 (3)  Marcianise (Naples) Fee  90.0 %  2010  288,000 Adidas, Armani, Calvin Klein, Coach, Liu Jo,
Michael Kors, Nike, Pinko, Polo Ralph Lauren,
Puma, Timberland, Tommy Hilfiger , Versace
3.Noventa Di Piave Designer Outlet (2)  Venice Fee  90.0 %  2008  353,000 Armani, Bally, Bottega Veneta, Burberry , Calvin
Klein, Coach, Dolce & Gabanna, Fendi, Furla,
Gucci, Loro Piana, Michael Kors, Nike, Pinko,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Salvatore Ferragamo,
Sergio Rossi,T ommy Hilfiger , Valentino, Versace,
Zegna
Phase 5 - 2019
Subtotal Italy  641,000
NETHERLANDS
4.Roermond Designer Outlet Phases 2 & 3  Roermond Fee  90.0 %  2005  173,000 Armani, Bally , Burberry , Calvin Klein, Coach,
Furla, Gucci, Michael Kors, Moncl er, Mulberry ,
Polo Ralph Lauren, Prada, Swarovski, Tod's,
Tommy Hilfiger , UGG, Zegna
5.Roermond Designer Outlet Phase 4 Roermond Fee  46.1 % 2017  125,000 Adidas, Karl Lagerfield, Liu Jo, Longchamp, Tag
Heuer , Tom Tailor, Woolrich
6.Roosendaal Designer Outlet Roosendaal Fee  94.0 % 2017  247,500 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Esprit, Guess, Nike, Puma,
S. Oliver , Tommy Hilfiger
Subtotal Netherlands  545,500
UNITED KINGDOM
7.Ashford Designer Outlet (2)  Kent Fee  45.0 %  2000  281,000 Adidas, Bose, Calvin Klein, Clarks, Fossil,
French Connectio n, Gap, Guess, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Superdry , Tommy Hilfiger
Phase 2 - 2019
Subtotal England  281,000
CANADA
8.Vancouver Designer Outlets (2)  Vancouver Ground Lease (2072)  45.0 %  2015  326,000 Adidas, Armani, Calvin Klein, Coach, Gap, Kate
Spade New York, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo Ralph
Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger , Under Armour
Phase 2 - 2019
Subtotal Canada  326,000
GERMANY
9.Ochtrup Designer Outlets Ochtrup Fee 70.5 % 2016  191,500 Adidas, Calvin Klein, Guess, Lindt, Nike, Puma,
Samsonite, Schiesser , Seidensticker , Steiff, Tom
Tailor, Vero Moda
Subtotal Germany  191,500
FRANCE
10.Provence Designer Outlet Miramas Fee 90.0 % 2017  269,000 Armani, Furla, Guess, Michael Kors, Nike, Polo
Ralph Lauren, Puma, Timberland, Tommy
Hilfiger
Subtotal France  269,000
Total International Designer Outlets  2,372,000
FOOTNOTES:
(1)All gross leasable area listed in square feet.
(2)Property completed an expansion in 2019.
(3)Property is undergoing an expansion.
Table of Contents
42Land
We have direct or indirect ownership interests in approximately 240 acres of land held in the United States and Canada
for future development.
Sustainability
We incorporate sustainable thinking into many of the areas of our business; from how we plan, develop, and operate our
properties, to how we do business with our customers, engage with our communities, and create a productive and positive work
environment for our employees.  Our sustainability framework focuses on four key areas: Properties, Customers, Communities,
and Employees.  
We leverage sustainability to achieve cost efficiencies in our operations.  By implementing a range of energy
management practices and continuous energy monitoring and reporting, we have reduced our energy consumption at
comparable properties every year since 2003.  As a result, excluding new developments, we have reduced the electricity usage
over which we have direct control, by 373 million kWhs since 2003.  This represents a 38% reduction in electricity usage across
a portfolio of comparable properties.  
Our reduction in greenhouse gas emissions resulting from our energy management efforts in the same period is 260,532
metric tons of CO2e. This figure includes emission streams that have been consistently tracked since 2003 including scope 1,
scope 2, and for scope 3 only for employee commuting and business travel. Additional emission streams, such as emissions
generated from solid waste management, use of refrigerants and tenants’ plug-load consumptions, are included in Simon’s
annual sustainability report published in accordance with the guidelines of the Global Reporting Initiatives (GRI), the most widely
used international standard for sustainability reporting.
Simon’s sustainability performance was recognized by international organizations. Simon was awarded a Green Star
ranking - the designation awarded for leadership in sustainability performance by the Global Real Estate Sustainability
Benchmark (GRESB). In 2019, Simon participated in CDP’s annual climate change questionnaire and received a B score that
represents results that are higher than the North America regional average of C, and higher than our sector average of C.
Mortgages and Unsecured Debt
The following table sets forth certain information regarding the mortgages encumbering our properties, and the properties
held by our domestic and international joint venture arrangements, and also our unsecured corporate debt. Substantially all of
the mortgage and property related debt is nonrecourse to us.
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
43Interest Face Annual Debt Maturity 
Property Name Rate Amount Service (1) Date 
Consolidated Indebtedness:
Secured Indebtedness:
Arizona Mills   5.76%  $  149,481 $12,268 07/01/20
Battlefield Mall   3.95%   115,043  7,118 09/01/22
Birch Run Premium Outlets   4.21%   123,000  5,177 (2) 02/06/26
Calhoun Outlet Marketplace   4.17%   18,311 (19)  1,140 06/01/26
Carolina Premium Outlets   3.36%   42,982  2,675 12/01/22
Domain, The   5.44%   180,735 14,085 08/01/21
Ellenton Premium Outlets   4.30%   178,000  7,651 (2) 12/01/25
Empire Mall   4.31%   186,948  8,065 (2) 12/01/25
Florida Keys Outlet Marketplace   4.17%   17,000  709 (2) 12/01/25
Gaffney Outlet Marketplace   4.17%   29,581 (19)  1,841 06/01/26
Grand Prairie Premium Outlets   3.66%   111,607  6,596 04/01/23
Grove City Premium Outlets   4.31%   140,000  6,032 (2) 12/01/25
Gulfport Premium Outlets   4.35%   50,000  2,174 (2) 12/01/25
Gurnee Mills   3.99%   259,455 15,736 10/01/26
Hagerstown Premium Outlets   4.26%   74,655  4,550 02/06/26
Ingram Park Mall   5.38%   125,225  9,746 06/01/21
La Reggia Designer Outlet Phases 1 & 2   2.25%   (25)  141,001 (30)  7,620 02/15/22
Lee Premium Outlets   4.17%   50,710 (19)  3,157 06/01/26
Merrimack Premium Outlets   3.78%   119,120  7,247 07/01/23
Midland Park Mall   4.35%   73,679  5,078 09/06/22
Mills at Jersey Gardens, The   3.83%   350,000 13,405 (2) 11/01/20
Montgomery Mall   4.57%   100,000  4,570 (2) 05/01/24
Noventa Di Piave Designer Outlet Phases 1, 2, 3, 4   1.95%   313,701 (30)  6,108 (2) 07/25/25
Opry Mills   4.09%   375,000 15,345 (2) 07/01/26
Outlets at Orange, The   4.22%   215,000  9,067 (2) 04/01/24
Oxford Valley Mall   4.77%   (18)  59,541  4,456 12/07/20
Parndorf Designer Outlet   2.00%   207,487 (30)  4,150 (2) 07/04/29
Penn Square Mall   3.84%   310,000 11,910 (2) 01/01/26
Phipps Plaza Hotel   3.51%   25,000  878 (2) 10/25/26
Pismo Beach Premium Outlets   3.33%   34,590 (20)  1,953 09/06/26
Plaza Carolina   2.86%   (1)  225,000  6,441 (2) 07/27/21
Pleasant Prairie Premium Outlets   4.00%   145,000  5,793 (2) 09/01/27
Potomac Mills   3.46%   416,000 14,383 (2) 11/01/26
Provence Designer Outlet   1.60%   (33)  91,855 (30)  1,470 (2) 07/27/22(3)
Puerto Rico Premium Outlets   2.86%   (1)  160,000  4,580 (2) 07/26/21
Queenstown Premium Outlets   3.33%   60,767 (20)  3,430 09/06/26
Roermond Designer Outlet   1.78%   257,958 (30)  4,586 (2) 12/18/21
Roosendaal Designer Outlets   1.75%   (24)  65,447 (30)  2,862 02/25/24(3)
Shops at Chestnut Hill, The   4.69%   120,000  5,624 (2) 11/01/23
Shops at Riverside, The   3.37%   130,000  4,382 (2) 02/01/23
Southdale Center   3.84%   141,377  8,713 04/01/23
Southridge Mall   3.85%   114,458  7,036 06/06/23
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
44Interest Face Annual Debt Maturity 
Property Name Rate Amount Service (1) Date 
Summit Mall   3.31%   85,000  2,817 (2) 10/01/26
The Crossings Premium Outlets   3.41%   105,802  6,131 12/01/22
Town Center at Cobb   4.76%   181,632 12,530 05/01/22
University Park Village   3.85%   55,000  2,118 (2) 05/01/28
White Oaks Mall   4.51%   (28)  47,548  3,509 06/01/23(3)
Williamsburg Premium Outlets   4.23%   185,000  7,824 (2) 02/06/26
Wolfchase Galleria  4.15%   156,170  9,620 11/01/26
Total Consolidated Secured Indebtedness $ 6,920,866
Unsecured Indebtedness:
Simon Property Group, L.P.  
Global Commercial Paper - Euro   (0.38)%  $  269,175 $ (1,023) (2) 01/17/20
Global Commercial Paper - USD   1.72%   (16)  1,057,875  18,195 (2) 03/06/20
Credit Facility - USD   2.54%   (15)  125,000   3,175 (2) 06/30/22(3)
Unsecured Notes - 22C   6.75%   600,000  40,500 (14)02/01/40
Unsecured Notes - 25C   4.75%   550,000  26,125 (14)03/15/42
Unsecured Notes - 26B   2.75%   500,000  13,750 (14)02/01/23
Unsecured Notes - 27B   3.75%   600,000  22,500 (14)02/01/24
Unsecured Notes - 28A   3.38%   900,000 30,375 (14)10/01/24
Unsecured Notes - 28B   4.25%   400,000 17,000 (14)10/01/44
Unsecured Notes - 29A   2.50%   500,000  12,500 (14)09/01/20
Unsecured Notes - 29B   3.50%   600,000  21,000 (14)09/01/25
Unsecured Notes - 30A   2.50%   550,000  13,750 (14)07/15/21
Unsecured Notes - 30B   3.30%   800,000  26,400 (14)01/15/26
Unsecured Notes - 31A   2.35%   550,000  12,925 (14)01/30/22
Unsecured Notes - 31B   3.25%   750,000  24,375 (14)11/30/26
Unsecured Notes - 31C   4.25%   550,000  23,375 (14)11/30/46
Unsecured Notes - 32A   2.63%   600,000  15,750 (14)06/15/22
Unsecured Notes - 32B   3.38%   750,000  25,313 (14)06/15/27
Unsecured Notes - 33A   2.75%   600,000  16,500 (14)06/01/23
Unsecured Notes - 33B   3.38%   750,000  25,313 (14)12/01/27
Unsecured Notes - 34A   2.00%   1,000,000  20,000 (14)09/13/24
Unsecured Notes - 34B   2.45%   1,250,000  30,625 (14)09/13/29
Unsecured Notes - 34C   3.25%   1,250,000  40,625 (14)09/13/49
Unsecured Notes - Euro 1   2.38%   420,587 (8)   9,989 (6) 10/02/20
Unsecured Notes - Euro 2   1.38%   841,172 (13) 11,566 (6) 11/18/22
Unsecured Notes - Euro 3  1.25%   560,781 (10)  7,010 (6) 05/13/25
Total Consolidated Unsecured Indebtedness $ 17,324,590
Total Consolidated Indebtedness at Face Amounts $ 24,245,456
Premium on Indebtedness   6,775
Discount on Indebtedness   (54,976)
Debt Issuance Costs   (101,280)
Other Debt Obligations   67,255 (35)
Total Consolidated Indebtedness $ 24,163,230
Our Share of Consolidated Indebtedness $ 23,988,186
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
45Interest Face Annual Debt Maturity 
Property Name Rate Amount Service (1) Date 
Joint Venture Indebtedness:
Secured Indebtedness:  
Ami Premium Outlets   1.75%  $  41,219 (26)$ 8,611 09/25/23
Arundel Mills   4.29%    383,500  16,444 (2) 02/06/24
Ashford Designer Outlet   3.06%   (27)  125,007 (21)  3,830 (2) 02/22/22
Auburn Mall   6.02%    36,253   3,027 09/01/20
Aventura Mall   4.12%    1,750,000  72,122 (2) 07/01/28
Avenues, The   3.60%    110,000   3,960 (2) 02/06/23
Bangkok Premium Outlets   3.95%    47,573 (11)  1,879 (2) 06/05/31
Briarwood Mall   3.29%    165,000   5,432 (2) 09/01/26
Busan Premium Outlets   3.24%    95,632 (17)  3,100 (2) 03/13/22
Cape Cod Mall  5.75%   86,725  7,003 03/06/21
Charlotte Premium Outlets   4.27%    100,000   4,270 (2) 07/01/28
Circle Centre   4.51%   (1)   64,000   4,278 12/06/24
Clarksburg Premium Outlets   3.95%    160,000   6,320 (2) 01/01/28
Coconut Point   3.95%    186,178  10,823 10/01/26
Colorado Mills - 1   4.28%    131,303   8,059 11/01/24
Colorado Mills - 2   5.04%    25,595   1,811 07/01/21
Concord Mills   3.84%    235,000   9,015 (2) 11/01/22
Crystal Mall   4.46%    85,964   5,749 06/06/22
Dadeland Mall   4.50%    401,123  27,361 12/05/21
Del Amo Fashion Center   3.66%    585,000  21,396 (2) 06/01/27
Domain Westin   4.12%    64,700   4,069 09/01/25
Dover Mall   5.57%    81,889   6,455 08/06/21
Emerald Square Mall   4.71%    100,359   7,165 08/11/22
Falls, The   3.45%    150,000   5,175 (2) 09/01/26
Fashion Centre Pentagon Office   5.11%    40,000   2,043 (2) 07/01/21
Fashion Centre Pentagon Retail   4.87%    410,000  19,957 (2) 07/01/21
Fashion Valley   4.30%    421,835  28,208 01/04/21
Florida Mall, The   5.25%    313,702  24,849 09/05/20
Galleria, The   3.55%    1,200,000  42,598 (2) 03/01/25
Genting Highland Premium Outlets   5.27%   (7)   27,803 (9)   1,465 (2) 02/14/24
Gloucester Premium Outlets   3.26%   (1)   86,000   2,806 (2) 03/01/23(3)
Gotemba Premium Outlets  0.30%   64,434  190 10/31/26
Grapevine Mills   3.83%    268,000  10,272 (2) 10/01/24
Hamilton Town Center   4.81%   77,754  5,293 04/01/22
Katy Mills   3.49%   140,000  4,886 (2) 12/06/22
Kobe-Sanda Premium Outlets   0.44%   (12)  30,597 (26)  133 01/31/23
Lehigh Valley Mall   4.06%    192,800  11,536 11/01/27
Liberty Tree Mall   3.41%    30,178   1,866 05/06/23
Malaga Designer Outlet   2.75%   (22)  48,900   1,345 (2) 02/09/23
Mall at Rockingham Park, The   4.04%    262,000  10,585 (2) 06/01/26
Mall at Tuttle Crossing, The   3.56%    116,335   6,789 05/01/23
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
46Interest Face Annual Debt Maturity 
Property Name Rate Amount Service (1) Date 
Mall of New Hampshire, The   4.11%    150,000   6,162 (2) 07/01/25
Meadowood Mall   5.82%    110,119   8,818 11/06/21
Miami International Mall   4.42%    160,000   7,072 (2) 02/06/24
Northshore Mall   3.30%    236,627  14,453 07/05/23
Ochtrup Designer Outlet   2.49%   (27)  43,079 (30)  2,620 06/30/21
Ontario Mills   4.25%    296,997  20,661 03/05/22
Paju Premium Outlets   3.40%    67,938 (17)  2,308 07/13/23
Premium Outlet Collection Edmonton IA   3.38%   (4)  101,713 (5)  3,435 (2) 11/10/21(3)
Premium Outlets Montréal   3.08%    92,188 (5)  2,840 (2) 06/01/24
Quaker Bridge Mall   4.50%    180,000   8,100 (2) 05/01/26
Querétaro Premium Outlets - Fixed   10.53%   (23)  23,797 (32)  2,440 (3) 12/20/33
Querétaro Premium Outlets - Variable   10.31%    7,404 (32)  763 (2) 12/20/21
Rinku Premium Outlets  0.33%   (12)  9,205 (26)  30 (2) 07/31/22
Roermond 4 Designer Outlet   1.30%   (34)  188,422 (30)  2,449 (2) 08/17/25
Roosevelt Field Hotel   4.86%   (1)  22,827   1,110 (2) 01/12/23
Sano Premium Outlets   0.28%    41,882 (26)  118 (2) 02/28/25
Sawgrass Mills Hotel   4.71%    328   15 (2) 06/07/24(3)
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 1   0.31%   (12)  25,774 (26)  80 (2) 05/31/23
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 2   0.35%    46,024 (26)  161 (2) 05/29/22
Shisui Premium Outlets Phase 3   0.31%   (12)  23,933 (26)  75 (2) 11/30/23
Shops at Clearfork, The   3.51%   (1)  179,991   6,322 (2) 03/18/21(3)
Shops at Crystals, The   3.74%    550,000  20,592 (2) 07/01/26
Shops at Mission Viejo, The   3.61%    295,000  10,650 (2) 02/01/23
Siheung Premium Outlets   3.28%    129,817 (17)  4,258 (2) 03/15/23
Silver Sands Premium Outlets   3.93%    100,000   3,930 (2) 06/01/22
Smith Haven Mall   2.96%   (1)  180,000   5,333 (2) 05/29/20
Solomon Pond Mall   4.01%    94,954   6,309 11/01/22
Southdale Hotel   3.76%    17,000   640 (2) 06/01/22
Southdale Residential   4.46%    38,760   2,530 10/15/35
Springfield Mall   4.45%    60,452   3,928 10/06/25
Square One Mall   5.47%    87,692   6,793 01/06/22
St. Johns Town Center   3.82%    350,000  13,367 (2) 09/11/24
St. Louis Premium Outlets   4.06%    94,740   3,847 (2) 10/06/24
Stoneridge Shopping Center   3.50%    330,000  11,550 (2) 09/05/26
Tanger Outlets Columbus   3.41%   (1)  85,000   2,901 (2) 11/28/21(3)
Tanger Outlets - Galveston/Houston   3.41%   (1)  80,000   2,730 (2) 07/01/22
Toki Premium Outlets - Fixed   0.35%    27,362 (26)  94 (2) 11/30/24
Toki Premium Outlets - Variable   0.30%   (12)  5,981 (26)  18 (2) 05/31/20
Toronto Premium Outlets   3.11%    130,600 (5)  4,056 (2) 06/01/22
Toronto Premium Outlets II   3.28%   (4)  87,579 (5)  2,870 (2) 05/24/22(3)
Tosu Premium Outlets   0.18%   (12)  67,656 (26)  122 (2) 10/31/26
Twin Cities Premium Outlets   4.32%    115,000   4,968 (2) 11/06/24
Vancouver Designer Outlet   3.63%   (4)  111,048 (5)  4,028 (2) 06/19/21(3)
West Midlands Designer Outlets  4.44%    34,151   1,517 02/27/23
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
47Interest Face Annual Debt Maturity 
Property Name Rate Amount Service (1) Date 
West Town Mall  4.37%    210,000   9,177 (2) 07/01/22
Westchester, The  6.00%    317,163  26,980 05/05/20
Woodfield Mall  4.50%    405,378  25,841 03/05/24
Yeoju Premium Outlets  3.45%    71,832 (17)  2,478 (2) 09/28/21
Total Joint Venture Secured Indebtedness at Face Value  15,027,772
TMLP Indebtedness at Face Value   399,842 (29)
Total Joint Venture and TMLP Indebtedness at Face Value   15,427,614 
Debt Issuance Costs   (35,833)
Total Joint Venture Indebtedness $ 15,391,781 
Our Share of Joint Venture Indebtedness $ 7,214,181 (31)
(1)Variable rate loans based on one-month (1M) LIBOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 77.5 bps to 310 bps.  1M LIBOR as of
December 31, 2019 was 1.76%. Requires monthly payment of interest only.
(2)Requires monthly payment of interest only.
(3)Includes applicable extension available at the Applicable Borrower's option.
(4)Variable rate loans based on 1M CDOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 120 bps to 155 bps.  1M CDOR at December 31,
2019 was 2.08%.
(5)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  CAD equivalent is 681.0 million.
(6)Requires annual payment of interest only.
(7)Variable rate loans based on Cost of Fund plus interest rate spreads ranging from 150 bps of 175 bps. Cost of Fund as of
December 31, 2019 was 3.52%.
(8)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 375.0 million.
(9)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Ringgit equivalent is 113.6 million.
(10)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 500.0 million.
(11)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Baht equivalent is 1.4 billion.
(12)Variable rate loans based on six-month (6M) TIBOR plus interest rate spreads ranging from 17.5 bps to 35 bps.  As of December
31, 2019, 6M TIBOR was 0.13%.
(13)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 750.0 million.
(14)Requires semi-annual payments of interest only.
(15)$4.0 Billion Credit Facility.  As of December 31, 2019, the Credit Facility - USD Currency bears interest at 1M LIBOR + 77.5 bps, the
Credit Facility - Yen Currency bears interest  at 1M Yen LIBOR + 77.5 bps and the Credit Facility - Euro Currency bears interest at
1M EURO LIBOR + 77.5 bps.  The Credit Facilities provide for different pricing based upon our investment grade rating.  No
borrowings under the $3.5 Billion Supplemental Facility were outstanding at December 31, 2019.  As of December 31, 2019, $6.0
billion was available after outstanding borrowings and letters of credit under our Credit Facilities.
(16)Reflects the weighted average maturity date and weighted average interest rate of all outstanding tranches of commercial paper at
December 31, 2019.
(17)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Won equivalent is 422.0 billion.
(18)The mortgage on Oxford Valley is also secured by Lincoln Plaza.
(19)Loans secured by these three properties are cross-collateralized and cross-defaulted.
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
48(20)Loans secured by these two properties are cross-collateralized and cross-defaulted.
(21)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  GBP equivalent is 94.8 million.
(22)Variable rate loan based on three-month (3M) EURIBOR, which is subject to a floor of 0.00%, plus an interest rate spread of 275
bps.
(23)Associated with this loan is an interest rate swap agreement that effectively fixes the interest rate on a portion of this loan at the all-
in rate presented.
(24)Variable rate loan based on 1M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 185 bps.  Through an interest rate floor agreement, 1M
EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%.
(25)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 225 bps.  Through an interest rate floor agreement, 3M
EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%.
(26)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Yen equivalent is 41.7 billion
(27)Associated with this loan is an interest rate swap agreement that effectively fixes the interest rate on this loan at the all-in rate
presented.
(28)Variable rate loan based on 1M LIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 275 bps.  In addition, 1M LIBOR is capped at 5.00%.
(29)Consists of two properties with interest rates ranging from 5.65% to 7.32% and maturities between 2021 and 2024.
(30)Amount shown in USD equivalent.  Euro equivalent is 1.2 billion.
(31)Our share of total indebtedness includes a pro rata share of the mortgage debt on joint venture properties, including properties
owned by TMLP.  To the extent total indebtedness is secured by a property, it is non-recourse to us, with the exception of
approximately $214.8 million of payment guarantees provided by the Operating Partnership (of which $10.8 million is recoverable
from our venture partner under the partnership agreement).
(32)Amount shown in USD equivalent. Peso equivalent is 590.0 million.
(33)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 250 bps. Through an interest rate floor agreement, 3M
EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%. In addition, 3M EURIBOR is capped at 1.00%.
(34)Variable rate loan based on 3M EURIBOR plus an interest rate spread of 130 bps. Through an interest rate floor agreement, 3M
EURIBOR is currently fixed at 0.00%. Also, 3M EURIBOR is capped at 1.30%.
(35)City of Sunrise Bond Liability (Sawgrass Mills)
Table of Contents
Mortgage and Unsecured Debt
As of December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
49The changes in consolidated mortgages and unsecured indebtedness for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and
2017 are as follows:
    2019     2018     2017  
Balance, Beginning of Year $ 23,305,535 $ 24,632,463 $ 22,977,104
Additions during period:
New Loan Originations   13,355,809   7,980,569   11,764,046
Loans assumed in acquisitions and consolidation   21,001   215,000   42,266
Net (Discount)/Premium   (16,903)   301   (11,636)
Net Debt Issuance Costs  (23,505)  (6,885)  (34,606)
Deductions during period:
Loan Retirements   (12,366,951)   (9,340,861)   (10,466,033)
Amortization of Net Discounts/(Premiums)   (758)   1,618   1,357
Debt Issuance Cost Amortization  18,400  21,445  21,709
Scheduled Principal Amortization   (58,419)   (54,624)   (46,232)
Foreign Currency Translation  (70,979)  (143,490)  384,488
Balance, Close of Year $ 24,163,230 $ 23,305,535 $ 24,632,463
Table of Contents
50Item 3.  Legal Proceedings
We are involved from time-to-time in various legal and regulatory proceedings that arise in the ordinary course of our
business, including, but not limited to, commercial disputes, environmental matters, and litigation in connection with transactions
such as acquisitions and divestitures. We believe that our current proceedings will not have a material adverse effect on our
financial condition, liquidity or results of operations. We record a liability when a loss is considered probable, and the amount can
be reasonably estimated.
Item 4.  Mine Safety Disclosures
Not applicable.
Table of Contents
51Part II
Item 5.  Market for the Registrant’s Common Equity, Related Stockholder Matters, and Issuer Purchases of Equity
Securities
Simon
Market Information
Simon’s common stock trades on the New York Stock Exchange under the symbol “SPG”.
Holders
The number of holders of record of common stock outstanding was 1,068 as of February 14, 2020. The Class B common
stock is subject to two voting trusts as to which Herbert Simon and David Simon are the trustees. Shares of Class B common
stock convert automatically into an equal number of shares of common stock upon the occurrence of certain events and can be
converted into shares of common stock at the option of the holders.
Dividends
We must pay a minimum amount of dividends to maintain Simon’s status as a REIT. Simon’s future dividends and future
distributions of the Operating Partnership will be determined by Simon’s Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, based on actual
and projected financial condition, liquidity and results of operations, cash available for dividends and limited partner distributions,
cash reserves as deemed necessary for capital and operating expenditures, financing covenants, if any, and the amount
required to maintain Simon’s status as a REIT.
Common stock cash dividends during 2019 aggregated $8.30 per share. Common stock cash dividends during 2018
aggregated $7.90 per share. In the first quarter of 2020, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $2.10
per share of common stock payable on February 28, 2020 to stockholders of record on February 14, 2020.
We offer a dividend reinvestment plan that allows Simon’s stockholders to acquire additional shares by automatically
reinvesting cash dividends. Shares are acquired pursuant to the plan at a price equal to the prevailing market price of such
shares, without payment of any brokerage commission or service charge.
Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
None.
Issuances Under Equity Compensation Plans
For information regarding the securities authorized for issuance under our equity compensation plans, see Item 12 of this
Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
None.
The Operating Partnership
Market Information
There is no established trading market for units or preferred units.  
Holders
The number of holders of record of units was 242 as of February 14, 2020.
Distributions
The Operating Partnership makes distributions on its units in amounts sufficient to maintain Simon's qualification as a
REIT. Simon is required each year to distribute to its stockholders at least 90% of its REIT taxable income after certain
Table of Contents
52adjustments. Future distributions will be determined by Simon’s Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, based on actual and
projected financial condition, liquidity and results of operations, cash available for distributions, cash reserves as deemed
necessary for capital and operating expenditures, financing covenants, if any, and the distributions that may be required to
maintain Simon's status as a REIT.
Distributions during 2019 aggregated $8.30 per unit.  Distributions during 2018 aggregated $7.90 per unit.  In the first
quarter of 2020, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $2.10 per share.  The distribution rate on the
Operating Partnership’s units is equal to the dividend rate on Simon’s common stock.
Unregistered Sales of Equity Securities
None.
Issuer Purchases of Equity Securities
During the year ended December 31, 2019 the Operating Partnership redeemed 43,255 units from nine limited partners
for $6.8 million in cash.
Table of Contents
53Item 6.  Selected Financial Data
The following tables set forth selected financial data. The selected financial data should be read in conjunction with the
financial statements and notes thereto and with Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
Operations. Other data we believe is important in understanding trends in our business is also included in the tables.
As of or for the Year Ended December 31
   2019 (1)   2018    2017 (2)   2016 (3)   2015 (4)
(in thousands, except per share data)
OPERATING DATA:
Total consolidated revenue (5) $ 5,755,189$ 5,645,288$ 5,527,336$ 5,427,910$ 5,259,468
Consolidated net income   2,423,188  2,822,343  2,244,903  2,134,706  2,139,375
Net income attributable to common stockholders -
SPG Inc.  2,098,247  2,436,721  1,944,625  1,835,559  1,824,383
Net income attributable to unitholders - SPG L.P.  2,416,945  2,805,764  2,239,638  2,122,236  2,131,139
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER
SHARE/UNIT:
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Net income attributable to common stockholders $  6.81$  7.87$  6.24$  5.87$  5.88
Basic weighted average shares outstanding   307,950  309,627  311,517  312,691  310,103
Diluted weighted average shares outstanding   307,950  309,627  311,517  312,691  310,103
Dividends per share (6) $  8.30$  7.90$  7.15$  6.50$  6.05
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Net income attributable to unitholders $  6.81$  7.87$  6.24$  5.87$  5.88
Basic weighted average units outstanding   354,724  356,520  358,777  361,527  362,244
Diluted weighted average units outstanding   354,724  356,520  358,777  361,527  362,244
Distributions per unit (6) $  8.30$  7.90$  7.15$  6.50$  6.05
BALANCE SHEET DATA:
Cash and cash equivalents $  669,373$  514,335$ 1,482,309$  560,059$  701,134
Total assets (7)   31,231,630  30,686,223  32,257,638  31,103,578  30,565,182
Mortgages and other indebtedness   24,163,230  23,305,535  24,632,463  22,977,104  22,416,682
Total equity   2,911,250  3,796,956  4,238,764  4,959,912  5,216,369
OTHER DATA:
Cash flow provided by (used in):
Operating activities $ 3,807,831$ 3,750,796$ 3,593,788$ 3,372,694$ 3,024,685
Investing activities   (1,076,707)  (236,506)  (761,467)  (969,026)  (1,462,720)
Financing activities   (2,576,086)  (4,482,264)  (1,910,071)  (2,544,743)  (1,473,113)
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Funds from Operations (FFO) (8) $ 4,272,271$ 4,324,601$ 4,020,505$ 3,792,951$ 3,571,237
Dilutive FFO allocable to common stockholders $ 3,708,929$ 3,755,784$ 3,490,910$ 3,280,590$ 3,057,193
Diluted FFO per share $  12.04$  12.13$  11.21$  10.49$  9.86
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Funds from Operations (FFO) (8) $ 4,272,271$ 4,324,601$ 4,020,505$ 3,792,951$ 3,571,237
(1)During the year ended December 31, 2019, we recorded a $116.3 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated with the early
redemption of a series of senior unsecured notes, reducing diluted earnings per share/unit and diluted FFO per share by $0.33.
(2)During the year ended December 31, 2017, we recorded a $128.6 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated with the early
redemption of a series of senior unsecured notes, reducing diluted earnings per share/unit and diluted FFO per share by $0.36.
(3)During the year ended December 31, 2016, we recorded a $136.8 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated with the early
redemption of a series of unsecured senior notes, reducing diluted earnings per share/unit and diluted FFO per share by $0.38.
Table of Contents
54(4)During the year ended December 31, 2015, we recorded a $121.0 million loss on extinguishment of debt associated with the early
redemption of two series of unsecured senior notes, reducing diluted earnings per share/unit and diluted FFO per share by $0.33.
 We also recorded a gain on sale of marketable securities of $80.2 million, increasing diluted earnings per share/unit and diluted
FFO per share by $0.22.
(5)Total consolidated revenue for the years ended December 31, 2018, 2017, 2016, and 2015 has been reclassified to conform to the
current year presentation.
(6)Represents dividends per share of Simon common stock/distributions per unit of Operating Partnership units declared per period.
(7)On January 1, 2019, we recognized a right of use asset and corresponding lease liability of $524.0 million as a result of the
adoption of ASU 2016-02.
(8)FFO is a non-GAAP financial measure that we believe provides useful information to investors. Please refer to Management’s
Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations for a definition and reconciliation of FFO to consolidated
net income and, for Simon, FFO per share to net income per share.
Table of Contents
55Item 7.  Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations
The following discussion should be read in conjunction with the consolidated financial statements and notes thereto that
are included in this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
Overview
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and self-managed real estate
investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the Internal Revenue Code. REITs will
generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they distribute not less than 100% of their REIT
taxable income. Simon Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned Delaware partnership subsidiary that owns all of our real
estate properties and other assets. In this discussion, unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to
"Simon" mean Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the "Operating Partnership" mean Simon Property Group, L.P.
 References to "we," "us" and "our" mean collectively Simon, the Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or
controlled by Simon and/or the Operating Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's partnership agreement, the
Operating Partnership is required to pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use destinations, which consist
primarily of malls, Premium Outlets®, and The Mills®. As of December 31, 2019, we owned or held an interest in 204 income-
producing properties in the United States, which consisted of 106 malls, 69 Premium Outlets, 14 Mills, four lifestyle centers, and
11 other retail properties in 37 states and Puerto Rico. In addition, we have redevelopment and expansion projects, including the
addition of anchors, big box tenants, and restaurants, underway at several properties in the United States, Canada, Europe and
Asia. Internationally, as of December 31, 2019, we had ownership in 29 Premium Outlets and Designer Outlet properties
primarily located in Asia, Europe, and Canada. We also have four international outlet properties under development. As of
December 31, 2019, we also owned a 22.2% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate
company, which owns, or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 15 countries in Europe.
We generate the majority of our lease income from retail, dining, entertainment, and other tenants including consideration
received from:
●fixed minimum lease consideration and fixed common area maintenance (CAM) reimbursements, and
●variable lease consideration primarily based on tenants’ sales, as well as reimbursements for real estate taxes,
utilities, marketing and certain other items.
Revenues of our management company, after intercompany eliminations, consist primarily of management fees that are
typically based upon the revenues of the property being managed.
We invest in real estate properties to maximize total financial return which includes both operating cash flows and capital
appreciation. We seek growth in earnings, funds from operations, or FFO, and cash flows by enhancing the profitability and
operation of our properties and investments. We seek to accomplish this growth through the following:
●attracting and retaining high quality tenants and utilizing economies of scale to reduce operating expenses,
●expanding and re-tenanting existing highly productive locations at competitive rental rates,
●selectively acquiring or increasing our interests in high quality real estate assets or portfolios of assets,
●generating consumer traffic in our retail properties through marketing initiatives and strategic corporate alliances, and
●selling selective non-core assets.
We also grow by generating supplemental revenues from the following activities:
●establishing our malls as leading market resource providers for retailers and other businesses and consumer-focused
corporate alliances, including payment systems (such as handling fees relating to the sales of bank-issued prepaid
cards), national marketing alliances, static and digital media initiatives, business development, sponsorship, and
events,
●offering property operating services to our tenants and others, including waste handling and facility services, and the
provision of energy services,
Table of Contents
56●selling or leasing land adjacent to our properties, commonly referred to as “outlots” or “outparcels,” and
●generating interest income on cash deposits and investments in loans, including those made to related entities.
We focus on high quality real estate across the retail real estate spectrum. We expand or redevelop properties to
enhance profitability and market share of existing assets when we believe the investment of our capital meets our risk-reward
criteria. We selectively develop new properties in markets we believe are not adequately served by existing retail outlet
properties.
We routinely review and evaluate acquisition opportunities based on their ability to enhance our portfolio. Our
international strategy includes partnering with established real estate companies and financing international investments with
local currency to minimize foreign exchange risk.
To support our growth, we employ a three-fold capital strategy:
●provide the capital necessary to fund growth,
●maintain sufficient flexibility to access capital in many forms, both public and private, and
●manage our overall financial structure in a fashion that preserves our investment grade credit ratings.
We consider FFO, net operating income, or NOI, portfolio NOI and comparable property NOI (NOI for properties owned
and operated in both periods under comparison) to be key measures of operating performance that are not specifically defined
by accounting principles generally accepted in the United States, or GAAP. We use these measures internally to evaluate the
operating performance of our portfolio and provide a basis for comparison with other real estate companies. Reconciliations of
these measures to the most comparable GAAP measure are included below in this discussion.
Results Overview
Diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per unit decreased $1.06 during 2019 to $6.81 as compared to $7.87 in
2018. The decrease in diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per unit was primarily attributable to:
●2018 net gains primarily related to disposition activity of $288.8 million, or $0.81 per diluted share/unit, which were
higher than 2019 net gains of $14.9 million, or $0.04 per diluted share/unit,
●a non-cash investment gain of $35.6 million, or $0.10 per diluted share/unit, in 2018,
●decreased consolidated lease settlement activity in 2019 of $26.7 million, or $0.08 per diluted share/unit,
●decreased income related to distributions from an international investment in 2018 of $23.9 million, or $0.07 per
diluted share/unit,
●a charge on early extinguishment of debt of $116.3 million, or $0.33 per diluted share/unit, in 2019, and
●an increase in depreciation and amortization of $76.9 million, or $0.22 per diluted share/unit, in 2019, from our
consolidated properties and our share of depreciation and amortization from equity method investments, principally
related to the acceleration of depreciation on a property upon initiation of a major redevelopment, partially offset by,
●improved operating performance and solid core business fundamentals in 2019 and the impact of our acquisition,
development and expansion activity,
●a lawsuit settled with our former insurance broker in 2019 related to the significant flood damage sustained at Opry
Mills in May 2010 of $68.0 million, or $0.19 per diluted share/unit,
●a gain in 2019 related to the disposition of our interest in a multi-family residential investment of $16.2 million, or $0.05
per diluted share/unit,
●our share of an early repayment charge and write-off of deferred debt issuance costs in 2018 related to refinancing at
Aventura Mall, of $12.5 million, or $0.03 per diluted share/unit, and
●decreased interest expense in 2019 of $26.6 million, or $0.07 per diluted share/unit.
Table of Contents
57Solid core business fundamentals during 2019 were primarily driven by strong leasing activity. Portfolio NOI grew by 1.4%
in 2019 as compared to 2018. Comparable property NOI grew 1.4% for our portfolio of U.S. Malls, Premium Outlets, and The
Mills. Total reported sales per square foot, or psf, increased 4.8% to $693 psf at December 31, 2019 from $661 psf at December
31, 2018 for our U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets. Average base minimum rent for U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets increased
0.8% to $54.59 psf as of December 31, 2019, from $54.18 psf as of December 31, 2018. Leasing spreads in our U.S. Malls and
Premium Outlets were positive as we were able to lease available square feet at higher rents, resulting in an open/close leasing
spread (based on total tenant payments — base minimum rent plus common area maintenance) of $7.83 psf ($62.39 openings
compared to $54.56 closings) as of December 31, 2019, representing a 14.4% increase. Ending occupancy for our U.S. Malls
and Premium Outlets decreased 0.8% to 95.1% as of December 31, 2019, from 95.9% as of December 31, 2018.
Our effective overall borrowing rate at December 31, 2019 on our consolidated indebtedness decreased 19 basis points
to 3.16% as compared to 3.35% at December 31, 2018. This decrease was primarily due to a decrease in the effective overall
borrowing rate on variable rate debt of 56 basis points (2.61% at December 31, 2019 as compared to 3.17% at December 31,
2018) partially offset by an increase in the effective overall borrowing rate on fixed rate debt of nine basis points (3.46% at
December 31, 2019 as compared to 3.37% at December 31, 2018).  The weighted average years to maturity of our consolidated
indebtedness was 7.4 years and 6.4 years at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Our financing activity for the year ended December 31, 2019 included:
●Increasing our borrowings under the Operating Partnership’s global unsecured commercial paper note program, or the
Commercial Paper program, by $568.4 million.
●Repaying at maturity $600.0 million of senior unsecured notes with a fixed interest rate of 2.20% on February 1, 2019.
●Completing the issuance, on September 13, 2019, of $1.0 billion of senior unsecured notes at a fixed annual interest
rate of 2.00% with a maturity date of September 13, 2024, $1.25 billion of senior unsecured notes at a fixed annual
interest rate of 2.45% with a maturity date of September 13, 2029, and $1.25 billion of senior unsecured notes at a
fixed annual interest rate of 3.25% with a maturity date of September 13, 2049.
●Completing, on October 7, 2019, the early redemption of The Operating Partnership’s $900 million 4.375% notes due
March 1, 2021, $700 million 4.125% notes due December 1, 2021, $600 million 3.375% notes due March 15, 2022,
and €375 million of the €750 million 2.375% notes due October 2, 2020. We recorded a $116.3 million loss on
extinguishment of debt as a result of the early redemption.
United States Portfolio Data
The portfolio data discussed in this overview includes the following key operating statistics: ending occupancy, average
base minimum rent per square foot, and total sales per square foot for our domestic assets. We include acquired properties in
this data beginning in the year of acquisition and remove disposed properties in the year of disposition. For comparative
information purposes, we separate the information related to The Mills from our other U.S. operations. We also do not include
any information for properties located outside the United States.
Table of Contents
58The following table sets forth these key operating statistics for the combined U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets:
●properties that are consolidated in our consolidated financial statements,
●properties we account for under the equity method of accounting as joint ventures, and
●the foregoing two categories of properties on a total portfolio basis.
%/Basis Point %/Basis Point  
    2019 Change (1) 2018 Change (1) 2017 
U.S. Malls and Premium Outlets:
Ending Occupancy
Consolidated  95.3 %  -60bps  95.9 %  10 bps  95.8 %
Unconsolidated  94.5 %  -130bps  95.8 %  70 bps  95.1 %
Total Portfolio  95.1 %  -80bps  95.9 %  30 bps  95.6 %
Average Base Minimum Rent per Square
Foot
Consolidated $ 53.06  1.0%  $ 52.51  2.3%  $ 51.34
Unconsolidated $ 58.71  0.2%  $ 58.59  1.2%  $ 57.88
Total Portfolio $ 54.59  0.8%  $ 54.18  2.0%  $ 53.11
Total Reported Sales per Square Foot
Consolidated $ 662  3.2%  $ 641  4.6%  $ 613
Unconsolidated $ 783  9.0%  $ 719  7.2%  $ 671
Total Portfolio $ 693  4.8%  $ 661  5.3%  $ 628
The Mills:
Ending Occupancy   97.0 %  -60 bps   97.6 %  -80bps   98.4 %
Average Base Minimum Rent per Square
Foot $ 33.09  1.4%  $ 32.63  5.3%  $ 30.98
Total Sales per Square Foot $ 620  1.0%  $ 614  4.6%  $ 587
(1)Percentages may not recalculate due to rounding. Percentage and basis point changes are representative of the change from the
comparable prior period.
Ending Occupancy Levels and Average Base Minimum Rent per Square Foot.  Ending occupancy is the percentage
of gross leasable area, or GLA, which is leased as of the last day of the reporting period. We include all company owned space
except for mall anchors, mall majors, mall freestanding and mall outlots in the calculation. Base minimum rent per square foot is
the average base minimum rent charge in effect for the reporting period for all tenants that would qualify to be included in ending
occupancy.
Total Reported Sales per Square Foot.  Total sales include total reported retail tenant sales on a trailing 12-month basis
at owned GLA (for mall stores with less than 10,000 square feet) in the malls and The Mills and stores with less than 20,000
square feet in the Premium Outlets. Retail sales at owned GLA affect revenue and profitability levels because sales determine
the amount of minimum rent that can be charged, the percentage rent realized, and the recoverable expenses (common area
maintenance, real estate taxes, etc.) that tenants can afford to pay.
Current Leasing Activities
During 2019, we signed 990 new leases and 1,281 renewal leases (excluding mall anchors and majors, new
development, redevelopment and leases with terms of one year or less) with a fixed minimum rent across our U.S. Malls and
Premium Outlets portfolio, comprising approximately 7.6 million square feet, of which 5.7 million square feet related to
consolidated properties. During 2018, we signed 900 new leases and 1,183 renewal leases with a fixed minimum rent,
comprising approximately 7.1 million square feet, of which 5.3 million square feet related to consolidated properties. The
average annual initial base minimum rent for new leases was $56.80 per square foot in 2019 and $57.29 per square foot in 2018
with an average tenant allowance on new leases of $47.57 per square foot and $54.21 per square foot, respectively.
Table of Contents
59Japan Data
The following are selected key operating statistics for our Premium Outlets in Japan. The information used to prepare
these statistics has been supplied by the managing venture partner.
    December 31,     %/basis point    December 31,     %/basis point    December 31,  
2019 Change 2018 Change 2017  
Ending Occupancy  99.5 -20 bps  99.7 -20 bps  99.9
Total Sales per Square Foot ¥ 107,866  0.56 ¥ 107,265 2.02 ¥ 105,138
Average Base Minimum Rent per
Square Foot ¥ 5,269  2.19 ¥ 5,156  1.86 ¥ 5,062
Critical Accounting Policies
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, or GAAP,
requires management to use judgment in the application of accounting policies, including making estimates and assumptions.
We base our estimates on historical experience and on various other assumptions believed to be reasonable under the
circumstances. These judgments affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and
liabilities at the dates of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reporting
periods. If our judgment or interpretation of the facts and circumstances relating to various transactions had been different, it is
possible that different accounting policies would have been applied resulting in a different presentation of our financial
statements. From time to time, we reevaluate our estimates and assumptions. In the event estimates or assumptions prove to be
different from actual results, adjustments are made in subsequent periods to reflect more current information. Below is a
discussion of accounting policies that we consider critical in that they may require complex judgment in their application or
require estimates about matters that are inherently uncertain. For a summary of our significant accounting policies, see Note 3 of
the notes to the consolidated financial statements.
●We, as a lessor, retain substantially all of the risks and benefits of ownership of the investment properties and account
for our leases as operating leases. We accrue fixed lease income on a straight-line basis over the terms of the leases.
Substantially all of our retail tenants are also required to pay overage rents based on sales over a stated base amount
during the lease year. We recognize this variable consideration only when each tenant’s sales exceed the applicable
sales threshold, as well as reimbursements for real estate taxes, utilities, marketing, and certain other items.  We
amortize any tenant inducements as a reduction of revenue utilizing the straight-line method over the term of the
related lease of occupancy term of the tenant, if shorter.
●We review investment properties for impairment on a property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate events or
changes in circumstances which indicate that the carrying value of investment properties may not be recoverable.
These circumstances include, but are not limited to, declines in a property’s cash flows, ending occupancy or total
sales per square foot. We measure any impairment of investment property when the estimated undiscounted operating
income before depreciation and amortization during the anticipated holding period plus its residual value is less than
the carrying value of the property. To the extent impairment has occurred, we charge to income the excess of carrying
value of the property over its estimated fair value. We also review our investments, including investments in
unconsolidated entities, to identify and evaluate whether events or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying
amount of our investments may not be recoverable. We will record an impairment charge if we determine that a
decline in the fair value of the investments is other-than-temporary. Our evaluation of changes in economic or
operating conditions may include developing estimates of forecasted cash flows or operating income before
depreciation and amortization to support the recoverability of the carrying amount of the investment. We estimate
undiscounted cash flows and fair value using observable and unobservable data such as operating income, estimated
capitalization and discount rates, or relevant market multiples, leasing prospects and local market information.
Changes in economic and operating conditions that occur subsequent to our review of recoverability of investment
property and other investments could impact the assumptions used in that assessment and could result in future
charges to earnings if assumptions regarding those investments differ from actual results.
●To maintain Simon’s status as a REIT, we must distribute at least 90% of REIT taxable income in any given year and
meet certain asset and income tests. We monitor our business and transactions that may potentially impact Simon’s
REIT status. In the unlikely event that we fail to maintain Simon’s REIT status, and available relief provisions do not
apply, we would be required to pay U.S. federal income taxes at regular corporate income tax rates during the period
Simon did not qualify as a REIT. If Simon lost its REIT status, it could not elect to be taxed
Table of Contents
60as a REIT for four taxable years following the year during which qualification was lost unless its failure was due to
reasonable cause and certain other conditions were met. As a result, failing to maintain REIT status would result in a
significant increase in the income tax expense recorded and paid during those periods.
●We make estimates as part of our valuation of the purchase price of asset acquisitions (including the components of
excess investment in joint ventures) to the various components of the acquisition based upon the relative fair value of
each component. The most significant components of our valuations are typically the determination of relative fair
value to the buildings as-if-vacant, land and market value of in-place leases. In the case of the fair value of buildings
and fair value of land and other intangibles, our estimates of the values of these components will affect the amount of
depreciation or amortization we record over the estimated useful life of the property acquired or the remaining lease
term. In the case of the market value of in-place leases, we make our best estimates of the tenants’ ability to pay rents
based upon the tenants’ operating performance at the property, including the competitive position of the property in its
market as well as sales psf, rents psf, and overall occupancy cost for the tenants in place at the acquisition date. Our
assumptions affect the amount of future revenue that we will recognize over the remaining lease term for the acquired
in-place leases.
●A variety of costs are incurred in the development of properties. After determination is made to capitalize a cost, it is
allocated to the specific component of a project that is benefited. Determination of when a development project is
substantially complete and capitalization must cease involves judgment. The costs of land and buildings under
development include specifically identifiable costs. The capitalized costs include pre-construction costs essential to the
development of the property, development costs, construction costs, interest costs, real estate taxes, salaries and
related costs and other costs incurred during the period of development. We consider a construction project as
substantially completed and held available for occupancy and cease capitalization of costs upon opening.
Results of Operations
In addition to the activity discussed above in the “Results Overview” section, the following acquisitions, dispositions, and
openings of consolidated properties affected our consolidated results in the comparative periods:
●On September 19, 2019, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to one of our properties from our
joint venture partner.
●During the third quarter of 2019, we disposed of two retail properties.
●On September 27, 2018, we opened Denver Premium Outlets, a 330,000 square foot center in Thornton (Denver),
Colorado. We own a 100% interest in this center.
●On September 25, 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in the previously unconsolidated The Outlets at
Orange in Los Angeles, California from our joint venture partner.
●During 2018, we disposed of two retail properties.
●On April 21, 2017, through our European investee, we acquired Roosendaal Designer Outlet, A 247,500 square foot
center in Roosendaal, Netherlands. We have a 94% interest in this center.
●On April 13, 2017, through our European investee, we opened Provence Designer Outlet, a 269,000 square foot
center in Miramas, France. We have a 90% interest in the new center.
In addition to the activities discussed above and in “Results Overview”, the following acquisitions, dispositions, and
openings of joint venture properties affected our income from unconsolidated entities in the comparative periods:
●On May 22, 2019, we and our partner opened Premium Outlets Querétaro, a 274,800 square foot center in Santiago
de Querétaro, Mexico. We own a 50% interest in this center.
●During the fourth quarter of 2018, our interest in the 41 German department store properties owned through our
investment in HBS Global Properties, or HBS, was sold, as further discussed in Note 6 of the notes to the consolidated
financial statements.
●During 2018, we contributed our interest in the licensing venture of Aéropostale for additional interests in Authentic
Brands Group LLC, or ABG.  Our noncontrolling interest in ABG is 5.4%.
Table of Contents
61●On May 2, 2018, we and our partner opened Premium Outlet Collection Edmonton International Airport, a 424,000
square foot shopping center in Edmonton (Alberta), Canada. We have a 50% noncontrolling interest in this new center.
●During 2017, we disposed of our interest in one retail property.
●On September 14, 2017, we and our partner opened The Shops at Clearfork, a 500,000 square foot center in Fort
Worth, Texas. We have a 45% noncontrolling interest in this new center.
●On June 29, 2017, we and our partner opened Norfolk Premium Outlets, a 332,000 square foot center in Norfolk,
Virginia. We have a 65% noncontrolling interest in this new center.
●On June 15, 2017, we and our partner opened Genting Highlands Premium Outlets in Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia. We
have a 50% noncontrolling interest in this 278,000 square foot center.
●On April 6, 2017, we and our partner opened Siheung Premium Outlets, a 444,400 square foot center in Siheung
(Seoul), South Korea. We have a 50% noncontrolling interest in this new center.
For the purposes of the following comparisons between the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 and the years
ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, the above transactions are referred to as the property transactions. In the following
discussions of our results of operations, “comparable” refers to properties we owned and operated in both years in the year to
year comparisons.
During the third quarter of 2017, two of our wholly-owned properties located in Puerto Rico sustained significant damage
as a result of Hurricane Maria. For purposes of the below comparisons, these properties are also included in the property
transactions due to the fact they were not open for business during the entirety of the periods being compared.
Year Ended December 31, 2019 vs. Year Ended December 31, 2018
Lease income increased $85.4 million during 2019, of which the property transactions accounted for $33.2 million of the
increase.  Comparable lease income increased $52.2 million, or 1.0%, due to increases in fixed minimum lease and CAM
consideration recorded on a straight-line basis, as a result of the adoption of ASC 842.  
Total other income increased $27.9 million, primarily due to a $68.0 million increase related to a lawsuit settled with our
former insurance broker in 2019 related to the significant flood damage sustained at Opry Mills in May 2010, a $16.2 million gain
on the sale of our interest in a multi-family residential property, a $12.4 million increase in interest income, an $11.2 million
increase in Simon Brand Venture and gift card revenues, an increase of $10.4 million in land sales including gains as a result of
land contributions for densification projects at two of our properties, and the impact of consolidated franchise and hotel
revenues, partially offset by a $35.6 million non-cash gain recorded in 2018 associated with our contribution of our interest in the
Aéropostale licensing venture for additional interests in ABG, a $26.7 million decrease in lease settlement income, a
$23.9 million decrease in income related to distributions from an international investment received in 2018 and a $9.5 million
decrease related to business interruption insurance proceeds received in connection with our two Puerto Rico properties as a
result of hurricane damages.
Depreciation and amortization expense increased $58.0 million, of which the property transactions accounted for $11.0
million.  The comparable properties increased $47.0 million primarily as a result of an increase in tenant allowance write-offs in
2019 and the acceleration of depreciation on a property upon initiation of a major redevelopment.
Home and regional office costs increased $53.4 million, primarily due to the suspension of leasing cost capitalization in
2019 as a result of the adoption of a new accounting pronouncement.
General and administrative expense decreased $11.7 million due to lower executive compensation.
Other expense increased $15.8 million primarily related to a $4.9 million unfavorable non-cash mark-to-market on certain
of our non-real estate equity instruments, and the impact of consolidated franchise and hotel operational expenses.
During 2019, we recorded a loss on extinguishment of debt of $116.3 million as a result of the early redemption of senior
unsecured notes.
Income from unconsolidated entities decreased $30.9 million as a result of the sale of German assets within our HBS
joint venture in 2018, and the impact from the consolidation of a property that was previously unconsolidated in the third quarter
of 2018, partially offset by favorable results of operations from our international joint venture investments.
Table of Contents
62During 2019, we recorded net gains of $62.1 million primarily related to Klépierre’s disposition of certain shopping
centers, offset by a $47.2 million impairment charge related to our investment in HBS.  During 2018, we recorded net gains of
$12.5 million related to property insurance recoveries of previously depreciated assets and $276.3 million primarily related to our
disposition of two retail properties, as well as the disposal of our interest in the German department stores owned through our
investment in HBS, as further discussed in Note 6 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements.
Simon’s net income attributable to noncontrolling interests decreased $60.7 million due to a decrease in the net income of
the Operating Partnership.  
Year Ended December 31, 2018 vs. Year Ended December 31, 2017
Lease income increased $49.3 million during 2018, of which the comparable rents increased $58.0 million, or 1.2%,
primarily attributable to an increase in base minimum rents and variable consideration based on tenant sales, offset partially by
an $8.7 million decrease related to the property transactions.    
Total other income increased $73.6 million, primarily due to a $35.6 million increase related to a non-cash gain associated
with our contribution of our interest in the Aéropostale licensing venture for additional interests in ABG, a $21.9 million increase
in income related to distributions from an international investment, a $17.9 million increase related to business interruption
insurance proceeds received in connection with two of our Puerto Rico properties as a result of hurricane damages, a $13.2
million increase in Simon Brand Venture and gift card revenues and a $6.5 million increase in net other revenues, partially offset
by a $21.5 million decrease related to the sale of marketable securities during 2017.
Real estate tax expense increased $17.7 million as a result of higher tax assessments in 2018.
General and administrative expense decreased $5.4 million due to lower executive compensation.
Other expense decreased $37.4 million primarily related to a decrease in legal fees and expenses of $25.1 million and
the write off of pre-development costs and other investments in 2017 of $11.3 million.
During 2017, we recorded a loss on extinguishment of debt of $128.6 million as a result of an early redemption of a series
of senior unsecured notes.
Income and other taxes increased $13.6 million as a result of higher tax expense due to higher net income from improved
performance on our share of results in the retail operations venture of Aéropostale as compared to 2017, and increased
withholding and income taxes related to certain of our international investments.
Income from unconsolidated entities increased $75.0 million primarily due to the stronger operations of the retail
operations venture of Aéropostale and favorable results of operations from our international joint venture investments and our
acquisition and development activity, offset partially by our share of an early repayment charge at one of our joint venture
properties.
During 2018, we recorded net gains of $12.5 million related to property insurance recoveries of previously depreciated
assets and $276.3 million primarily related to our disposition of two retail properties, as well as the disposal of our interest in the
German department stores owned through our investment in HBS, as further discussed in Note 6 of the notes to the
consolidated financial statements.  During 2017, we recorded a $5.0 million gain related to Klépierre’s sale of certain assets,
partially offset by the disposition of our interest in one unconsolidated retail property that resulted in a loss of $1.3 million.
Simon’s net income attributable to noncontrolling interests increased $85.3 million due to an increase in the net income of
the Operating Partnership.  
Liquidity and Capital Resources
Because we own long-lived income-producing assets, our financing strategy relies primarily on long-term fixed rate debt.
Floating rate debt comprised only 3.5% of our total consolidated debt at December 31, 2019. We also enter into interest rate
protection agreements from time to time to manage our interest rate risk. We derive most of our liquidity from positive net cash
flow from operations and distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities that totaled $4.0 billion in the aggregate during
2019. The Operating Partnership has a $4.0 billion Credit Facility, and a $3.5 billion supplemental unsecured revolving credit
facility, or Supplemental Facility, and together with the Credit Facility, the Credit Facilities. The Credit Facilities and the
Commercial Paper program provide alternative sources of liquidity as our cash needs vary from time to time. Borrowing capacity
under these sources may be increased as discussed further below.
Table of Contents
63Our balance of cash and cash equivalents increased $155.0 million during 2019 to $669.4 million as of December 31,
2019 as further discussed in “Cash Flows” below.
On December 31, 2019, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of approximately $6.0 billion under the Credit
Facilities, net of outstanding borrowings of $125.0 million, amounts outstanding under the Commercial Paper program of $1.3
billion and letters of credit of $11.4 million. For the year ended December 31, 2019, the maximum aggregate outstanding
balance under the Credit Facilities was $130.7 million and the weighted average outstanding balance was $125.1 million. The
weighted average interest rate was 3.04% for the year ended December 31, 2019.
Simon has historically had access to public equity markets and the Operating Partnership has historically had access to
private and public, short and long-term unsecured debt markets and access to secured debt and private equity from institutional
investors at the property level.
Our business model and Simon’s status as a REIT require us to regularly access the debt markets to raise funds for
acquisition, development and redevelopment activity, and to refinance maturing debt. Simon may also, from time to time, access
the equity capital markets to accomplish our business objectives. We believe we have sufficient cash on hand and availability
under the Credit Facilities and the Commercial Paper program to address our debt maturities and capital needs through 2020.
Cash Flows
Our net cash flow from operating activities and distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities totaled $4.0 billion
during 2019. In addition, we had net proceeds from our debt financing and repayment activities of $784.6 million, including
$100.0 million of cash paid to extinguish debt. These activities are further discussed below under “Financing and Debt.” During
2019, we also:
●paid stockholder dividends and unitholder distributions totaling approximately $2.9 billion and preferred unit
distributions totaling $5.3 million,
●funded consolidated capital expenditures of $876.0 million (including development and other costs of $72.5 million,
redevelopment and expansion costs of $498.0 million, and tenant costs and other operational capital expenditures of
$305.5 million),
●funded investments in unconsolidated entities of $63.8 million,
●funded investments in equity instruments of $374.2 million,
●received insurance proceeds from third-party carriers for property restoration, remediation, and business interruption
from hurricane damages in Puerto Rico of $17.2 million,
●funded the repurchase of $359.8 million of Simon’s common stock.
In general, we anticipate that cash generated from operations will be sufficient to meet operating expenses, monthly debt
service, recurring capital expenditures, and dividends to stockholders and/or distributions to partners necessary to maintain
Simon’s REIT qualification on a long-term basis. In addition, we expect to be able to generate or obtain capital for nonrecurring
capital expenditures, such as acquisitions, major building redevelopments and expansions, as well as for scheduled principal
maturities on outstanding indebtedness, from:
●excess cash generated from operating performance and working capital reserves,
●borrowings on the Credit Facilities and Commercial Paper program,
●additional secured or unsecured debt financing, or
●additional equity raised in the public or private markets.
We expect to generate positive cash flow from operations in 2020, and we consider these projected cash flows in our
sources and uses of cash. These cash flows are principally derived from rents paid by our tenants. A significant deterioration in
projected cash flows from operations could cause us to increase our reliance on available funds from the Credit Facilities and
Commercial Paper program, curtail planned capital expenditures, or seek other additional sources of financing as discussed
above.
Table of Contents
64Financing and Debt
Unsecured Debt
At December 31, 2019, our unsecured debt consisted of $15.9 billion of senior unsecured notes of the Operating
Partnership, $125.0 million outstanding under the Operating Partnership’s $4.0 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or
Credit Facility, and $1.3 billion outstanding under the Operating Partnership’s global unsecured commercial paper program, or
Commercial Paper program.  
On December 31, 2019, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of $6.0 billion under the Credit Facility and
the Operating Partnership’s $3.5 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or Supplemental Facility, and together with the Credit
Facility, the Credit Facilities. The maximum aggregate outstanding balance under the Credit Facilities during the year ended
December 31, 2019 was $130.7 million and the weighted average outstanding balance was $125.1 million. Letters of credit of
$11.4 million were outstanding under the Credit Facilities as of December 31, 2019.
The Credit Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $4.0 billion may be increased to $5.0 billion during its term and provides
for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars.  Borrowings in
currencies other than the U.S. dollar are limited to 95% of the maximum revolving credit amount, as defined.  The initial maturity
date of the Credit Facility is June 30, 2021 and can be extended for an additional year to June 30, 2022 at our sole option,
subject to our continued compliance with the terms thereof.  The base interest rate on the Credit Facility is LIBOR plus 77.5
basis points with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points.
The Supplemental Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5 billion during its term and
provides for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars. The initial
maturity date of the Supplemental Facility was extended to June 30, 2022 and can be extended for an additional year to June
30, 2023 at our sole option, subject to our continued compliance with the terms thereof. The base interest rate on the
Supplemental Facility is LIBOR plus 77.5 basis points, with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points.
The Operating Partnership also has available a Commercial Paper program of $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S. dollar
equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may issue unsecured commercial paper notes, denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro
and other currencies. Notes issued in non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one or more subsidiaries of the Operating
Partnership and are guaranteed by the Operating Partnership.  Notes will be sold under customary terms in the U.S. and Euro
commercial paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a result of the guarantee described above) pari passu with
the Operating Partnership's other unsecured senior indebtedness.  The Commercial Paper program is supported by the Credit
Facilities and if necessary or appropriate, we may make one or more draws under either of the Credit Facilities to pay amounts
outstanding from time to time on the Commercial Paper program. On December 31, 2019, we had $1.3 billion outstanding under
the Commercial Paper program, of which $1.0 billion was comprised of U.S. dollar denominated notes with a weighted average
interest rate of 1.72% and $269.2 million was comprised of Euro denominated notes with a weighted average interest rate of
(0.38%).  These borrowings have a weighted average maturity date of March 6, 2020 and reduce amounts otherwise available
under the Credit Facilities.
On February 1, 2019, the Operating Partnership repaid at maturity $600.0 million of senior unsecured notes with a fixed
interest rate of 2.20%.
On September 13, 2019 the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured notes: $1.0
billion with a fixed interest rate of 2.00%, $1.25 billion with a fixed interest rate of 2.45%, and $1.25 billion with a fixed interest
rate of 3.25%, with maturity dates of September 13 of 2024, 2029, and 2049, respectively. Proceeds from the unsecured notes
offering funded the early redemption of senior unsecured notes in October 2019, as discussed below, and repaid a portion of the
indebtedness outstanding under the Commercial Paper program.
On October 7, 2019, the Operating Partnership completed the early redemption of its $900 million 4.375% notes due
March 1, 2021, $700 million 4.125% notes due December 1, 2021, $600 million 3.375% notes due March 15, 2022 and €375
million of the €750 million 2.375% notes due October 2, 2020.  We recorded a $116.3 million loss on extinguishment of debt in
the fourth quarter as a result of the early redemption.
Mortgage Debt
Total mortgage indebtedness was $6.9 billion and $6.8 billion at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Table of Contents
65Covenants
Our unsecured debt agreements contain financial covenants and other non-financial covenants. If we were to fail to
comply with these covenants, after the expiration of the applicable cure periods, the debt maturity could be accelerated or other
remedies could be sought by the lender, including adjustments to the applicable interest rate. As of December 31, 2019, we were
in compliance with all covenants of our unsecured debt.
At December 31, 2019, our consolidated subsidiaries were the borrowers under 46 non-recourse mortgage notes secured
by mortgages on 50 properties and other assets, including two separate pools of cross-defaulted and cross-collateralized
mortgages encumbering a total of five properties. Under these cross-default provisions, a default under any mortgage included
in the cross-defaulted pool may constitute a default under all mortgages within that pool and may lead to acceleration of the
indebtedness due on each property within the pool. Certain of our secured debt instruments contain financial and other non-
financial covenants which are specific to the properties that serve as collateral for that debt. If the applicable borrower under
these non-recourse mortgage notes were to fail to comply with these covenants, the lender could accelerate the debt and
enforce its rights against their collateral. At December 31, 2019, the applicable borrowers under these non-recourse mortgage
notes were in compliance with all covenants where non-compliance could individually or in the aggregate, giving effect to
applicable cross-default provisions, have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity or results of operations.
Summary of Financing
Our consolidated debt, adjusted to reflect outstanding derivative instruments, and the effective weighted average interest
rates as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, consisted of the following (dollars in thousands):
        Effective         Effective  
Adjusted Balance Weighted Adjusted Weighted  
as of Average Balance as of Average  
Debt Subject to December 31, 2019 Interest Rate(1) December 31, 2018 Interest Rate(1)
Fixed Rate $  23,298,167  3.46% $  22,461,191  3.37%
Variable Rate   865,063  2.61%   844,344  3.17%
$  24,163,230  3.16% $  23,305,535  3.35%
(1)Effective weighted average interest rate excludes the impact of net discounts and debt issuance costs.
Contractual Obligations and Off-balance Sheet Arrangements
In regards to long-term debt arrangements, the following table summarizes the material aspects of these future
obligations on our consolidated indebtedness as of December 31, 2019, and subsequent years thereafter (dollars in thousands)
assuming the obligations remain outstanding through initial maturities:
    2020     2021 - 2022    2023 - 2024    After 2024    Total  
Long Term Debt (1) (5) $ 2,857,060 $ 4,414,458 $ 4,765,135 $ 12,208,803 $ 24,245,456
Interest Payments (2)   743,555   1,309,076   1,029,338   3,514,867   6,596,836
Consolidated Capital Expenditure
Commitments (3)   551,418   —   —   —   551,418
Lease Commitments (4)   32,438   64,891   65,300   908,701   1,071,330
(1)Represents principal maturities only and, therefore, excludes net discounts and debt issuance costs.
(2)Variable rate interest payments are estimated based on the LIBOR or other applicable rate at December 31, 2019.
(3)Represents contractual commitments for capital projects and services at December 31, 2019. Our share of estimated 2020
development, redevelopment and expansion activity is further discussed below under “Development Activity”.
(4)Represents only the minimum non-cancellable lease period, excluding applicable lease extension and renewal options,
unless reasonably certain of exercise.
(5)The amount due in 2020 includes $1.3 billion in Global Commercial Paper.
Table of Contents
66Our off-balance sheet arrangements consist primarily of our investments in joint ventures which are common in the real
estate industry and are described in Note 6 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements. Our joint ventures typically fund
their cash needs through secured debt financings obtained by and in the name of the joint venture entity. The joint venture debt
is secured by a first mortgage, is without recourse to the joint venture partners, and does not represent a liability of the partners,
except to the extent the partners or their affiliates expressly guarantee the joint venture debt. As of December 31, 2019, the
Operating Partnership guaranteed joint venture-related mortgage indebtedness of $214.8 million (of which we have a right of
recovery from our venture partners of $10.8 million as of December 31, 2019). Mortgages guaranteed by the Operating
Partnership are secured by the property of the joint venture which could be sold in order to satisfy the outstanding obligation and
which has an estimated fair value in excess of the guaranteed amount. We may elect to fund cash needs of a joint venture
through equity contributions (generally on a basis proportionate to our ownership interests), advances or partner loans, although
such fundings are not required contractually or otherwise.
Hurricane Impacts
As discussed further in Note 10 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements, during the third quarter of 2017, two
of our wholly-owned properties located in Puerto Rico sustained significant property damage and business interruption as a
result of Hurricane Maria.  
Since the date of the loss, we have received $73.9 million of insurance proceeds from third-party carriers related to the
two properties located in Puerto Rico, of which $45.5 million was used for property restoration and remediation and to reduce the
insurance recovery receivable.  During the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, we recorded $10.5 million and $17.9
million, respectively, as business interruption income, which was recorded in other income in the accompanying consolidated
statements of operations and comprehensive income.  
Acquisitions and Dispositions
Buy-sell, marketing rights, and other exit mechanisms are common in real estate partnership agreements. Most of our
partners are institutional investors who have a history of direct investment in retail real estate. We and our partners in our joint
venture properties may initiate these provisions (subject to any applicable lock up or similar restrictions). If we determine it is in
our best interests for us to purchase the joint venture interest and we believe we have adequate liquidity to execute the purchase
without hindering our cash flows, then we may initiate these provisions or elect to buy our partner’s interest. If we decide to sell
any of our joint venture interests, we expect to use the net proceeds to reduce outstanding indebtedness or to reinvest in
development, redevelopment, or expansion opportunities.
Acquisitions. On September 19, 2019, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to one of our
properties from our joint venture partner for cash consideration of $12.8 million. As of closing, the property was subject to a
$21.5 million, 4.02% variable rate mortgage.
On September 25, 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at Orange from our joint venture partner.
 The Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units, or approximately $84.1 million, as consideration for the acquisition.  The
property is subject to a $215.0 million 4.22% fixed rate mortgage loan.
Dispositions.  We may continue to pursue the disposition of properties that no longer meet our strategic criteria or that
are not a primary retail venue within their trade area.
During 2019, we disposed of our interests in one multi-family residential investment. Our share of the gross proceeds on
this transaction was $17.9 million. Our share of the gain of $16.2 million is included in other income in the accompanying
consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income. We also recorded net gains of $62.1 million, primarily related
to Klépierre’s disposition of its interests in certain shopping centers, of which our share was $58.6 million, as discussed in Note 6
to the consolidated financial statements.
During 2018, we recorded net gains of $288.8 million primarily related to disposition activity which included the
foreclosure of two consolidated retail properties in satisfaction of their $200.0 million and $80.0 million non-recourse mortgage
loans and, as discussed in Note 6 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements, our interest in the German department
store properties owned through our investment in HBS was sold during the fourth quarter of 2018. Also, as discussed further in
Note 6 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements, Klépierre disposed of its interests in certain shopping centers
resulting in a gain of which our share was $20.2 million.
During 2017, we disposed of our interest in one unconsolidated retail property. The loss recognized on this transaction
was approximately $1.3 million. As discussed in Note 6 of the notes to the consolidated financial statements, Klépierre’s
disposition of its interest in certain shopping centers, resulting in a gain of which our share was $5.0 million.  
Table of Contents
67Joint Venture Formation Activity
On October 16, 2019, we contributed approximately $276.8 million consisting of cash and the Shop Premium Outlets, or
SPO, assets for a 45% noncontrolling interest in Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG, to create a new multi-platform venture dedicated to
digital value shopping, as further discussed in Note 6 to the consolidated financial statements.  
Subsequent Event
On February 10, 2020, we and Taubman Centers, Inc., a publicly held Michigan corporation (“TCO”), issued a joint press
release announcing the execution of an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the “Merger Agreement”) dated as of February 9, 2020,
pursuant to which, among other things and subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, the Operating Partnership
will acquire 100% of the equity interests of TCO and, following the transactions contemplated in the Merger Agreement, will hold
80% of the equity interests of The Taubman Realty Group Limited Partnership (“TRG”), with the Taubman Family (as defined in
the Merger Agreement) retaining a 20% interest in TRG. Consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Merger
Agreement are subject to the satisfaction or waiver of customary closing conditions, including the approval and adoption of the
Merger Agreement by (i) shareholders holding two-thirds of TCO’s outstanding voting stock and (ii) shareholders, excluding the
Taubman Family, holding a majority of TCO’s outstanding voting stock.
TRG is engaged in the ownership, management and/or leasing of 26 super-regional shopping centers in the U.S. and
Asia.  The TRG board will be comprised of 3 Simon designees and 3 Taubman designees.  TRG will continue to be managed by
its existing executive team.  We, through the Operating Partnership, will acquire all of Taubman common stock for $52.50 per
share in cash and expect to fund the total required cash consideration of approximately $3.6 billion with existing liquidity.  
Development Activity
We routinely incur costs related to construction for significant redevelopment and expansion projects at our properties.
Redevelopment and expansion projects, including the addition of anchors, big box tenants, and restaurants are underway at
several properties in the United States, Canada, Europe, and Asia.
Our share of the costs of all new development, redevelopment and expansion projects currently under construction is
approximately $1.8 billion. We expect to fund these capital projects with cash flows from operations. Our estimated stabilized
return on invested capital typically ranges between 7-10% for all our new development, redevelopment and expansion projects.
Summary of Capital Expenditures.  The following table summarizes total capital expenditures on consolidated
properties on a cash basis (in millions):
    2019    2018    2017 
New Developments $ 73 $ 87 $  61
Redevelopments and Expansions   498   419   474
Tenant Allowances   162   144   127
Operational Capital Expenditures   143   132   70
Total $ 876 $ 782 $ 732
New Domestic Developments, Redevelopments and Expansions  
In the third quarter, construction started on a 338,000 square foot upscale outlet located in Jenks (Tulsa), Oklahoma,
projected to open in spring of 2021. We own a 100% interest in this project.
On September 25, 2018, we opened Denver Premium Outlets, a 330,000 square foot center in Thornton (Denver),
Colorado. We own a 100% interest in this project. The cost of this project was $128.6 million.
Table of Contents
68International Development Activity  
We typically reinvest net cash flow from our international joint ventures to fund future international development activity.
We believe this strategy mitigates some of the risk of our initial investment and our exposure to changes in foreign currencies.
We have also funded most of our foreign investments with local currency-denominated borrowings that act as a natural hedge
against fluctuations in exchange rates. Our consolidated net income exposure to changes in the volatility of the Euro, Yen, Peso,
Won, and other foreign currencies is not material. We expect our share of international development costs for 2020 will be
approximately $211 million, primarily funded through reinvested joint venture cash flow and construction loans.
The following table describes recently completed and new development and expansion projects as well as our share of
the estimated total cost as of December 31, 2019 (in millions):
Gross Our Our Share of Our Share of Projected
Leasable Ownership Projected Net CostProjected Net Cost Opening
Property    Location    Area (sqft)   Percentage   (in Local Currency)   (in USD)  (1)    Date
New Development Projects:
Premium Outlets Querétaro Querétaro, Mexico  274,800 50%MXN  441.7$  23.4Opened May - 2019
Málaga Designer Outlet Málaga, Spain  191,000 46%EUR  50.3$  56.4 Feb. - 2020
Siam Premium Outlets Bangkok Bangkok, Thailand  251,000 50%THB  1,607$  53.9 Apr. - 2020
West Midlands Designer Outlet Cannock (West
Midlands), England 197,000 20%GBP  26.5$  34.9 Oct. - 2020
Paris-Giverny Designer Outlet Vernon (Normandy),
France 229,000 81%EUR  183.9$  206.2 Sep. - 2021
Expansions:
Vancouver Designer Outlet
Phase 2Richmond (British
Columbia), Canada 84,000 46%CAD  26.9$  20.7Opened Aug. - 2019
Paju Premium Outlets Phase 3 Gyeonggi Province,
South Korea 116,000 50%KRW  26,905$  23.3Opened Aug. - 2019
Ashford Designer Outlet Phase 2Ashford, England  98,000 46%GBP  43.0$  56.8Opened Oct. - 2019
Noventa di Piave Designer Outlet
Phase 5Noventa di Piave
(Venice), Italy 29,000 92%EUR  21.4$  24.0Opened Nov. - 2019
Tosu Premium Outlets Phase 4 Tosu City, Japan  38,000 40%JPY  964$  8.9Opened Nov. - 2019
Gotemba Premium Outlets
Phase 4Gotemba, Japan  178,000 40%JPY  7,476$  68.8 Apr. - 2020
Rinku Premium Outlets Phase 5 Izumisano (Osaka),
Japan 110,000 40%JPY  3,219$  29.6 Jul. - 2020
La Reggia Designer Outlet Phase
3Marcianise (Naples),
Italy 58,000 92%EUR  30.9$  34.6 Nov. - 2020
(1)USD equivalent based upon December 31, 2019 foreign currency exchange rates.
Dividends, Distributions and Stock Repurchase Program
Simon paid a common stock dividend of $2.10 per share in the fourth quarter of 2019 and $8.30 per share for the year
ended December 31, 2019. The Operating Partnership paid distributions per unit for the same amounts. In 2018, Simon paid
dividends of $2.00 and $7.90 per share for the three and twelve month periods ended December 31, 2018, respectively. The
Operating Partnership paid distributions per unit for the same amounts. Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash
dividend for the first quarter of 2020 of $2.10 per share of common stock payable on February 28, 2020 to stockholders of record
on February 14, 2020. The distribution rate on units is equal to the dividend rate on common stock. In order to maintain its status
as a REIT, Simon must pay a minimum amount of dividends. Simon’s future dividends and the Operating Partnership’s future
distributions will be determined by Simon’s Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, based on actual and projected financial
condition, liquidity and results of operations, cash available for dividends and limited partner distributions, cash reserves as
deemed necessary for capital and operating expenditures, financing covenants, if any, and the amount required to maintain
Simon’s status as a REIT.
On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the previously authorized $2.0
billion common stock repurchase plan through March 31, 2019.  On February 11, 2019, Simon's Board of Directors authorized a
new common stock repurchase plan.  Under the new plan, Simon may repurchase up to $2.0 billion of its common stock during
the two-year period ending February 11, 2021 in the open market or in privately negotiated transactions as market conditions
warrant.  During the year ended December 31, 2019, Simon purchased 2,247,074 shares at an average price of $160.11 per
share, of which 46,377 shares at an average price of $164.49 were purchased as part of the previous program.  During the year
ended December 31, 2018, Simon purchased 2,275,194 shares at an average
Table of Contents
69price of $155.64 per share as part of the previous program.  At December 31, 2019, we had remaining authority to repurchase
approximately $1.6 billion of common stock.  As Simon repurchases shares under these programs, the Operating Partnership
repurchases an equal number of units from Simon.  
Forward-Looking Statements
Certain statements made in this section or elsewhere in this Annual Report on Form 10-K may be deemed "forward-
looking statements" within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Although we believe the
expectations reflected in any forward-looking statements are based on reasonable assumptions, we can give no assurance that
our expectations will be attained, and it is possible that our actual results may differ materially from those indicated by these
forward-looking statements due to a variety of risks, uncertainties and other factors. Such factors include, but are not limited to:
changes in economic and market conditions that may adversely affect the general retail environment; the potential loss of anchor
stores or major tenants; the inability to collect rent due to the bankruptcy or insolvency of tenants or otherwise; decreases in
market rental rates; the intensely competitive market environment in the retail industry; the inability to lease newly developed
properties and renew leases and relet space at existing properties on favorable terms; risks related to international activities,
including, without limitation, the impact, if any, of the United Kingdom’s exit from the European Union; changes to applicable laws
or regulations or the interpretation thereof; risks associated with the acquisition, development, redevelopment, expansion,
leasing and management of properties; general risks related to real estate investments, including the illiquidity of real estate
investments; the impact of our substantial indebtedness on our future operations; any disruption in the financial markets that
may adversely affect our ability to access capital for growth and satisfy our ongoing debt service requirements; any change in
our credit rating; changes in market rates of interest and foreign exchange rates for foreign currencies; changes in the value of
our investments in foreign entities; our ability to hedge interest rate and currency risk; our continued ability to maintain our status
as a REIT; changes in tax laws or regulations that result in adverse tax consequences; risks relating to our joint venture
properties; environmental liabilities; changes in insurance costs, the availability of comprehensive insurance coverage; security
breaches that could compromise our information technology or infrastructure; natural disasters; the potential for terrorist
activities; the loss of key management personnel; and the transition of LIBOR to an alternative reference rate. We discussed
these and other risks and uncertainties under the heading "Risk Factors" in Part I, Item1A of this Annual Report on Form 10-K.
We may update that discussion in subsequent other periodic reports, but, except as required by law, we undertake no duty or
obligation to update or revise these forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future developments, or
otherwise.
Non-GAAP Financial Measures
Industry practice is to evaluate real estate properties in part based on performance measures such as FFO, diluted FFO
per share, NOI, portfolio NOI and comparable property NOI. We believe that these non-GAAP measures are helpful to investors
because they are widely recognized measures of the performance of REITs and provide a relevant basis for comparison among
REITs. We also use these measures internally to measure the operating performance of our portfolio.
We determine FFO based upon the definition set forth by the National Association of Real Estate Investment Trusts
(“NAREIT”) Funds From Operations White Paper – 2018 Restatement.  Our main business includes acquiring, owning,
operating, developing, and redeveloping real estate in conjunction with the rental of real estate.  Gains and losses of assets
incidental to our main business are included in FFO.  We determine FFO to be our share of consolidated net income computed
in accordance with GAAP:
●excluding real estate related depreciation and amortization,
●excluding gains and losses from extraordinary items,
●excluding gains and losses from the sale, disposal or property insurance recoveries of, or any impairment related to,
depreciable retail operating properties,
●plus the allocable portion of FFO of unconsolidated joint ventures based upon economic ownership interest, and
●all determined on a consistent basis in accordance with GAAP.
You should understand that our computations of these non-GAAP measures might not be comparable to similar
measures reported by other REITs and that these non-GAAP measures:
●do not represent cash flow from operations as defined by GAAP,
Table of Contents
70●should not be considered as an alternative to net income determined in accordance with GAAP as a measure of
operating performance, and
●are not an alternative to cash flows as a measure of liquidity.
The following schedule reconciles total FFO to consolidated net income and, for Simon, diluted net income per share to
diluted FFO per share.
 
2019 2018 2017
(in thousands)  
Funds from Operations (A) $ 4,272,271 $ 4,324,601 $ 4,020,505
Change in FFO from prior period   (1.2)%    7.6%    6.0%
Consolidated Net Income $ 2,423,188 $ 2,822,343 $ 2,244,903
Adjustments to Arrive at FFO:
Depreciation and amortization from consolidated properties   1,329,843   1,270,888   1,260,865
Our share of depreciation and amortization from unconsolidated entities, including
Klépierre and HBS   551,596   533,595   540,718
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net (B)   (14,883)  (282,211)  (3,647)
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments  8,212  15,212  —
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interest holders in properties   (991)  (11,327)  (13)
Noncontrolling interests portion of depreciation and amortization   (19,442)  (18,647)  (17,069)
Preferred distributions and dividends   (5,252)  (5,252)  (5,252)
FFO of the Operating Partnership (A) $4,272,271 $4,324,601 $ 4,020,505
FFO allocable to limited partners   563,342   568,817   529,595
Dilutive FFO allocable to common stockholders (A) $3,708,929 $3,755,784 $ 3,490,910
Diluted net income per share to diluted FFO per share reconciliation:
Diluted net income per share $  6.81 $  7.87 $  6.24
Depreciation and amortization from consolidated properties and our share of
depreciation and amortization from unconsolidated entities, including Klépierre
and HBS, net of noncontrolling interests portion of depreciation and amortization  5.25   5.01   4.98
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net (B)   (0.04)  (0.79)  (0.01)
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments  0.02  0.04  —
Diluted FFO per share (A) $  12.04 $  12.13 $  11.21
Basic and Diluted weighted average shares outstanding   307,950   309,627   311,517
Weighted average limited partnership units outstanding   46,774   46,893   47,260
Basic and Diluted weighted average shares and units outstanding   354,724   356,520   358,777
(A)Includes FFO of the Operating Partnership related to a loss on extinguishment of debt of $116.3 million and $128.6 million
for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2017, respectively. Includes Diluted FFO per share/unit related to a loss on
extinguishment of debt of $0.33 and $0.36 for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2017, respectively. Includes Diluted
FFO allocable to common stockholders related to a loss on extinguishment of debt of $100.9 million and $111.7 million for
the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2017, respectively.
(B)Includes gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net of
$288.8 million for the year ended December 31, 2018. Noncontrolling interest portion of the gain was $6.6 million, or $0.02
per diluted share/unit for the year ended December 31, 2018.
Table of Contents
71The following schedule reconciles consolidated net income to NOI and sets forth the computations of portfolio NOI and
comparable property NOI.
For the Year  
Ended December 31,  
 2019     2018  
(in thousands)  
Reconciliation of NOI of consolidated entities:      
Consolidated Net Income $ 2,423,188 $ 2,822,343
Income and other taxes   30,054   36,898
Interest expense   789,353   815,923
Income from unconsolidated entities   (444,349)  (475,250)
Loss on extinguishment of debt  116,256  --
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments   8,212   15,212
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and
impairment, net   (14,883)  (288,827)
Operating Income Before Other Items   2,907,831   2,926,299
Depreciation and amortization   1,340,503   1,282,454
Home and regional office costs  190,109  136,677
General and administrative  34,860  46,543
NOI of consolidated entities $ 4,473,303 $ 4,391,973
Reconciliation of NOI of unconsolidated entities:
Net Income $ 892,506 $ 876,412
Interest expense   636,988   663,693
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities, net   (24,609)  (33,367)
Operating Income Before Other Items   1,504,885   1,506,738
Depreciation and amortization   681,764   652,968
NOI of unconsolidated entities $ 2,186,649 $ 2,159,706
Add: Our share of NOI from Klépierre, HBS, and other corporate investments  293,979  316,155
Combined NOI $ 6,953,931 $ 6,867,834
Less: Corporate and Other NOI Sources (1)   481,059   482,615
Portfolio NOI $ 6,472,872 $ 6,385,219
Portfolio NOI Growth  1.4%  
Less: Our share of NOI from Klépierre, HBS, and other corporate investments  293,979  292,513
Less: International Properties (2)  483,563  465,421
Less: NOI from New Development, Redevelopment, Expansion and Acquisitions (3)   181,871   191,959
Comparable Property NOI (4) $ 5,513,459 $ 5,435,326
Comparable Property NOI Growth   1.4%  
(1)Includes income components excluded from portfolio NOI and comparable property NOI (domestic lease termination
income, interest income, land sale gains, straight line lease income, above/below market lease adjustments), unrealized
and realized gains/losses on non-real estate related equity instruments, Northgate, Simon management company revenues,
and other assets.
Table of Contents
72(2)Includes International Premium Outlets (except for Canadian Premium Outlets included in comparable property NOI) and
International Designer Outlets.
(3)Includes total property NOI for properties undergoing redevelopment as well as incremental NOI for expansion properties
not yet included in comparable properties.
(4)Includes Malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills and Lifestyle Centers opened and operating as comparable for the period.
Item 7A.  Qualitative and Quantitative Disclosures About Market Risk
Our exposure to market risk due to changes in interest rates primarily relates to our long-term debt obligations. We
manage exposure to interest rate market risk through our risk management strategy by a combination of interest rate protection
agreements to effectively fix or cap a portion of variable rate debt. We are also exposed to foreign currency risk on financings of
certain foreign operations. Our intent is to offset gains and losses that occur on the underlying exposures, with gains and losses
on the derivative contracts hedging these exposures. We do not enter into either interest rate protection or foreign currency rate
protection agreements for speculative purposes.
We may enter into treasury lock agreements as part of anticipated issuances of senior notes. Upon completion of the
debt issuance, the cost of these instruments is recorded as part of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and is
amortized to interest expense over the life of the debt agreement.
Our future earnings, cash flows and fair values relating to financial instruments are dependent upon prevalent market
rates of interest, primarily LIBOR. Based upon consolidated indebtedness and interest rates at December 31, 2019, a 50 basis
point increase in the market rates of interest would decrease future earnings and cash flows by approximately $4.4 million, and
would decrease the fair value of debt by approximately $713.4 million.
Table of Contents
73Item 8.  Financial Statements and Supplementary Data
Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Stockholders and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited Simon Property Group, Inc.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based
on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, Simon Property Group, Inc. (the Company)
maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on the
COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of the Company as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2019, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a) and
our report dated February 21, 2020, expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Company’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its
assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Management’s Report
on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Company’s internal control over
financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained
in all material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a
material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the
assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our
audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding
the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that
(1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions
of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit
preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and
expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the
company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or
disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate
because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 21, 2020
Table of Contents
74Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Stockholders and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Simon Property Group, Inc. (the Company) as of
December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, equity and cash
flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019, and the related notes and financial statement
schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a) (collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the
consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Company at December 31,
2019 and 2018, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31,
2019, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (PCAOB), the Company’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on criteria established
in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(2013 Framework) and our report dated February 21, 2020, expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion on the Company’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB
and are required to be independent with respect to the Company in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the
applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement,
whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the
financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures
included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also
included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the
overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Critical Audit Matters
The critical audit matters communicated below are matters arising from the current period audit of the financial
statements that were communicated or required to be communicated to the audit committee and that: (1) relate to accounts or
disclosures that are material to the financial statements and (2) involved our especially challenging, subjective or complex
judgments. The communication of critical audit matters does not alter in any way our opinion on the consolidated financial
statements, taken as a whole, and we are not, by communicating the critical audit matters below, providing separate opinions on
the critical audit matters or on the accounts or disclosures to which they relate.
Evaluation of Investment Properties for Impairment
Description of the
MatterAt December 31, 2019, the Company’ s consolidated net investment properties totaled $23,8 99
million. In addition, a significant number of the Company’ s investments in unconsolidated entities
and its investment in Klépierre hold investment properties. As discussed in Note 3 to the
consolidated financial statements, the Company reviews investment properties for impairment on a
property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate events or changes in circumstances that indicate
the carrying value of an investment property may not be recoverable. The Company estimates
undiscounted cash flows of an investment prope rty using observable and unobservable inputs such
as historical and foreca sted cash flows, operating income before depreciation and amortizati on,
estimated capitalization rates, leasing prospects and local market information.
Auditing management’ s evaluation of investment properties for impairment was complex due to the
estimation uncertainty in determining the undiscounted cash flows of an investment
Table of Contents
75property . In particular , the impairment evaluation for investment properties was sensitive to
significant assumptions such as forecasted cash flows and operating income before depreciat ion
and amortiza tion, and capitalization rates, all of which can be affected by expectations about future
market or economic conditions, demand, and competition.
How W e
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained  an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness  of
controls over the Company’ s process for evaluat ing investment properties for impairment, including
controls over management’ s review of the significant assumptions described above.  
To test the Company’ s evaluation of investme nt properties for impairment, we performed audit
procedures that included, among others, asse ssing the methodologies applied, evaluating the
significant assumptions discussed above and testing the completeness and accuracy of the
underlying data used by management in its analysis. We compared the significant assumptio ns
used by management to current industry and economic trends, relevant market information, and
other applicable sources. We also involved a valuation specialist to assist in evaluating certain
assumptions. In addition, we compared the forecasted cash flows and operating income before
depreciation and amortization to historical actual results and evaluated significant variances. As
part of our evaluation, we assessed the historical accuracy of management’ s estimates and
performed sensitivity analyses of significant assumptions to evaluate the changes in the
undiscounted cash flows of the related investment property that would result from changes in the
assumptions.
Evaluation of Investments in Unconsolidated Entities for Impairment
Description of the
MatterAt Decembe r 31, 2019, the carrying value of the Company’ s investments in unconsolidated entities
totaled $4,103 million. As explained in Note 3 to the consolidated financial statements, the
Company reviews inves tments in unconsolidated entities for impairment if events or changes  in
circumstances indicate that the carrying value of an investment in an unconsolidated entity may not
be recovera ble. To identify and evaluate whether an other-than-temporary decline in the fair value
of an investment below its carrying value has occurred, the Company assesses economic and
operating conditions that may affect the fair value of the investment. The evaluation of operat ing
conditions may include developing estimates of forecasted cash flows or operating income before
depreciation and amortization to support the recoverability of the carrying amount of the
investment. When required, the Company estimates the fair value of an investment and assess es
whether any impairment is other than temporary using observable and unobservable inputs such as
historical and forecasted cash flows or operating income, estimated capitalization and discount
rates, or relevant market multiples, leasing prospects and local market information.
Auditing management’ s evaluation of investme nts in unconsolidated entities for impairment was
complex due to the estimation uncertainty in determining the forecasted cash flows, operating
income before depreciation and amortization, estimated fair value of each investment and whether
any decline in fair value below the related investment’ s carrying amount is other-than-temporary . In
particular , the impairment evaluation for these investments was sensitive to significant assumptio ns
such as forecasted cash flows, operating incom e before depreciation and amortization, relevant
market multi ples, and capitalization and discount  rates, all of which can be affected by expectatio ns
about future market or economic conditions, demand, and competition.
Table of Contents
76How W e
Addressed the
Matter in Our
AuditWe obtained an understanding, evaluated the design, and tested the operating effectiveness of
controls over the Company’ s process for evaluating investments in unconsolidated entities for
impairment, including controls over management’ s review of the significant assumptions described
above.
To test the Company’ s evaluation of investme nts in unconsolidated entities for impairment, we
performed audit procedures that included, among others, assessing the methodologies applied,
evaluating the significant assumptions discus sed above and testing the completeness and
accuracy of data used by management in its analysis. We compared the significant assumptions
used by management to current industry and economic trends, relevant market information, and
other applicable sources. We also involved a valuation specialist to assist in evaluating certain
assumptions. In addition, we compared the forecasted cash flows and operating income before
depreciation and amortization to historical actual results and evaluated significant variances. As
part of our evaluation, we assessed the historical accuracy of management’ s estimates and
performed sensitivity analyses of significant assumptions to evaluate the changes in the cash flows
and the fair value of the related investment that would result from changes in the assumptions.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
We have served as the Company’s auditor since 2002.
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 21, 2020
Table of Contents
77Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Partners of Simon Property Group, L.P. and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on Internal Control over Financial Reporting
We have audited Simon Property Group, L.P.’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based
on criteria established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the
Treadway Commission (2013 Framework) (the COSO criteria). In our opinion, Simon Property Group, L.P. (the Partnership)
maintained, in all material respects, effective internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on the
COSO criteria.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (PCAOB), the consolidated balance sheets of the Partnership as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the
period ended December 31, 2019, and the related notes and financial statement schedule listed in the Index at Item 15(a) and
our report dated February 21, 2020, expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
The Partnership’s management is responsible for maintaining effective internal control over financial reporting and for its
assessment of the effectiveness of internal control over financial reporting included in the accompanying Management’s Report
on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on the Partnership’s internal control over
financial reporting based on our audit. We are a public accounting firm registered with the PCAOB and are required to be
independent with respect to the Partnership in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws and the applicable rules and
regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audit in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether effective internal control over financial reporting was maintained
in all material respects.
Our audit included obtaining an understanding of internal control over financial reporting, assessing the risk that a
material weakness exists, testing and evaluating the design and operating effectiveness of internal control based on the
assessed risk, and performing such other procedures as we considered necessary in the circumstances. We believe that our
audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
Definition and Limitations of Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
A company’s internal control over financial reporting is a process designed to provide reasonable assurance regarding
the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles. A company’s internal control over financial reporting includes those policies and procedures that
(1) pertain to the maintenance of records that, in reasonable detail, accurately and fairly reflect the transactions and dispositions
of the assets of the company; (2) provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit
preparation of financial statements in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, and that receipts and
expenditures of the company are being made only in accordance with authorizations of management and directors of the
company; and (3) provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use, or
disposition of the company’s assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements. Also,
projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate
because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 21, 2020
Table of Contents
78Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm
The Partners of Simon Property Group, L.P. and the Board of Directors of Simon Property Group, Inc.:
Opinion on the Financial Statements
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Simon Property Group, L.P. (the Partnership) as of
December 31, 2019 and 2018, the related consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income, equity and cash
flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31, 2019 and the related notes and financial statement schedule
listed in the Index at Item 15(a) (collectively referred to as the “consolidated financial statements”). In our opinion, the
consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of the Partnership at December 31,
2019 and 2018, and the results of its operations and its cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 31,
2019, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.
We also have audited, in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United
States) (PCAOB), the Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019, based on criteria
established in Internal Control – Integrated Framework issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (2013 Framework) and our report dated February 21, 2020, expressed an unqualified opinion thereon.
Basis for Opinion
These financial statements are the responsibility of the Partnership’s management. Our responsibility is to express an
opinion on the Partnership’s financial statements based on our audits. We are a public accounting firm registered with the
PCAOB and are required to be independent with respect to the Partnership in accordance with the U.S. federal securities laws
and the applicable rules and regulations of the Securities and Exchange Commission and the PCAOB.
We conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the PCAOB. Those standards require that we plan and
perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement,
whether due to error or fraud. Our audits included performing procedures to assess the risks of material misstatement of the
financial statements, whether due to error or fraud, and performing procedures that respond to those risks. Such procedures
included examining, on a test basis, evidence regarding the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. Our audits also
included evaluating the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the
overall presentation of the financial statements. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
/s/ ERNST  & Y OUNG  LLP
We have served as the Partnership’s auditor since 2002.
Indianapolis, Indiana
February 21, 2020
Table of Contents
79Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
(Dollars in thousands, except share amounts)
    December 31,     December 31,  
2019 2018  
ASSETS:
Investment properties, at cost $37,804,495 $37,092,670
Less - accumulated depreciation  13,905,776  12,884,539
 23,898,719  24,208,131
Cash and cash equivalents  669,373  514,335
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  832,151  763,815
Investment in unconsolidated entities, at equity  2,371,053  2,220,414
Investment in Klépierre, at equity  1,731,649  1,769,488
Right-of-use assets, net 514,660 —
Deferred costs and other assets  1,214,025  1,210,040
Total assets $31,231,630 $30,686,223
LIABILITIES:
Mortgages and unsecured indebtedness $24,163,230 $23,305,535
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenues  1,390,682  1,316,861
Cash distributions and losses in unconsolidated entities, at equity  1,566,294  1,536,111
Lease liabilities 516,809 —
Other liabilities  464,304  500,597
Total liabilities  28,101,319  26,659,104
Commitments and contingencies
Limited partners’ preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling redeemable
interests in properties  219,061  230,163
EQUITY:
Stockholders’ Equity
Capital stock (850,000,000 total shares authorized, $0.0001 par value, 238,000,000 shares of
excess common stock, 100,000,000 authorized shares of preferred stock):
Series J 83/8% cumulative redeemable preferred stock, 1,000,000 shares authorized, 796,948
issued and outstanding with a liquidation value of $39,847  42,420  42,748
Common stock, $0.0001 par value, 511,990,000 shares authorized, 320,435,256 and
320,411,571 issued and outstanding, respectively  32  32
Class B common stock, $0.0001 par value, 10,000 shares authorized, 8,000 issued and
outstanding  —  —
Capital in excess of par value  9,756,073  9,700,418
Accumulated deficit  (5,379,952) (4,893,069)
Accumulated other comprehensive loss  (118,604) (126,017)
Common stock held in treasury, at cost, 13,574,296 and 11,402,103 shares, respectively  (1,773,571) (1,427,431)
Total stockholders’ equity  2,526,398  3,296,681
Noncontrolling interests  384,852  500,275
Total equity  2,911,250  3,796,956
Total liabilities and equity $31,231,630 $30,686,223
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
80Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income
(Dollars in thousands, except per share amounts)
For the Year  
Ended December 31,  
 2019     2018     2017  
REVENUE:
Lease income $5,243,771 $5,158,420 $5,109,099
Management fees and other revenues  112,942  116,286  121,259
Other income  398,476  370,582  296,978
Total revenue  5,755,189  5,645,288  5,527,336
EXPENSES:
Property operating  453,145  450,636  443,177
Depreciation and amortization  1,340,503  1,282,454  1,275,452
Real estate taxes  468,004  457,740  440,003
Repairs and maintenance  100,495  99,588  96,900
Advertising and promotion  150,344  151,241  150,865
Home and regional office costs  190,109  136,677  135,150
General and administrative  34,860  46,543  51,972
Other  109,898  94,110  131,477
Total operating expenses  2,847,358  2,718,989  2,724,996
OPERATING INCOME BEFORE OTHER ITEMS  2,907,831  2,926,299  2,802,340
Interest expense  (789,353) (815,923) (809,393)
Loss on extinguishment of debt (116,256) — (128,618)
Income and other taxes  (30,054) (36,898) (23,343)
Income from unconsolidated entities  444,349  475,250  400,270
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments (8,212) (15,212) —
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net  14,883  288,827  3,647
CONSOLIDATED NET INCOME 2,423,188 2,822,343 2,244,903
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests  321,604  382,285  296,941
Preferred dividends  3,337  3,337  3,337
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO COMMON STOCKHOLDERS $2,098,247 $2,436,721 $1,944,625
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER COMMON SHARE:
Net income attributable to common stockholders $ 6.81 $ 7.87 $ 6.24
Consolidated Net Income $2,423,188 $2,822,343 $2,244,903
Unrealized (loss) gain on derivative hedge agreements  (4,066) 21,633  (35,112)
Net loss (gain) reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into earnings 13,634  7,020  (12,122)
Currency translation adjustments  (1,850) (47,038) 45,766
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other  718  373  5,733
Comprehensive income  2,431,624  2,804,331  2,249,168
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests  322,627  379,837  297,534
Comprehensive income attributable to common stockholders $2,108,997 $2,424,494 $1,951,634
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
81Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(Dollars in thousands)
For the Year  
Ended December 31,  
 2019     2018     2017  
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES:                     
Consolidated Net Income $ 2,423,188 $2,822,343 $ 2,244,903
Adjustments to reconcile consolidated net income to net cash provided by
operating activities
Depreciation and amortization  1,394,172  1,349,776  1,357,351
Loss on debt extinguishment 116,256 — 128,618
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities and impairment, net  (14,883) (288,827) (3,647)
Gains on sales of marketable securities  —  —  (21,541)
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments 8,212 15,212 —
Gain on interest in unconsolidated entity (Note 6) — (35,621) —
Straight-line lease income  (67,139) (18,325) (26,543)
Equity in income of unconsolidated entities  (444,349) (475,250) (400,270)
Distributions of income from unconsolidated entities  428,769  390,137  374,101
Changes in assets and liabilities
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  (157) (17,518) (26,170)
Deferred costs and other assets  (49,338) (75,438) (132,945)
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, deferred revenues and
other liabilities  13,100  84,307  99,931
Net cash provided by operating activities  3,807,831  3,750,796  3,593,788
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES:
Acquisitions  (12,800) (51,060) (264,488)
Funding of loans to related parties  —  (4,641) (71,532)
Proceeds on loans to related parties  7,641  —  —
Capital expenditures, net  (876,011) (781,909) (732,100)
Cash impact from the consolidation of properties  1,045  11,276  7,536
Net proceeds from sale of assets  6,776  183,241  19,944
Investments in unconsolidated entities  (63,789) (63,397) (157,173)
Purchase of equity instruments  (374,231) (21,563) (25,000)
Proceeds from sales of equity instruments  —  25,000  56,268
Insurance proceeds for property restoration 5,662 19,083 —
Distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities and other  229,000  447,464  405,078
Net cash used in investing activities  (1,076,707) (236,506) (761,467)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES:
Proceeds from sales of common stock and other, net of transaction costs (328) (329) (328)
Purchase of shares related to stock grant recipients' tax withholdings (2,955) (2,911) (2,789)
Redemption of limited partner units  (6,846) (81,506) —
Purchase of treasury stock (359,773) (354,108) (407,002)
Distributions to noncontrolling interest holders in properties  (41,549) (76,963) (11,295)
Contributions from noncontrolling interest holders in properties  139  161  382
Preferred distributions of the Operating Partnership  (1,915) (1,915) (1,915)
Distributions to stockholders and preferred dividends  (2,558,944) (2,449,071) (2,231,259)
Distributions to limited partners  (388,542) (370,656) (338,602)
Cash paid to extinguish debt (99,975) — (128,618)
Proceeds from issuance of debt, net of transaction costs  13,312,301  7,973,719  11,668,026
Repayments of debt  (12,427,699) (9,118,685) (10,456,671)
Net cash used in financing activities  (2,576,086) (4,482,264) (1,910,071)
INCREASE (DECREASE) IN CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS  155,038  (967,974) 922,250
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, beginning of period  514,335  1,482,309  560,059
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, end of period $ 669,373 $ 514,335 $ 1,482,309
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
82Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Statements of Equity
(Dollars in thousands)
            Accumulated Other                      
Comprehensive Capital in Common Stock  
Preferred Common Income Excess of Par Accumulated Held in Noncontrolling Total  
Stock Stock (Loss) Value Deficit Treasury Interests Equity  
Balance at December 31, 2016 $ 43,405 $ 32 $ (114,126 )$ 9,523,086 $(4,459,387 )$ (682,562 )$ 649,464 $ 4,959,912
Exchange of limited partner units ( 500,411
common shares, Note 8) 6,005 (6,005 ) —
Series J preferred stock premium amortization (328) (328)
Stock incentive program ( 76,660  common
shares, net) (13,289 ) 13,289  —
Amortization of stock incentive 13,911 13,911
Treasury stock purchase ( 2,468,630  shares) (407,002 ) (407,002 )
Long-term incentive performance units 38,305 38,305
Issuance of unit equivalents and other , net
(16,161  common shares repurchased) 241 (39,489 ) (2,788 ) 383 (41,653 )
Unrealized loss on hedging activities (30,505 ) (4,607 ) (35,112 )
Currency translation adjustments 39,726 6,040 45,766
Changes in available-for-sale securities and
other 4,987 746 5,733
Net gain reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive loss into earnings (10,535 ) (1,587 ) (12,122 )
Other comprehensive income 3,673 592  4,265
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from
change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership 84,794 (84,794 ) —
Distributions to common stockholders and limited
partners, excluding Operating Partnership
preferred interests (2,231,259 ) (338,602 ) (2,569,861 )
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners (3,851 ) (3,851 )
Net income, excluding $1,915  attributable to
preferred interests in the Operating
Partnership and a $2,078  loss attributable to
noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties 1,947,962 297,104  2,245,066
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 43,077 $ 32 $ (110,453 )$ 9,614,748 $(4,782,173 )$(1,079,063 )$ 552,596 $ 4,238,764
Exchange of limited partner units ( 92,732
common shares, Note 8) 1,004 (1,004 ) —
Issuance of limited partner units ( 475,183  units) 84,103 84,103
Series J preferred stock premium amortization (329) (329)
Stock incentive program ( 51,756  common
shares, net) (8,651 ) 8,651 —
Redemption of limited partner units ( 454,704
units) (76,555 ) (4,951 ) (81,506 )
Amortization of stock incentive 12,029 12,029
Treasury stock purchase ( 2,275,194  shares) (354,108 ) (354,108 )
Long-term incentive performance units 26,172 26,172
Cumulative ef fect of accounting change 7,264 7,264
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 18,680
common shares repurchased) 1,602 (109,147 ) (2,911 ) (2,510 ) (112,966 )
Unrealized gain on hedging activities 18,781 2,852 21,633
Currency translation adjustments (40,766 ) (6,271 ) (47,037)
Changes in available-for-sale securities and
other 324 49 373
Net loss reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive loss into earnings 6,097 923 7,020
Other comprehensive income (15,564 ) (2,447 ) (18,011 )
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from
change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership 156,241 (156,241 ) —
Distributions to common stockholders and limited
partners, excluding Operating Partnership
preferred interests (2,449,071 ) (370,656 ) (2,819,727 )
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners (1,741 ) (1,741 )
Net income, excluding $1,915  attributable to
preferred interests in the Operating
Partnership and $3,416  attributable to
noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties 2,440,058 376,954 2,817,012
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 42,748 $ 32 $ (126,017 )$ 9,700,418 $(4,893,069 )$(1,427,431 )$ 500,275 $ 3,796,956
Table of Contents
83            Accumulated Other                      
Comprehensive Capital in Common Stock  
Preferred Common Income Excess of Par Accumulated Held in Noncontrolling Total  
Stock Stock (Loss) Value Deficit Treasury Interests Equity  
Exchange of limited partner units ( 24,000
common shares, Note 8) 253 (253) —
Series J preferred stock premium amortization (328) (328)
Stock incentive program ( 90,902  common
shares, net) (16,589 ) 16,589 —
Redemption of limited partner units ( 43,255  units) (6,453 ) (393) (6,846 )
Amortization of stock incentive 12,604 12,604
Treasury stock purchase ( 2,247,074  shares) (359,773 ) (359,773 )
Long-term incentive performance units 20,749 20,749
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 16,336
common shares repurchased) 19 (29,523 ) (2,956 ) 139 (32,321 )
Unrealized loss on hedging activities (3,553 ) (513) (4,066 )
Currency translation adjustments (1,489 ) (361) (1,850 )
Changes in available-for-sale securities and
other 623 95 718
Net loss reclassified from accumulated other
comprehensive loss into earnings 11,832 1,802 13,634
Other comprehensive income 7,413 1,023 8,436
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from
change in ownership in the Operating
Partnership 65,821 (65,821 ) —
Distributions to common stockholders and limited
partners, excluding Operating Partnership
preferred interests (2,558,944 ) (388,541 ) (2,947,485 )
Distribution to other noncontrolling interest
partners (2,446 ) (2,446 )
Net income, excluding $1,915  attributable to
preferred interests in the Operating
Partnership and a $431 loss attributable to
noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties 2,101,584 320,120 2,421,704
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 42,420 $ 32 $ (118,604 )$ 9,756,073 $(5,379,952 )$(1,773,571 )$ 384,852 $ 2,911,250
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
84Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Balance Sheets
(Dollars in thousands, except unit amounts)
    December 31,     December 31,  
2019 2018  
ASSETS:
Investment properties, at cost $37,804,495 $37,092,670
Less — accumulated depreciation  13,905,776  12,884,539
 23,898,719  24,208,131
Cash and cash equivalents  669,373  514,335
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  832,151  763,815
Investment in unconsolidated entities, at equity  2,371,053  2,220,414
Investment in Klépierre, at equity  1,731,649  1,769,488
Right-of-use assets, net 514,660 —
Deferred costs and other assets  1,214,025  1,210,040
Total assets $31,231,630 $30,686,223
LIABILITIES:
Mortgages and unsecured indebtedness $24,163,230 $23,305,535
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenues  1,390,682  1,316,861
Cash distributions and losses in unconsolidated entities, at equity  1,566,294  1,536,111
Lease liabilities 516,809 —
Other liabilities  464,304  500,597
Total liabilities  28,101,319  26,659,104
Commitments and contingencies
Preferred units, various series, at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties  219,061  230,163
EQUITY:
Partners’ Equity
Preferred units, 796,948 units outstanding. Liquidation value of $39,847  42,420  42,748
General Partner, 306,868,960 and 309,017,468 units outstanding, respectively  2,483,978  3,253,933
Limited Partners, 46,740,117 and 46,807,372 units outstanding, respectively  378,339  492,877
Total partners’ equity  2,904,737  3,789,558
Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests in properties, net  6,513  7,398
Total equity  2,911,250  3,796,956
Total liabilities and equity $31,231,630 $30,686,223
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
85Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income
(Dollars in thousands, except per unit amounts)
 For the Year  
 Ended December 31,  
 2019 2018 2017  
REVENUE:           
Lease income $5,243,771 $5,158,420 $5,109,099
Management fees and other revenues  112,942  116,286  121,259
Other income  398,476  370,582  296,978
Total revenue  5,755,189  5,645,288  5,527,336
EXPENSES:
Property operating  453,145  450,636  443,177
Depreciation and amortization  1,340,503  1,282,454  1,275,452
Real estate taxes  468,004  457,740  440,003
Repairs and maintenance  100,495  99,588  96,900
Advertising and promotion  150,344  151,241  150,865
Home and regional office costs  190,109  136,677  135,150
General and administrative  34,860  46,543  51,972
Other  109,898  94,110  131,477
Total operating expenses  2,847,358  2,718,989  2,724,996
OPERATING INCOME BEFORE OTHER ITEMS  2,907,831  2,926,299  2,802,340
Interest expense  (789,353) (815,923) (809,393)
Loss on extinguishment of debt (116,256) — (128,618)
Income and other taxes  (30,054) (36,898) (23,343)
Income from unconsolidated entities  444,349  475,250  400,270
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments (8,212) (15,212) —
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated
entities and impairment, net  14,883  288,827  3,647
CONSOLIDATED NET INCOME  2,423,188  2,822,343  2,244,903
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests  991  11,327  13
Preferred unit requirements  5,252  5,252  5,252
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO UNITHOLDERS $2,416,945 $2,805,764 $2,239,638
NET INCOME ATTRIBUTABLE TO UNITHOLDERS ATTRIBUTABLE TO:
General Partner $2,098,247 $2,436,721 $1,944,625
Limited Partners  318,698  369,043  295,013
Net income attributable to unitholders $2,416,945 $2,805,764 $2,239,638
BASIC AND DILUTED EARNINGS PER UNIT:
Net income attributable to unitholders $ 6.81 $ 7.87 $ 6.24
Consolidated Net Income $2,423,188 $2,822,343 $2,244,903
Unrealized (loss) gain on derivative hedge agreements  (4,066) 21,633  (35,112)
Net loss (gain) reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into earnings 13,634  7,020  (12,122)
Currency translation adjustments  (1,850) (47,038) 45,766
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other  718  373  5,733
Comprehensive income  2,431,624  2,804,331  2,249,168
Comprehensive income attributable to noncontrolling interests  1,422  7,911  2,091
Comprehensive income attributable to unitholders $2,430,202 $2,796,420 $2,247,077
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
86Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows
(Dollars in thousands)
For the Year  
Ended December 31,  
 2019     2018     2017  
CASH FLOWS FROM OPERATING ACTIVITIES:       
Consolidated Net Income $ 2,423,188 $2,822,343 $ 2,244,903
Adjustments to reconcile consolidated net income to net cash provided by
operating activities
Depreciation and amortization  1,394,172  1,349,776  1,357,351
Loss on debt extinguishment 116,256 — 128,618
Gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities and impairment, net  (14,883) (288,827) (3,647)
Gains on sales of marketable securities — — (21,541)
Unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments 8,212 15,212 —
Gain on interest in unconsolidated entity (Note 6) — (35,621) —
Straight-line lease income  (67,139) (18,325) (26,543)
Equity in income of unconsolidated entities  (444,349) (475,250) (400,270)
Distributions of income from unconsolidated entities  428,769  390,137  374,101
Changes in assets and liabilities
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  (157) (17,518) (26,170)
Deferred costs and other assets  (49,338) (75,438) (132,945)
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, deferred revenues and
other liabilities  13,100  84,307  99,931
Net cash provided by operating activities  3,807,831  3,750,796  3,593,788
CASH FLOWS FROM INVESTING ACTIVITIES:
Acquisitions  (12,800) (51,060) (264,488)
Funding of loans to related parties — (4,641) (71,532)
Proceeds on loans to related parties  7,641  —  —
Capital expenditures, net  (876,011) (781,909) (732,100)
Cash impact from the consolidation of properties  1,045  11,276  7,536
Net proceeds from sale of assets 6,776 183,241 19,944
Investments in unconsolidated entities  (63,789) (63,397) (157,173)
Purchase of equity instruments  (374,231) (21,563) (25,000)
Proceeds from sales of equity instruments — 25,000 56,268
Insurance proceeds for property restoration 5,662 19,083 —
Distributions of capital from unconsolidated entities and other  229,000  447,464  405,078
Net cash used in investing activities  (1,076,707) (236,506) (761,467)
CASH FLOWS FROM FINANCING ACTIVITIES:
Issuance of units and other  (328) (329) (328)
Purchase of units related to stock grant recipients' tax withholdings  (2,955) (2,911) (2,789)
Redemption of limited partner units (6,846) (81,506) —
Purchase of general partner units (359,773) (354,108) (407,002)
Distributions to noncontrolling interest holders in properties  (41,549) (76,963) (11,295)
Contributions from noncontrolling interest holders in properties  139  161  382
Partnership distributions  (2,949,401) (2,821,642) (2,571,776)
Cash paid to extinguish debt (99,975) — (128,618)
Mortgage and unsecured indebtedness proceeds, net of transaction costs  13,312,301  7,973,719  11,668,026
Mortgage and unsecured indebtedness principal payments  (12,427,699) (9,118,685) (10,456,671)
Net cash used in financing activities  (2,576,086) (4,482,264) (1,910,071)
INCREASE (DECREASE) IN CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS  155,038  (967,974) 922,250
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, beginning of period  514,335  1,482,309  560,059
CASH AND CASH EQUIVALENTS, end of period $ 669,373 $ 514,335 $ 1,482,309
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
87Simon Property Group, L.P.
Consolidated Statements of Equity
(Dollars in thousands)
Preferred Simon (Managing Limited Noncontrolling Total  
    Units     General Partner)     Partners     Interests     Equity  
Balance at December 31, 2016 $ 43,405 $ 4,267,043 $ 644,348 $ 5,116 $ 4,959,912
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization (328) (328)
Limited partner units exchanged to common units ( 500,411  units) 6,005 (6,005 ) —
Stock incentive program ( 76,660  common shares, net) — —
Amortization of stock incentive 13,911 13,911
Treasury unit purchase ( 2,468,630  units) (407,002 ) (407,002 )
Long-term incentive performance units 38,305 38,305
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 103,941  units and 16,161  common units) (42,036 ) 1 382 (41,653 )
Unrealized loss on hedging activities (30,505 ) (4,607 ) (35,112 )
Currency translation adjustments 39,726 6,040 45,766
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other 4,987 746 5,733
Net gain reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into earnings (10,535 ) (1,587 ) (12,122 )
Other comprehensive income 3,673 592 4,265
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership in the Operating Partnership 84,794 (84,794 ) —
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests classified as temporary equity (3,337 ) (2,227,922 ) (338,602 ) (3,851 ) (2,573,712 )
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity preferred units of $1,915  and a
$2,078  loss attributable to noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties 3,337 1,944,625 295,013 2,091 2,245,066
Balance at December 31, 2017 $ 43,077 $ 3,643,091 $ 548,858 $ 3,738 $ 4,238,764
Issuance of limited partner units ( 475,183  units) 84,103 84,103
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization (329) (329)
Limited partner units exchanged to common units ( 92,732  units) 1,004 (1,004 ) —
Stock incentive program ( 51,756  common units, net) — —
Amortization of stock incentive 12,029 12,029
Redemption of limited partner units ( 454,704  units) (76,555 ) (4,951 ) (81,506 )
Treasury unit purchase ( 2,275,194  units) (354,108 ) (354,108 )
Long-term incentive performance units 26,172 26,172
Cumulative ef fect of accounting change 7,264 7,264
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 18,680  common units) (110,456 ) (2,510 ) (112,966 )
Unrealized gain on hedging activities 18,781 2,852 21,633
Currency translation adjustments (40,766 ) (6,271 ) (47,037)
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other 324 49 373
Net loss reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into earnings 6,097 923 7,020
Other comprehensive income (15,564 ) (2,447 ) (18,011 )
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership in the Operating Partnership 156,241 (156,241 ) —
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests classified as temporary equity (3,337 ) (2,445,734 ) (370,656 ) (1,741 ) (2,821,468 )
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity preferred units of $1,915  and $3,416
attributable to noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties 3,337 2,436,721 369,043 7,911 2,817,012
Balance at December 31, 2018 $ 42,748 $ 3,253,933 $ 492,877 $ 7,398 $ 3,796,956
Series J preferred stock premium and amortization (328) (328)
Limited partner units exchanged to common units ( 24,000  units) 253 (253) —
Stock incentive program ( 90,902  common units, net) — —
Amortization of stock incentive 12,604 12,604
Redemption of limited partner units ( 43,255  units) (6,453 ) (393) (6,846 )
Treasury unit purchase ( 2,247,074  units) (359,773 ) (359,773 )
Long-term incentive performance units 20,749 20,749
Issuance of unit equivalents and other ( 16,336  common units) (32,460 ) 139 (32,321 )
Unrealized loss on hedging activities (3,553 ) (513) (4,066 )
Currency translation adjustments (1,489 ) (361) (1,850 )
Changes in available-for-sale securities and other 623 95 718
Net loss reclassified from accumulated other comprehensive loss into earnings 11,832 1,802 13,634
Other comprehensive income 7,413 1,023 8,436
Adjustment to limited partners' interest from change in ownership in the Operating Partnership 65,821 (65,821 ) —
Distributions, excluding distributions on preferred interests classified as temporary equity (3,337 ) (2,555,607 ) (388,541 ) (2,446 ) (2,949,931 )
Net income, excluding preferred distributions on temporary equity preferred units of $1,915  and a $431
loss attributable to noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties 3,337 2,098,247 318,698 1,422 2,421,704
Balance at December 31, 2019 $ 42,420 $ 2,483,978 $ 378,339 $ 6,513 $ 2,911,250
The accompanying notes are an integral part of these statements.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
881. Organization
Simon Property Group, Inc. is a Delaware corporation that operates as a self-administered and self-managed real estate
investment trust, or REIT, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or the Internal Revenue Code. REITs will
generally not be liable for U.S. federal corporate income taxes as long as they distribute not less than 100% of their REIT
taxable income. Simon Property Group, L.P. is our majority-owned Delaware partnership subsidiary that owns all of our real
estate properties and other assets. Unless stated otherwise or the context otherwise requires, references to "Simon" mean
Simon Property Group, Inc. and references to the "Operating Partnership" mean Simon Property Group, L.P.  References to
"we," "us" and "our" mean collectively Simon, the Operating Partnership and those entities/subsidiaries owned or controlled by
Simon and/or the Operating Partnership. Unless otherwise indicated, these notes to consolidated financial statements apply to
both Simon and the Operating Partnership. According to the Operating Partnership's partnership agreement, the Operating
Partnership is required to pay all expenses of Simon.
We own, develop and manage premier shopping, dining, entertainment and mixed-use destinations, which consist
primarily of malls, Premium Outlets®, and The Mills®.  As of December 31, 2019, we owned or held an interest in 204 income-
producing properties in the United States, which consisted of 106 malls, 69 Premium Outlets, 14 Mills, four lifestyle centers, and
11 other retail properties in 37 states and Puerto Rico. Internationally, as of December 31, 2019, we had ownership interests in
29 Premium Outlets and Designer Outlet properties primarily located in Asia, Europe, and Canada. As of December 31, 2019,
we also owned a 22.2% equity stake in Klépierre SA, or Klépierre, a publicly traded, Paris-based real estate company which
owns, or has an interest in, shopping centers located in 15 countries in Europe.
We generate the majority of our lease income from retail, dining, entertainment and other tenants including consideration
received from:
●Fixed minimum lease consideration and fixed common area maintenance (CAM) reimbursements and,
●Variable lease consideration primarily based on tenants’ sales, as well as reimbursements for real estate taxes,
utilities, marketing, and certain other items.
Revenues of our management company, after intercompany eliminations, consist primarily of management fees that are
typically based upon the revenues of the property being managed.
We also grow by generating supplemental revenues from the following activities:
●establishing our properties as leading market resource providers for retailers and other businesses and consumer-
focused corporate alliances, including payment systems (such as handling fees relating to the sales of bank-issued
prepaid cards), national marketing alliances, static and digital media initiatives, business development, sponsorship,
and events,
●offering property operating services to our tenants and others, including waste handling and facility services, and the
provision of energy services,
●selling or leasing land adjacent to our properties, commonly referred to as “outlots” or “outparcels,” and
●generating interest income on cash deposits and investments in loans, including those made to related entities.  
2. Basis of Presentation and Consolidation
The accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of all controlled subsidiaries, and all significant
intercompany amounts have been eliminated.
We consolidate properties that are wholly-owned or properties where we own less than 100% but we control. Control of a
property is demonstrated by, among other factors, our ability to refinance debt and sell the property without the consent of any
other partner or owner and the inability of any other partner or owner to replace us.
We also consolidate a variable interest entity, or VIE, when we are determined to be the primary beneficiary.
Determination of the primary beneficiary of a VIE is based on whether an entity has (1) the power to direct activities that
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
89most significantly impact the economic performance of the VIE and (2) the obligation to absorb losses or the right to receive
benefits of the VIE that could potentially be significant to the VIE. Our determination of the primary beneficiary of a VIE considers
all relationships between us and the VIE, including management agreements and other contractual arrangements. There have
been no changes during 2019 in previous conclusions about whether an entity qualifies as a VIE or whether we are the primary
beneficiary of any previously identified VIE. During the periods presented, we did not provide financial or other support to any
identified VIE that we were not contractually obligated to provide.
Investments in partnerships and joint ventures represent our noncontrolling ownership interests. We account for these
unconsolidated entities using the equity method of accounting. We initially record these investments at cost and we
subsequently adjust for net equity in income or loss, which we allocate in accordance with the provisions of the applicable
partnership or joint venture agreement, cash contributions and distributions, and foreign currency fluctuations, if applicable. The
allocation provisions in the partnership or joint venture agreements are not always consistent with the legal ownership interests
held by each general or limited partner or joint venture investee primarily due to partner preferences. We separately report
investments in partnerships and joint ventures for which accumulated distributions have exceeded investments in and our share
of net income of the partnerships and joint ventures within cash distributions and losses in partnerships and joint ventures, at
equity in the consolidated balance sheets. The net equity of certain partnerships and joint ventures is less than zero because of
financing or operating distributions that are usually greater than net income, as net income includes non-cash charges for
depreciation and amortization.
As of December 31, 2019, we consolidated 133 wholly-owned properties and 18 additional properties that are less than
wholly-owned, but which we control or for which we are the primary beneficiary. We account for the remaining 82 properties, or
the joint venture properties, as well as our investment in Klépierre, Aéropostale, Authentic Brands Group LLC, or ABG, HBS
Global Properties, or HBS, and Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG, using the equity method of accounting, as we have determined we
have significant influence over their operations. We manage the day-to-day operations of 57 of the 82 joint venture properties,
but have determined that our partner or partners have substantive participating rights with respect to the assets and operations
of these joint venture properties. Our investments in joint ventures in Japan, South Korea, Mexico, Malaysia, Germany, Canada,
and the United Kingdom comprise 21 of the remaining 25 properties. These international properties are managed by joint
ventures in which we share control.
Preferred distributions of the Operating Partnership are accrued at declaration and represent distributions on outstanding
preferred units of partnership interests, or preferred units, and are included in net income attributable to noncontrolling interests.
 We allocate net operating results of the Operating Partnership after preferred distributions to limited partners and to us based
on the partners’ respective weighted average ownership interests in the Operating Partnership. Net operating results of the
Operating Partnership attributable to limited partners are reflected in net income attributable to noncontrolling interests.
Our weighted average ownership interest in the Operating Partnership was as follows:
For the Year Ended  
December 31,  
    2019    2018    2017
Weighted average ownership interest  86.8 %  86.8 %  86.8 %  
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, our ownership interest in the Operating Partnership was 86.8%. We adjust the
noncontrolling limited partners’ interest at the end of each period to reflect their interest in the net assets of the Operating
Partnership.
Preferred unit requirements in the Operating Partnership’s accompanying consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income represent distributions on outstanding preferred units and are recorded when declared.    
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
903. Summary of Significant Accounting Policies
Investment Properties
Investment properties consist of the following as of December 31:
    2019     2018  
Land $3,692,056 $3,673,023
Buildings and improvements  33,664,683  32,994,937
Total land, buildings and improvements  37,356,739  36,667,960
Furniture, fixtures and equipment  447,756  424,710
Investment properties at cost  37,804,495  37,092,670
Less — accumulated depreciation  13,905,776  12,884,539
Investment properties at cost, net $23,898,719 $24,208,131
Construction in progress included above $ 812,982 $ 561,556
We record investment properties at cost. Investment properties include costs of acquisitions; development,
predevelopment, and construction (including allocable salaries and related benefits); tenant allowances and improvements; and
interest and real estate taxes incurred during construction. We capitalize improvements and replacements from repair and
maintenance when the repair and maintenance extends the useful life, increases capacity, or improves the efficiency of the
asset. All other repair and maintenance items are expensed as incurred. We capitalize interest on projects during periods of
construction until the projects are ready for their intended purpose based on interest rates in place during the construction
period. The amount of interest capitalized during each year is as follows:
For the Year Ended  
December 31,  
    2019    2018    2017
Capitalized interest $33,342 $19,871 $24,754
We record depreciation on buildings and improvements utilizing the straight-line method over an estimated original useful
life, which is generally 10 to 35 years. We review depreciable lives of investment properties periodically and we make
adjustments when necessary to reflect a shorter economic life. We amortize tenant allowances and tenant improvements
utilizing the straight-line method over the term of the related lease or occupancy term of the tenant, if shorter. We record
depreciation on equipment and fixtures utilizing the straight-line method over seven to ten years.
We review investment properties for impairment on a property-by-property basis to identify and evaluate events or
changes in circumstances which indicate that the carrying value of investment properties may not be recoverable. These
circumstances include, but are not limited to, declines in a property’s cash flows, ending occupancy or total sales per square
foot. We measure any impairment of investment property when the estimated undiscounted operating income before
depreciation and amortization during the anticipated holding period plus its residual value is less than the carrying value of the
property. To the extent impairment has occurred, we charge to income the excess of carrying value of the property over its
estimated fair value.
We also review our investments, including investments in unconsolidated entities, to identify and evaluate whether events
or changes in circumstances indicate that the carrying amount of our investments may not be recoverable. We will record an
impairment charge if we determine that a decline in the fair value of the investments is other-than-temporary.
Our evaluation of changes in economic or operating conditions may include developing estimates of forecasted cash
flows or operating income before depreciation and amortization to support the recoverability of the carrying amount of the
investment. We estimate undiscounted cash flows and fair value using observable and unobservable data such as operating
income before depreciation and amortization, estimated capitalization and discount rates, or relevant market
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
91multiples, leasing prospects and local market information. Changes in economic and operating conditions that occur subsequent
to our review of recoverability of investment property and other investments could impact the assumptions used in that
assessment and could result in future charges to earnings if assumptions regarding those investments differ from actual results.  
Purchase Accounting
We allocate the purchase price of asset acquisitions and any excess investment in unconsolidated entities to the various
components of the acquisition based upon the relative fair value of each component which may be derived from various
observable or unobservable inputs and assumptions. Also, we may utilize third party valuation specialists. These components
typically include buildings, land and intangibles related to in-place leases and we estimate:
●the relative fair value of land and related improvements and buildings on an as-if-vacant basis,
●the market value of in-place leases based upon our best estimate of current market rents and amortize the resulting
market rent adjustment into lease income,
●the value of costs to obtain tenants, including tenant allowances and improvements and leasing commissions, and
●the value of lease income and recovery of costs foregone during a reasonable lease-up period, as if the space was
vacant.
The relative fair value of buildings is depreciated over the estimated remaining life of the acquired building or related
improvements. We amortize tenant improvements, in-place lease assets and other lease-related intangibles over the remaining
life of the underlying leases. We also estimate the value of other acquired intangible assets, if any, which are amortized over the
remaining life of the underlying related intangibles.
Cash and Cash Equivalents
We consider all highly liquid investments purchased with an original maturity of 90 days or less to be cash and cash
equivalents. Cash equivalents are carried at cost, which approximates fair value. Cash equivalents generally consist of
commercial paper, bankers’ acceptances, Eurodollars, repurchase agreements, and money market deposits or securities.
Financial instruments that potentially subject us to concentrations of credit risk include our cash and cash equivalents and our
trade accounts receivable. We place our cash and cash equivalents with institutions of high credit quality. However, at certain
times, such cash and cash equivalents are in excess of Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation and Securities Investor
Protection Corporation insurance limits. See Notes 4 and 8 for disclosures about non-cash investing and financing transactions.
Equity Instruments and Debt Securities
Equity instruments and debt securities consist primarily of equity instruments, our deferred compensation plan
investments, the debt securities of our captive insurance subsidiary, and certain investments held to fund the debt service
requirements of debt previously secured by investment properties. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, we had equity instruments
with readily determinable fair values of $68.2 million and $78.1 million, respectively. Effective January 1, 2018, changes in fair
value of these equity instruments are recorded in earnings. We recognized a cumulative effect adjustment of $7.3 million as of
January 1, 2018 to reclassify unrealized gains previously reported in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) as a result
of the adoption of Accounting Standards Update (ASU) 2016-01, “Financial Instruments – Overall: Recognition and
Measurement of Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities.” Non-cash mark-to-market adjustments related to an investment we
hold in units of a publicly traded real estate investment trust are included in unrealized losses in fair value of equity instruments
in our consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income. Non-cash mark-to-market adjustments related to other
non-real estate securities with readily determinable fair values for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018 were $5.0
million and nil, respectively, and these losses were recorded in other expense in
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
92our consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income. At December 31, 2019 and 2018, we had equity
instruments without readily determinable fair values of $295.4 million and $175.7 million, respectively, for which we have elected
the measurement alternative under this guidance. We regularly evaluate these investments for any impairment in their estimated
fair value, as well as any observable price changes for an identical or similar equity instrument of the same issuer, and
determined that no material adjustment in the carrying value was required for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018.
On July 26, 2017, we sold our investment in certain equity instruments. The aggregate proceeds received from the sale
were $53.9 million, and we recognized a gain on the sale of $21.5 million, which is included in other income in the accompanying
consolidated statement of operations and comprehensive income for the year ended December 31, 2017.
Our deferred compensation plan equity instruments are valued based upon quoted market prices.  The investments have
a matching liability as the amounts are fully payable to the employees that earned the compensation.  Changes in value of these
securities and changes to the matching liability to employees are both recognized in earnings and, as a result, there is no impact
to consolidated net income.
At December 31, 2019 and 2018, we held debt securities of $52.8 million and $40.1 million, respectively, in our captive
insurance subsidiary. The types of securities included in the investment portfolio of our captive insurance subsidiary are typically
U.S. Treasury or other U.S. government securities as well as corporate debt securities with maturities ranging from less than one
year to ten years. These securities are classified as available-for-sale and are valued based upon quoted market prices or other
observable inputs when quoted market prices are not available. The amortized cost of debt securities, which approximates fair
value, held by our captive insurance subsidiary is adjusted for amortization of premiums and accretion of discounts to maturity.
Changes in the values of these securities are recognized in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) until the gain or
loss is realized or until any unrealized loss is deemed to be other-than-temporary. We review any declines in value of these
securities for other-than-temporary impairment and consider the severity and duration of any decline in value. To the extent an
other-than-temporary impairment is deemed to have occurred, an impairment is recorded and a new cost basis is established.
Our captive insurance subsidiary is required to maintain statutory minimum capital and surplus as well as maintain a
minimum liquidity ratio. Therefore, our access to these securities may be limited.
Fair Value Measurements
Level 1 fair value inputs are quoted prices for identical items in active, liquid and visible markets such as stock
exchanges. Level 2 fair value inputs are observable information for similar items in active or inactive markets, and appropriately
consider counterparty creditworthiness in the valuations. Level 3 fair value inputs reflect our best estimate of inputs and
assumptions market participants would use in pricing an asset or liability at the measurement date. The inputs are unobservable
in the market and significant to the valuation estimate. We have no investments for which fair value is measured on a recurring
basis using Level 3 inputs.
The equity instruments with readily determinable fair values we held at December 31, 2019 and 2018 were primarily
classified as having Level 1 and Level 2 fair value inputs. In addition, we had derivative instruments which were classified as
having Level 2 inputs, which consist primarily of foreign currency forward contracts and interest rate swap agreements with a
gross asset balance of $17.5 million and $10.9 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, and a gross liability
balance of $3.8 million and $6.2 million at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Note 7 includes a discussion of the fair value of debt measured using Level 2 inputs.  Notes 3 and 4 include discussions
of the fair values recorded in purchase accounting using Level 2 and Level 3 inputs.  Level 3 inputs to our purchase accounting
and impairment analyses include our estimations of fair value, net operating results of the property, capitalization rates and
discount rates.
Gains on Issuances of Stock by Equity Method Investees
When one of our equity method investees issues additional shares to third parties, our percentage ownership
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
93interest in the investee may decrease. In the event the issuance price per share is higher or lower than our average carrying
amount per share, we recognize a noncash gain or loss on the issuance, when appropriate. This noncash gain or loss is
recognized in our net income in the period the change of ownership interest occurs.
Use of Estimates
We prepared the accompanying consolidated financial statements in accordance with accounting principles generally
accepted in the United States, or GAAP. GAAP requires us to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts
of assets and liabilities, disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements, and revenues and
expenses during the reported period. Our actual results could differ from these estimates.
Segment and Geographic Locations
Our primary business is the ownership, development, and management of premier shopping, dining, entertainment and
mixed use real estate. We have aggregated our retail operations, including malls, Premium Outlets, The Mills, and our
international investments into one reportable segment because they have similar economic characteristics and we provide
similar products and services to similar types of, and in many cases, the same, tenants.  As of December 31, 2019,
approximately 6.2% of our consolidated long-lived assets and 2.9% of our consolidated total revenues were derived from assets
located outside the United States.  As of December 31, 2018, approximately 6.1% of our consolidated long-lived assets and
3.0% of our consolidated total revenues were derived from assets located outside the United States.
Deferred Costs and Other Assets
Deferred costs and other assets include the following as of December 31:
    2019     2018  
Deferred lease costs, net $ 209,277 $ 249,010
In-place lease intangibles, net  31,417  65,825
Acquired above market lease intangibles, net  44,337  64,813
Marketable securities of our captive insurance companies  52,760  40,099
Goodwill  20,098  20,098
Other marketable and non-marketable securities  363,554  253,732
Prepaids, notes receivable and other assets, net  492,582  516,463
$1,214,025 $1,210,040
Deferred Lease Costs
Our deferred leasing costs consist primarily of initial direct costs and, prior to the adoption of ASC 842, capitalized
salaries and related benefits, in connection with lease originations. We record amortization of deferred leasing costs on a
straight-line basis over the terms of the related leases. Details of these deferred costs as of December 31 are as follows:
    2019     2018  
Deferred lease costs $443,313 $497,570
Accumulated amortization  (234,036 ) (248,560 )
Deferred lease costs, net $209,277 $249,010
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
94Amortization of deferred leasing costs is a component of depreciation and amortization expense. The accompanying
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income include amortization of deferred leasing costs as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,  
    2019     2018     2017  
Amortization of deferred leasing costs $ 57,201 $ 56,646 $ 54,323
Intangibles
The average remaining life of in-place lease intangibles is approximately 2.0 years and is being amortized on a straight-
line basis and is included with depreciation and amortization in the consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive
income. The fair market value of above and below market leases is amortized into lease income over the remaining lease life as
a component of reported lease income. The weighted average remaining life of these intangibles is approximately 2.6 years. The
unamortized amount of below market leases is included in accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles and deferred
revenues in the consolidated balance sheets and was $44.8 million and $66.7 million as of December 31, 2019 and 2018,
respectively. The amount of amortization of above and below market leases, net, which increased lease income for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017, was $1.9 million, $1.0 million and $2.8 million, respectively. If a lease is terminated
prior to the original lease termination, any remaining unamortized intangible is written off to earnings.
Details of intangible assets as of December 31 are as follows:
2019 2018
In-place lease intangibles $196,007 $ 291,613
Accumulated amortization (164,590 ) (225,788 )
In-place lease intangibles, net $31,417 $ 65,825
2019 2018
Acquired above market lease intangibles $252,934 $ 253,973
Accumulated amortization (208,597 ) (189,160 )
Acquired above market lease intangibles, net $44,337 $ 64,813
Estimated future amortization and the increasing (decreasing) effect on lease income for our above and below market
leases as of December 31, 2019 are as follows:
Below Above Impact to
Market Market Lease
Leases Leases Income, Net
2020 $16,943 $(15,642 )$ 1,301  
2021  7,970  (10,226 ) (2,256 )
2022  5,348  (7,421 ) (2,073 )
2023  4,063  (5,388 ) (1,325 )
2024  3,151  (3,645 ) (494)
Thereafter  7,302  (2,015 ) 5,287
$44,777 $(44,337 )$ 440
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
95Derivative Financial Instruments
We record all derivatives on our consolidated balance sheets at fair value. The accounting for changes in the fair value of
derivatives depends on the intended use of the derivative, whether we have designated a derivative as a hedge and whether the
hedging relationship has satisfied the criteria necessary to apply hedge accounting. We may use a variety of derivative financial
instruments in the normal course of business to selectively manage or hedge a portion of the risks associated with our
indebtedness and interest payments. Our objectives in using interest rate derivatives are to add stability to interest expense and
to manage our exposure to interest rate movements. To accomplish this objective, we primarily use interest rate swaps and
caps. We require that hedging derivative instruments be highly effective in reducing the risk exposure that they are designated to
hedge. We formally designate any instrument that meets these hedging criteria as a hedge at the inception of the derivative
contract.  We have no credit-risk-related hedging or derivative activities.
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, we had no outstanding interest rate derivatives. We generally do not apply hedge
accounting to interest rate caps, which had a nominal value as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Our exposure to market risk due to changes in interest rates primarily relates to our long-term debt obligations. We
manage exposure to interest rate market risk through our risk management strategy by a combination of interest rate protection
agreements to effectively fix or cap a portion of variable rate debt. We are also exposed to foreign currency risk on financings of
certain foreign operations. Our intent is to offset gains and losses that occur on the underlying exposures, with gains and losses
on the derivative contracts hedging these exposures. We do not enter into either interest rate protection or foreign currency rate
protection agreements for speculative purposes.
We may enter into treasury lock agreements as part of an anticipated debt issuance. Upon completion of the debt
issuance, the fair value of these instruments is recorded as part of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) and is
amortized to interest expense over the life of the debt agreement.
The unamortized gain on our treasury locks and terminated hedges recorded in accumulated other comprehensive
income (loss) was $10.6 million as of December 31, 2019, compared to an unamortized loss of $3.0 million as of December 31,
2018. Within the next year, we expect to reclassify to earnings approximately $1.9 million of gains related to terminated interest
rate swaps from the current balance held in accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
We are also exposed to fluctuations in foreign exchange rates on financial instruments which are denominated in foreign
currencies, primarily in Yen and Euro.   We use currency forward contracts, cross currency swap contracts, and foreign currency
denominated debt to manage our exposure to changes in foreign exchange rates on certain Yen and Euro-denominated
receivables and net investments.  Currency forward contracts involve fixing the Yen:USD or Euro:USD exchange rate for delivery
of a specified amount of foreign currency on a specified date. The currency forward contracts are typically cash settled in U.S.
dollars for their fair value at or close to their settlement date.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
96We had the following Euro:USD forward contracts designated as net investment hedges at December 31, 2019 and 2018
(in millions):
        Asset (Liability) Value as of
December 31,     December 31, 
Notional Value Maturity Date 2019 2018
€50.0 May 15, 2019 —  (0.8)
€50.0 March 20, 2020 (0.5)  —
€50.0 March 20, 2020 (0.5)  —
€50.0 March 20, 2020 (0.5)  —
€50.0 May 15, 2020 1.5  (1.5)
€100.0 June 18, 2020 (0.6)  —
€90.0 June 18, 2020 (0.5)  —
€100.0 December 18, 2020 (0.6)  —
€100.0 December 18, 2020 (0.6)  —
€50.0 May 14, 2021 1.3  (2.0)
Asset balances in the above table are included in deferred costs and other assets. Liability balances in the above table
are included in other liabilities.
We use a Euro-denominated cross-currency swap agreement to manage our exposure to changes in foreign exchange
rates by swapping $150.0 million of 4.38% fixed rate U.S. dollar-denominated debt to 1.37% fixed rate Euro-denominated debt of
€121.6 million. The cross-currency swap matures on December 1, 2020. The fair value of our cross-currency swap agreement at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 was $14.7 million and $10.9 million, respectively, and is included in deferred costs and other
assets.
We have designated the currency forward contracts and cross-currency swaps as net investment hedges. Accordingly,
we report the changes in fair value in other comprehensive income (loss). Changes in the value of these forward contracts are
offset by changes in the underlying hedged Euro or Yen-denominated joint venture investment.
The total gross accumulated other comprehensive income related to Simon’s derivative activities, including our share of
other comprehensive income from unconsolidated entities, was $41.2 million and $32.9 million as of December 31, 2019 and
2018, respectively. The total gross accumulated other comprehensive income related to the Operating Partnership’s derivative
activities, including our share of the other comprehensive income from unconsolidated entities, was $47.5 million and
$37.9 million as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Noncontrolling Interests
Simon
Details of the carrying amount of our noncontrolling interests are as follows as of December 31:
    2019      2018
Limited partners’  interests in the Operating Partnership $378,339 $492,877
Nonredeemable noncontrolling interests in properties, net  6,513  7,398
Total noncontrolling interests reflected in equity $384,852 $500,275
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
97Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (which includes nonredeemable and redeemable noncontrolling
interests in consolidated properties, limited partners’ interests in the Operating Partnership, and preferred distributions payable
by the Operating Partnership on its outstanding preferred units) is a component of consolidated net income. In addition, the
individual components of other comprehensive income (loss) are presented in the aggregate for both controlling and
noncontrolling interests, with the portion attributable to noncontrolling interests deducted from comprehensive income
attributable to common stockholders.
The Operating Partnership
Our evaluation of the appropriateness of classifying the Operating Partnership’s common units of partnership interest, or
units, held by Simon and the Operating Partnership's limited partners within permanent equity considered several significant
factors. First, as a limited partnership, all decisions relating to the Operating Partnership’s operations and distributions are made
by Simon, acting as the Operating Partnership’s sole general partner. The decisions of the general partner are made by Simon's
Board of Directors or management. The Operating Partnership has no other governance structure. Secondly, the sole asset of
Simon is its interest in the Operating Partnership. As a result, a share of common stock of Simon, or common stock, if owned by
the Operating Partnership, is best characterized as being similar to a treasury share and thus not an asset of the Operating
Partnership.
Limited partners of the Operating Partnership have the right under the Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement to
exchange their units for shares of common stock or cash, as selected by Simon as the sole general partner. Accordingly, we
classify units held by limited partners in permanent equity because Simon may elect to issue shares of common stock to limited
partners exercising their exchange rights rather than using cash. Under the Operating Partnership’s partnership agreement, the
Operating Partnership is required to redeem units held by Simon only when Simon has repurchased shares of common stock.
We classify units held by Simon in permanent equity because the decision to redeem those units would be made by Simon.
Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests (which includes nonredeemable and redeemable noncontrolling
interests in consolidated properties) is a component of consolidated net income.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
98Accumulated Other Comprehensive Income (Loss)
Simon
The total gross accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to Simon’s currency translation adjustment was
($160.4 million) and ($158.9 million) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
The reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) consisted of the following as of December
31:
Affected line item where
2019 2018 2017 net income is presented
Accumulated derivative losses, net $(2,782) $(7,020) $(9,419) Interest expense
(10,852) — — Loss on extinguishment of debt
 1,802  923  1,233 Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests
$(11,832)$(6,097)$(8,186)
Realized gain on sale of marketable
securities $ — $ — $21,541 Other income
 —  —  (2,820)Net income attributable to noncontrolling interests
$ — $ — $18,721
The Operating Partnership
The total gross accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) related to the Operating Partnership’s currency
translation adjustment was ($184.8 million) and ($183.0 million) as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
The reclassifications out of accumulated other comprehensive income (loss) consisted of the following as of December
31:
Affected line item where
2019 2018 2017 net income is presented
Accumulated derivative losses, net $(2,782) $(7,020) $(9,419)Interest expense
(10,852) — — Loss on extinguishment of debt
$(13,634)$(7,020)$(9,419)
Realized gain on sale of marketable
securities $ — $ — $21,541 Other income
Revenue Recognition
We, as a lessor, retain substantially all of the risks and benefits of ownership of the investment properties and account for
our leases as operating leases. We accrue fixed lease income on a straight line basis over the terms of the leases. Substantially
all of our retail tenants are also required to pay overage rents based on sales over a stated base amount during the lease year.
We recognize this variable lease consideration only when each tenant’s sales exceed the applicable sales threshold. We
amortize any tenant inducements as a reduction of lease income utilizing the straight line method over the term of the related
lease or occupancy term of the tenant, if shorter.
We structure our leases to allow us to recover a significant portion of our property operating, real estate taxes, repairs
and maintenance, and advertising and promotion expenses from our tenants. A substantial portion of our leases, other than
those for anchor stores, require the tenant to reimburse us for a substantial portion of our operating expenses, including
common area maintenance, or CAM, real estate taxes and insurance.  Such property operating expenses typically include utility,
insurance, security, janitorial, landscaping, food court and other administrative expenses. This significantly reduces our exposure
to increases in costs and operating expenses resulting from inflation or otherwise. For substantially
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
99all of our leases in the U.S. mall portfolio, we receive a fixed payment from the tenant for the CAM component which is
recognized as lease income on a straight-line basis over the term of the lease beginning with the adoption of ASC 842. When
not reimbursed by the fixed CAM component, CAM expense reimbursements are based on the tenant’s proportionate share of
the allocable operating expenses and CAM capital expenditures for the property. We accrue all variable reimbursements from
tenants for recoverable portions of all of these expenses as variable lease consideration in the period the applicable
expenditures are incurred. We recognize differences between estimated recoveries and the final billed amounts in the
subsequent year. These differences were not material in any period presented. Our advertising and promotional costs are
expensed as incurred.  Provisions for credit losses that are not probable of collection are recognized as a reduction of lease
income.  Refer to note 9 for further disclosure of lease income.
Management Fees and Other Revenues
Management fees and other revenues are generally received from our unconsolidated joint venture properties as well as
third parties. Management fee revenue is earned based on a contractual percentage of joint venture property revenue.
Development fee revenue is earned on a contractual percentage of hard costs to develop a property. Leasing fee revenue is
earned on a contractual per square foot charge based on the square footage of current year leasing activity. We recognize
revenue for these services provided when earned based on the performance criteria.
Revenues from insurance premiums charged to unconsolidated properties are recognized on a pro-rata basis over the
terms of the policies. Insurance losses on these policies and our self-insurance for our consolidated properties are reflected in
property operating expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income and
include estimates for losses incurred but not reported as well as losses pending settlement. Estimates for losses are based on
evaluations by third-party actuaries and management’s estimates. Total insurance reserves for our insurance subsidiaries and
other self-insurance programs as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 approximated $74.5 million and $82.5 million, respectively,
and are included in other liabilities in the consolidated balance sheets. Information related to the securities included in the
investment portfolio of our captive insurance subsidiary is included within the “Equity Instruments and Debt Securities” section
above.
Income Taxes
Simon and certain subsidiaries of the Operating Partnership have elected to be taxed as REITs under Sections 856
through 860 of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable Treasury regulations relating to REIT qualification. In order to maintain
this REIT status, the regulations require the entity to distribute at least 90% of REIT taxable income to its owners and meet
certain other asset and income tests as well as other requirements. We intend to continue to adhere to these requirements and
maintain Simon’s REIT status and that of the REIT subsidiaries. As REITs, these entities will generally not be liable for U.S.
federal corporate income taxes as long as they distribute not less than 100% of their REIT taxable income. Thus, we made no
provision for U.S. federal income taxes for these entities in the accompanying consolidated financial statements. If Simon or any
of the REIT subsidiaries fail to qualify as a REIT, and if available relief provisions do not apply, Simon or that entity will be subject
to tax at regular corporate rates for the years in which it failed to qualify. If Simon or any of the REIT subsidiaries loses its REIT
status it could not elect to be taxed as a REIT for four taxable years following the year during which qualification was lost unless
the failure to qualify was due to reasonable cause and certain other conditions were satisfied.
We have also elected taxable REIT subsidiary, or TRS, status for some of our subsidiaries. This enables us to provide
services that would otherwise be considered impermissible for REITs and participate in activities that do not qualify as “rents
from real property”. For these entities, deferred tax assets and liabilities are established for temporary differences between the
financial reporting basis and the tax basis of assets and liabilities at the enacted tax rates expected to be in effect when the
temporary differences reverse. A valuation allowance for deferred tax assets is provided if we believe all or some portion of the
deferred tax asset may not be realized. An increase or decrease in the valuation allowance that results from the change in
circumstances that causes a change in our judgment about the realizability of the related deferred tax asset is included in
income.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
100As a partnership, the allocated share of the Operating Partnership’s income or loss for each year is included in the
income tax returns of the partners; accordingly, no accounting for income taxes is required in the accompanying consolidated
financial statements other than as discussed above for our TRSs.
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, we had net deferred tax liabilities of $257.7 million and $278.3 million, respectively,
which primarily relate to the temporary differences between the carrying value of balance sheet assets and liabilities and their
tax bases. These differences were primarily created through the consolidation of various European assets in 2016. Additionally,
we have deferred tax liabilities related to our TRSs, consisting of operating losses and other carryforwards for U.S. federal
income tax purposes as well as the timing of the deductibility of losses or reserves from insurance subsidiaries, though these
amounts are not material to the financial statements. The net deferred tax liability is included in other liabilities in the
accompanying consolidated balance sheets.  
We are also subject to certain other taxes, including state and local taxes, franchise taxes, as well as income-based and
withholding taxes on dividends from certain of our international investments, which are included in income and other taxes in the
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  
Corporate Expenses
Home and regional office costs primarily include compensation and personnel related costs, travel, building and office
costs, and other expenses for our corporate home office and regional offices.  General and administrative expense primarily
includes executive compensation, benefits and travel expenses as well as costs of being a public company, including certain
legal costs, audit fees, regulatory fees, and certain other professional fees.
New Accounting Pronouncements
In February 2016, the Financial Accounting Standards Board (FASB) issued ASU 2016-02, "Leases," codified as
Accounting Standards Codification (ASC) 842, which results in lessees recognizing most leased assets and corresponding lease
liabilities on the balance sheet.  Certain refinements were made to lessor accounting to conform the standard with the recently
issued revenue recognition guidance in ASU 2014-09, “Revenue From Contracts With Customers”, specifically related to the
allocation and recognition of contract consideration earned from lease and non-lease revenue components. ASC 842 also limits
the capitalization of leasing costs to initial direct costs, which, if applied in 2018, would have reduced our capitalized leasing
costs and correspondingly increased expenses by approximately $45 million.
Substantially all of our revenues and the revenues of our equity method investments in real estate are earned from
arrangements that are within the scope of ASC 842. On July 30, 2018, the FASB issued ASU 2018-11, also codified as ASC 842,
which created a practical expedient that provides lessors an option not to separate lease and non-lease components when
certain criteria are met and instead account for those components as a single lease component.  We determined that our lease
arrangements meet the criteria under the practical expedient to account for lease and non-lease components as a single lease
component, which alleviates the requirement upon adoption of ASC 842 that we reallocate or separately present consideration
from lease and non-lease components. On January 1, 2019, we began recognizing consideration received from fixed common
area maintenance arrangements on a straight-line basis as this consideration is attributed to the lease component.  
Further, ASC 842 requires recognition on our consolidated balance sheets of leases of land and other arrangements
where we are the lessee. Upon adoption on January 1, 2019, we recognized a right of use asset and corresponding lease
liability of $524.0 million representing the present value of future lease payments required under our lessee arrangements. We
utilized lease terms ranging from 2019 to 2090 including periods for which exercising an extension option is reasonably assured,
and discount rates from 3.97% to 5.52% when determining the present value of future lease payments. All of our existing lessee
arrangements upon adoption continue to be classified as operating leases and the pattern of lease expense recognition is
unchanged. Refer to note 10 for further disclosure regarding ground leases and office leases recognized as a result of the
adoption of ASC 842.
In June 2016, the FASB issued ASU 2016-13, "Financial Instruments - Credit Losses," which introduced new guidance for
an approach based on expected losses to estimate credit losses on certain types of financial instruments. It
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
101also modifies the impairment model for available-for-sale debt securities and provides for a simplified accounting model for
purchased financial assets with credit deterioration since their origination. Instruments in scope include loans, held-to-maturity
debt securities, and net investments in leases as well as reinsurance and trade receivables. In November 2018, the FASB
issued ASU 2018-19, which clarifies that operating lease receivables are outside the scope of the new standard. This standard
will be effective for us in fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2019. There was no impact on our consolidated financial
statements at adoption.
4. Real Estate Acquisitions and Dispositions
We acquire interests in properties to generate both current income and long-term appreciation in value. We acquire
interests in individual properties or portfolios of real estate companies that meet our investment criteria and sell properties which
no longer meet our strategic criteria. Unless otherwise noted below, gains and losses on these transactions are included in gain
on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying
consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income. We capitalize asset acquisition costs and expense costs
related to business combinations, as well as disposition related costs as they are incurred. We incurred a minimal amount of
transaction expenses during 2019, 2018, and 2017.
Our consolidated and unconsolidated acquisition and disposition activity for the periods presented are as follows:
2019 Acquisitions
On September 19, 2019, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to one of our properties for cash
consideration of $12.8 million. As of closing, the property was subject to a $21.5 million, 4.02% variable rate mortgage. We
accounted for this transaction as an asset acquisition and substantially all our investment relates to investment property.
2018 Acquisitions
On September 25, 2018, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at Orange from our joint venture partner.
The Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units, or approximately $84.1 million, as consideration for the acquisition. The
property is subject to a $215.0 million 4.22% fixed rate mortgage loan.  We accounted for this transaction as an asset acquisition
and substantially all of our investment has been determined to relate to investment property.
2017 Acquisitions
On April 21, 2017, our controlled European investee acquired a 100% interest in an outlet center in Roosendaal,
Netherlands for cash consideration of $69.8 million and the assumption of existing mortgage debt of $40.1 million. In May 2017,
the assumed loan was refinanced with a $69.0 million mortgage loan due in 2024, after available extension options, with an
interest rate of EURIBOR plus 1.85%.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
1022019 Dispositions
During 2019, we disposed of our interests in one multi-family residential investment. Our share of the gross proceeds on
this transaction was $17.9 million. Our share of the gain of $16.2 million is included in other income in the accompanying
consolidated statement of operation and comprehensive income. We also recorded net gains of $62.1 million, primarily related to
Klépierre’s disposition of its interests in certain shopping centers, as discussed in Note 6 to the consolidated financial
statements.
2018 Dispositions
During 2018, we recorded net gains of $288.8 million primarily related to disposition activity which included the
foreclosure of two consolidated retail properties in satisfaction of their $200.0 million and $80.0 million non-recourse mortgage
loans and, as discussed in Note 6, our interest in the German department store properties owned through our investment in HBS
was sold during the fourth quarter of 2018. Also, as discussed further in Note 6, Klépierre disposed of its interests in certain
shopping centers during 2018, resulting in a gain of which our share was $20.2 million.
2017 Dispositions
During 2017, we disposed of our interest in one unconsolidated retail property. The loss recognized on this transaction
was approximately $1.3 million. As discussed in Note 6, Klépierre disposed of its interests in certain shopping centers during the
second quarter, resulting in a gain of which our share was $5.0 million.  
5. Per Share and Per Unit Data
We determine basic earnings per share and basic earnings per unit based on the weighted average number of shares of
common stock or units, as applicable, outstanding during the period and we consider any participating securities for purposes of
applying the two-class method. We determine diluted earnings per share and diluted earnings per unit based on the weighted
average number of shares of common stock or units, as applicable, outstanding combined with the incremental weighted
average number of shares or units, as applicable, that would have been outstanding assuming all potentially dilutive securities
were converted into shares of common stock or units, as applicable, at the earliest date possible. The following tables set forth
the computation of basic and diluted earnings per share and basic and diluted earnings per unit.
Simon
For the Year Ended December 31,  
 2019 2018 2017  
Net Income attributable to Common
Stockholders — Basic and Diluted  $ 2,098,247     $ 2,436,721     $ 1,944,625
Weighted Average Shares Outstanding — Basic
and Diluted  307,950,112  309,627,178  311,517,345
For the year ended December 31, 2019, potentially dilutive securities include units that are exchangeable for common
stock and long-term incentive performance units, or LTIP units, granted under our long-term incentive performance programs
that are convertible into units and exchangeable for common stock. No securities had a material dilutive effect for the years
ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017. We have not adjusted net income attributable to common stockholders and
weighted average shares outstanding for income allocable to limited partners or units, respectively, as doing so would have no
dilutive impact. We accrue dividends when they are declared.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
103The Operating Partnership
For the Year Ended December 31, 
 2019 2018 2017
Net Income attributable to Unitholders — Basic
and Diluted  $ 2,416,945     $ 2,805,764     $ 2,239,638
Weighted Average Units Outstanding — Basic and
Diluted  354,724,019  356,520,452  358,776,632
For the year ended December 31, 2019, potentially dilutive securities include LTIP units. No securities had a material
dilutive effect for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017. We accrue distributions when they are declared.
The taxable nature of the dividends declared and Operating Partnership distributions declared for each of the years
ended as indicated is summarized as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,  
    2019     2018     2017 
Total dividends/distributions paid per common share/unit     $8.30     $7.90     $7.15
Percent taxable as ordinary income  100.00 %   96.20 %   100.00 %
Percent taxable as long-term capital gains  0.00 %   3.80 %   0.00 %
 100.00 %   100.00 %   100.00 %
In the first quarter of 2020, Simon’s Board of Directors declared a quarterly cash dividend of $2.10 per share of common
stock payable on February 28, 2020 to stockholders of record on February 14, 2020. The Operating Partnership’s distribution
rate on its units is equal to the dividend rate on Simon’s common stock.
6. Investments in Unconsolidated Entities and International Investments
Real Estate Joint Ventures and Investments
Joint ventures are common in the real estate industry. We use joint ventures to finance properties, develop new
properties and diversify our risk in a particular property or portfolio of properties.  As discussed in Note 2, we held joint venture
interests in 82 properties as of December 31, 2019 and 81 properties as of December 31, 2018.
Certain of our joint venture properties are subject to various rights of first refusal, buy-sell provisions, put and call rights,
or other sale or marketing rights for partners which are customary in real estate joint venture agreements and the industry. We
and our partners in these joint ventures may initiate these provisions (subject to any applicable lock up or similar restrictions),
which may result in either the sale of our interest or the use of available cash or borrowings, or the use of limited partnership
interests in the Operating Partnership, to acquire the joint venture interest from our partner.
We may provide financing to joint ventures primarily in the form of interest bearing construction loans. As of December
31, 2019 and 2018, we had construction loans and other advances to related parties totaling $78.4 million and $85.8 million,
respectively, which are included in deferred costs and other assets in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets.
Unconsolidated Entity Transactions
On October 16, 2019, we contributed approximately $276.8 million consisting of cash and the Shop Premium Outlets, or
SPO, assets for a 45% noncontrolling interest in Rue Gilt Groupe, or RGG, to create a new multi-platform venture dedicated to
digital value shopping.  We attributed substantially all of our investment to goodwill and certain amortizing and non-amortizing
intangibles.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
104On September 19, 2019, as discussed in note 4, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in a hotel adjacent to one of our
properties from our joint venture partner. As a result of this acquisition, we now own 100% of this property.
During the first quarter of 2019, we disposed of our interests in a multi-family residential investment. Our share of the
gross proceeds was $17.9 million. The gain of $16.2 million is included in other income in the accompanying consolidated
statement of operations and comprehensive income.
On September 25, 2018, as discussed in Note 4, we acquired the remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at Orange from
our joint venture partner.  The Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units at a price of $176.99 to acquire this remaining
interest.  As a result of this acquisition, we now own 100% of this property.
As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, we had an 11.7%noncontrolling equity interest in HBS, a joint venture we formed
with Hudson’s Bay Company. In the fourth quarter of 2019, we recorded an impairment charge of $47.2 million to reduce our
investment in HBS to its estimated fair value.  During the fourth quarter of 2018, our interest in the German department store
properties was sold to Hudson’s Bay Company and SIGNA Retail Holdings resulting in a gain of $91.1 million. These amounts
are included in gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in
the consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  Our share of net (loss) income, net of amortization of
our excess investment excluding impairment, was ($16.2) million and $15.1 million for the year ended December 31, 2019 and
2018, respectively.  Total revenues, operating income before other items and consolidated net (loss) income were approximately
$133.4 million, $26.5 million and ($24.7) million, respectively, for the year ended December 31, 2019 and $326.3 million, $196.3
million, and $105.9 million, respectively for the year ended December 31, 2018.
On June 7, 2018, Aventura Mall, a property in which we own a noncontrolling 33.3% interest, refinanced its $1.2 billion
mortgage loan and its $200.8 million construction loan with a $1.75 billion mortgage loan at a fixed interest rate of 4.12% that
matures on July 1, 2028.  An early repayment charge of $30.9 million was incurred at the property, which along with the write-off
of deferred debt issuance costs of $6.5 million, is included in interest expense in the accompanying combined joint venture
statements of operations.  Our $12.5 million share of the charge associated with the repayment is included in income from
unconsolidated entities in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  Excess
proceeds from the financing were distributed to the venture partners.
In May 2017, Colorado Mills, a property in which we have a noncontrolling 37.5% interest, sustained significant hail
damage.  During the second quarter of 2017, the property recorded an impairment charge of approximately $32.5 million based
on the net carrying value of the assets damaged, which was fully offset by anticipated insurance recoveries.  As of December 31,
2019, the property had received business interruption proceeds and also property damage proceeds of $67.9 million, which
resulted in the property recording a $3.0 million gain in 2019. As of December 31, 2018, the property had received business
interruption proceeds and also property damage proceeds of $65.9 million, which resulted in the property recording a $33.4
million gain in 2018.  For the periods ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, our $1.1 million and $12.5 million share
of the gain is reflected within the gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and
impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
In 2016, we and a group of co-investors acquired certain assets and liabilities of Aéropostale, a retailer of apparel and
accessories, out of bankruptcy.  The interests were acquired through two separate joint ventures, a licensing venture and an
operating venture.  In April 2018, we contributed our entire interest in the licensing venture in exchange for additional interests in
ABG, a brand development, marketing, and entertainment company.  As a result, we recognized a $35.6 million non-cash gain
representing the increase in value of our previously held interest in the licensing venture, which is included in other income in the
accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.  At December 31, 2019, our noncontrolling
equity method interests in the operations venture of Aéropostale and in ABG were 44.95% and 5.40%, respectively.
International Investments
We conduct our international operations primarily through joint venture arrangements and account for the majority of
these international joint venture investments using the equity method of accounting.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
105European Investments  
At December 31, 2019, we owned 63,924,148 shares, or approximately 22.2%, of Klépierre, which had a quoted market
price of $37.96 per share.  Our share of net income, net of amortization of our excess investment, was $145.2 million, $98.8
million and $50.0 million for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively. Based on applicable Euro:USD
exchange rates and after our conversion of Klépierre’s results to GAAP, Klépierre’s total assets, total liabilities, and
noncontrolling interests were $19.6 billion, $12.9 billion, and $1.3 billion, respectively, as of December 31, 2019 and
$20.0 billion, $12.7 billion, and $1.4 billion, respectively, as of December 31, 2018. Klépierre’s total revenues, operating income
before other items and consolidated net income were approximately $1.5 billion, $626.3 million and $655.5 million, respectively,
for the year ended December 31, 2019, $1.6 billion, $670.4 million and $693.0 million, respectively, for the year ended
December 31, 2018, and $1.5 billion, $545.7 million and $381.3 million, respectively, for the year ended December 31, 2017.
During the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, Klépierre completed the disposal of its interests in certain
shopping centers. In connection with these disposals, we recorded gains of $58.6 million, $20.2 million and $5.0 million,
respectively, representing our share of the gains recognized by Klépierre, which is included in gain on sale or disposal of, or
recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements
of operations and comprehensive income.
We have an interest in a European investee that had interests in nine Designer Outlet properties, of which six are
consolidated by us, as of December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively. As of December 31, 2019, our legal percentage
ownership interests in these properties ranged from 45% to 94%. Due to certain redemption rights held by our venture partner,
which will require us to purchase their interests under certain circumstances, the noncontrolling interest is presented (i) in the
accompanying Simon consolidated balance sheets outside of equity in limited partners’ preferred interest in the Operating
Partnership and noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties and (ii) in the accompanying Operating Partnership
consolidated balance sheets within preferred units, various series, at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable interests
in properties.
On April 7, 2017, this European investee acquired an additional 15.7% investment in the Roermond Designer Outlets
Phase 4 expansion for cash consideration of approximately $17.9 million, bringing its total noncontrolling interest in the
expansion to 51.3%.
On April 21, 2017, this European investee acquired a 100% interest in an outlet center in Roosendaal, Netherlands for
cash consideration of $69.8 million and the assumption of existing mortgage debt of $40.1 million. In May 2017, the assumed
loan was refinanced with a $69.0 million mortgage loan due in 2024, after available extension options, with an interest rate of
EURIBOR plus 1.85%. Substantially all of our investment has been determined to relate to investment property based on
estimated fair value at the acquisition date.
In addition, we have a 50.0% noncontrolling interest in a European property management and development company that
provides services to the Designer Outlet properties.
We also have minority interests in Value Retail PLC and affiliated entities, which own or have interests in and operate
nine luxury outlets located throughout Europe and we also have a direct minority ownership in three of those outlets. At
December 31, 2019 and 2018, the carrying value of these equity instruments without readily determinable fair values was
$140.8 million and is included in deferred costs and other assets.
Asian Joint Ventures  
We conduct our international Premium Outlet operations in Japan through a joint venture with Mitsubishi Estate Co., Ltd.
We have a 40%noncontrolling ownership interest in this joint venture. The carrying amount of our investment in this joint venture
was $212.1 million and $232.1 million as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, including all related components of
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss). We conduct our international Premium Outlet operations in South Korea
through a joint venture with Shinsegae International Co. We have a 50% noncontrolling ownership interest in this joint venture.
The carrying amount of our investment in this joint venture was
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
106$173.9 million and $166.3 million as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively, including all related components of
accumulated other comprehensive income (loss).
Summary Financial Information
A summary of the combined balance sheets and statements of operations of our equity method investments and share of
income from such investments, excluding Klépierre, Aéropostale, ABG, HBS, and RGG, follows.
COMBINED BALANCE SHEETS
    December 31,     December 31,  
2019 2018  
Assets:
Investment properties, at cost $19,525,665 $18,807,449
Less - accumulated depreciation  7,407,627  6,834,633
 12,118,038  11,972,816
Cash and cash equivalents  1,015,864  1,076,398
Tenant receivables and accrued revenue, net  510,157  445,148
Right-of-use assets, net 185,302 —
Deferred costs and other assets  384,663  390,818
Total assets $14,214,024 $13,885,180
Liabilities and Partners’  Deficit:
Mortgages $15,391,781 $15,235,415
Accounts payable, accrued expenses, intangibles, and deferred revenue  977,112  976,311
Lease liabilities 186,594 —
Other liabilities  338,412  344,205
Total liabilities  16,893,899  16,555,931
Preferred units  67,450  67,450
Partners’  deficit  (2,747,325 ) (2,738,201 )
Total liabilities and partners’  deficit $14,214,024 $13,885,180
Our Share of:
Partners’  deficit $(1,196,926 )$(1,168,216 )
Add: Excess Investment  1,525,903  1,594,198
Our net Investment in unconsolidated entities, at equity $ 328,977 $ 425,982
“Excess Investment” represents the unamortized difference of our investment over our share of the equity in the
underlying net assets of the joint ventures or other investments acquired and has been determined to relate to the fair value of
the investment properties, intangible assets, including goodwill, and debt premiums and discounts. We amortize excess
investment over the life of the related depreciable components of assets acquired, typically no greater than 40 years, the terms
of the applicable leases, the estimated useful lives of the finite lived intangibles, and the applicable debt maturity, respectively.
The amortization is included in the reported amount of income from unconsolidated entities.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
107As of December 31, 2019, scheduled principal repayments on these joint venture properties’ mortgage indebtedness are
as follows:
2020 $ 946,309
2021  2,476,864
2022  1,927,938
2023  1,267,179
2024  2,297,118
Thereafter  6,512,206
Total principal maturities  15,427,614
Debt issuance costs (35,833 )
Total mortgages $15,391,781
This debt becomes due in installments over various terms extending through 2035 with interest rates ranging from 0.18%
to 10.53% and a weighted average interest rate of 3.94% at December 31, 2019.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
108COMBINED STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS
 
December 31, 
 2019     2018     2017  
REVENUE:                     
Lease income $3,088,594 $3,045,668 $2,933,655
Other income  322,398  326,575  290,515
Total revenue  3,410,992  3,372,243  3,224,170
OPERA TING EXPENSES:
Property operating  587,062  590,921  551,885
Depreciation and amortization  681,764  652,968  640,286
Real estate taxes  266,013  259,567  245,646
Repairs and maintenance  85,430  87,408  81,309
Advertising and promotion  89,660  87,349  86,480
Other  196,178  187,292  184,037
Total operating expenses  1,906,107  1,865,505  1,789,643
Operating Income Before Other Items  1,504,885  1,506,738  1,434,527
Interest expense  (636,988 ) (663,693 ) (593,062 )
Gain (loss) on sale or disposal of, or recovery on, assets and interests in
unconsolidated entities, net 24,609 33,367 (2,239 )
Net Income $892,506 $876,412 $839,226
Third-Party Investors’  Share of Net Income $460,696 $436,767 $424,533
Our Share of Net Income $431,810 $439,645 $414,693
Amortization of Excess Investment  (83,556 ) (85,252 ) (89,804 )
Our Share of Gain on Sale or Disposal of Assets and Interests in
Other Income in the Consolidated Financial Statements (9,156 ) — —
Our Share of (Gain) Loss on Sale or Disposal of, or Recovery on,
Assets and Interests in Unconsolidated Entities, net  (1,133 ) (12,513 ) 1,342
Income from Unconsolidated Entities $337,965 $341,880 $326,231
Our share of income from unconsolidated entities in the above table, aggregated with our share of results of Klépierre,
Aéropostale, ABG, HBS, and RGG, is presented in income from unconsolidated entities in the accompanying consolidated
statements of operations and comprehensive income.  Unless otherwise noted, our share of the gain (loss) on sale or disposal
of, or recovery on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities, net is reflected within gain on sale or disposal of, or recovery
on, assets and interests in unconsolidated entities and impairment, net in the accompanying consolidated statements of
operations and comprehensive income.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
1097. Indebtedness
Our mortgages and unsecured indebtedness, excluding the impact of derivative instruments, consist of the following as of
December 31:
    2019     2018  
Fixed-Rate Debt:
Mortgage notes, including $ 6,775  and $ 11,822  of net premiums and $ 15,195  and
$14,522  of debt issuance costs, respectively . Weighted average interest and
maturity of 3.87% and 4.8 years at December 31, 2019. $6,156,595 $6,099,787
Unsecured notes, including $ 54,976  and $ 44,691  of net discounts and $ 70,297  and
$58,822  of debt issuance costs, respectively . Weighted average interest and
maturity of 3.07% and 9.3 years at December 31, 2019.  15,747,267  15,535,468
Commercial Paper (see below) 1,327,050 758,681
Total Fixed-Rate Debt  23,230,912  22,393,936
Variable-Rate Debt:
Mortgages notes, including $ 4,721  and $ 5,901  of debt issuance costs, respectively .
Weighted average interest and maturity of 2.62% and 2.0 years at December 31,
2019.  751,130  736,274
Credit Facility (see below), including $11,067  and $16,930  of debt issuance costs,
respectively , at December 31, 2019.  113,933  108,070
Total V ariable-Rate Debt  865,063  844,344
Other Debt Obligations  67,255  67,255
Total Mortgages and Unsecured Indebtedness $24,163,230 $23,305,535
General.  Our unsecured debt agreements contain financial covenants and other non-financial covenants. If we were to
fail to comply with these covenants, after the expiration of the applicable cure periods, the debt maturity could be accelerated or
other remedies could be sought by the lender, including adjustments to the applicable interest rate. As of December 31, 2019,
we were in compliance with all covenants of our unsecured debt.
At December 31, 2019, our consolidated subsidiaries were the borrowers under 46 non-recourse mortgage notes secured
by mortgages on 50 properties and other assets, including two separate pools of cross-defaulted and cross-collateralized
mortgages encumbering a total of five properties. Under these cross-default provisions, a default under any mortgage included
in the cross-defaulted pool may constitute a default under all mortgages within that pool and may lead to acceleration of the
indebtedness due on each property within the pool. Certain of our secured debt instruments contain financial and other non-
financial covenants which are specific to the properties that serve as collateral for that debt. If the applicable borrower under
these non-recourse mortgage notes were to fail to comply with these covenants, the lender could accelerate the debt and
enforce its rights against their collateral. At December 31, 2019, the applicable borrowers under these non-recourse mortgage
notes were in compliance with all covenants where non-compliance could individually or in the aggregate, giving effect to
applicable cross-default provisions, have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, liquidity or results of operations.
Unsecured Debt
At December 31, 2019, our unsecured debt consisted of $15.9 billion of senior unsecured notes of the Operating
Partnership, $125.0 million outstanding under the Operating Partnership’s $4.0 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or
Credit Facility, and $1.3 billion outstanding under the Operating Partnership’s global unsecured commercial paper program, or
Commercial Paper program.  
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
110On December 31, 2019, we had an aggregate available borrowing capacity of $6.0 billion under the Credit Facility and
the Operating Partnership’s $3.5 billion unsecured revolving credit facility, or Supplemental Facility, and together with the Credit
Facility, the Credit Facilities. The maximum aggregate outstanding balance under the Credit Facilities during the year ended
December 31, 2019 was $130.7 million and the weighted average outstanding balance was $125.1 million. Letters of credit of
$11.4 million were outstanding under the Credit Facilities as of December 31, 2019.
The Credit Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $4.0 billion may be increased to $5.0 billion during its term and provides
for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars.  Borrowings in
currencies other than the U.S. dollar are limited to 95% of the maximum revolving credit amount, as defined.  The initial maturity
date of the Credit Facility is June 30, 2021 and can be extended for an additional year to June 30, 2022 at our sole option,
subject to our continued compliance with the terms thereof.  The base interest rate on the Credit Facility is LIBOR plus 77.5
basis points with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points.
The Supplemental Facility’s initial borrowing capacity of $3.5 billion may be increased to $4.5 billion during its term and
provides for borrowings denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro, Yen, Sterling, Canadian dollars and Australian dollars. The initial
maturity date of the Supplemental Facility was extended to June 30, 2022 and can be extended for an additional year to June
30, 2023 at our sole option, subject to our continued compliance with the terms thereof. The base interest rate on the
Supplemental Facility is LIBOR plus 77.5 basis points, with an additional facility fee of 10 basis points.
The Operating Partnership also has available a Commercial Paper program of $2.0 billion, or the non-U.S. dollar
equivalent thereof. The Operating Partnership may issue unsecured commercial paper notes, denominated in U.S. dollars, Euro
and other currencies. Notes issued in non-U.S. currencies may be issued by one or more subsidiaries of the Operating
Partnership and are guaranteed by the Operating Partnership. Notes will be sold under customary terms in the U.S. and Euro
commercial paper note markets and rank (either by themselves or as a result of the guarantee described above) pari passu with
the Operating Partnership's other unsecured senior indebtedness. The Commercial Paper program is supported by the Credit
Facilities and if necessary or appropriate, we may make one or more draws under either of the Credit Facilities to pay amounts
outstanding from time to time on the Commercial Paper program. On December 31, 2019, we had $1.3 billion outstanding under
the Commercial Paper program, of which $1.0 billion was comprised of U.S. dollar denominated notes with a weighted average
interest rate of 1.72% and $269.2 million was comprised of Euro denominated notes with a weighted average interest rate of
(0.38%).  These borrowings have a weighted average maturity date of March 6, 2020 and reduce amounts otherwise available
under the Credit Facilities.
On February 1, 2019, the Operating Partnership repaid at maturity $600.0 million of senior unsecured notes with a fixed
interest rate of 2.20%.
On September 13, 2019 the Operating Partnership completed the issuance of the following senior unsecured notes: $1.0
billion with a fixed interest rate of 2.00%, $1.25 billion with a fixed interest rate of 2.45%, and $1.25 billion with a fixed interest
rate of 3.25%, with maturity dates of September 13 of 2024, 2029, and 2049, respectively. Proceeds from the unsecured notes
offering funded the early redemption of senior unsecured notes in October 2019, as discussed below, and repaid a portion of the
indebtedness outstanding under the Commercial Paper program.
On October 7, 2019, the Operating Partnership completed the early redemption of its $900 million 4.375% notes due
March 1, 2021, $700 million 4.125% notes due December 1, 2021, $600 million 3.375% notes due March 15, 2022 and €375
million of the €750 million 2.375% notes due October 2, 2020.  We recorded a $116.3 million loss on extinguishment of debt in
the fourth quarter as a result of the early redemption.
Mortgage Debt
Total mortgage indebtedness was $6.9 billion and $6.8 billion at December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
111Debt Maturity and Other
Our scheduled principal repayments on indebtedness as of December 31, 2019 are as follows:
2020 $2,857,060 (1)
2021  1,541,478
2022  2,872,980
2023  1,868,669
2024  2,896,466
Thereafter  12,208,803
Total principal maturities  24,245,456
Net unamortized debt premium  6,775
Net unamortized debt discount (54,976 )
Debt issuance costs, net  (101,280 )
Other Debt Obligations 67,255
Total mortgages and unsecured indebtedness $24,163,230
(1) Includes $1.3 billion in Global Commercial Paper.
Our cash paid for interest in each period, net of any amounts capitalized, was as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,  
    2019     2018     2017  
Cash paid for interest $803,728 $811,971 $814,729
Debt Issuance Costs
Our debt issuance costs consist primarily of financing fees we incurred in order to obtain long-term financing. We record
amortization of debt issuance costs on a straight-line basis over the terms of the respective loans or agreements. Details of
those debt issuance costs as of December 31 are as follows:
    2019     2018
Debt issuance costs $187,514 $204,189
Accumulated amortization (86,234 ) (108,014 )
Debt issuance costs, net $101,280 $ 96,175
We report amortization of debt issuance costs, amortization of premiums, and accretion of discounts as part of interest
expense. We amortize debt premiums and discounts, which are included in mortgages and unsecured indebtedness, over the
remaining terms of the related debt instruments. These debt premiums or discounts arise either at the time of the debt issuance
or as part of purchase accounting for the fair value of debt assumed in acquisitions. The accompanying consolidated statements
of operations and comprehensive income include amortization as follows:
For the Year Ended December 31,
    2019    2018     2017
Amortization of debt issuance costs $21,499 $21,445 $21,707
Amortization of debt discounts/(premiums) 1,571 1,618 1,357
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
112Fair Value of Debt
The carrying value of our variable-rate mortgages and other loans approximates their fair values. We estimate the fair
values of consolidated fixed-rate mortgages using cash flows discounted at current borrowing rates and other indebtedness
using cash flows discounted at current market rates. We estimate the fair values of consolidated fixed-rate unsecured notes
using quoted market prices, or, if no quoted market prices are available, we use quoted market prices for securities with similar
terms and maturities. The book value of our consolidated fixed-rate mortgages and unsecured indebtedness including
commercial paper was $23.2 billion and $22.4 billion as of December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively. The fair values of these
financial instruments and the related discount rate assumptions as of December 31 are summarized as follows:
December 31, December 31, 
    2019     2018      
Fair value of consolidated fixed rate mortgages and
unsecured indebtedness     $ 23,231 $ 22,323         
Weighted average discount rates assumed in
calculation of fair value for fixed rate mortgages  3.75 % 4.55 %
Weighted average discount rates assumed in
calculation of fair value for unsecured indebtedness 3.67 % 4.50 %
8. Equity
Simon’s Board of Directors is authorized to reclassify excess common stock into one or more additional classes and
series of capital stock, to establish the number of shares in each class or series and to fix the preferences, conversion and other
rights, voting powers, restrictions, limitations as to dividends, and qualifications and terms and conditions of redemption of such
class or series, without any further vote or action by the stockholders. The issuance of additional classes or series of capital
stock may have the effect of delaying, deferring or preventing a change in control of us without further action of the stockholders.
The ability to issue additional classes or series of capital stock, while providing flexibility in connection with possible acquisitions
and other corporate purposes, could have the effect of making it more difficult for a third party to acquire, or of discouraging a
third party from acquiring, a majority of Simon’s outstanding voting stock.
Holders of common stock are entitled to one vote for each share held of record on all matters submitted to a vote of
stockholders, other than for the election of directors. The holders of Simon’s Class B common stock have the right to elect up to
four members of Simon’s Board of Directors. All 8,000 outstanding shares of the Class B common stock are subject to two voting
trusts as to which Herbert Simon and David Simon are the trustees. Shares of Class B common stock convert automatically into
an equal number of shares of common stock upon the occurrence of certain events and can be converted into shares of
common stock at the option of the holders.
Common Stock and Unit Issuances and Repurchases
In 2019, Simon issued 24,000 shares of common stock to a limited partner of the Operating Partnership in exchange for
an equal number of units pursuant to the partnership agreement of the Operating Partnership. During the year ended December
31, 2019, the Operating Partnership redeemed 43,255 units from nine limited partners for $6.8 million in cash.  In 2018, Simon
issued 92,732 shares of common stock to two limited partners of the Operating Partnership in exchange for an equal number of
units pursuant to the partnership agreement of the Operating Partnership. During the year ended December 31, 2018, the
Operating Partnership redeemed 454,704 units from eight limited partners for $81.5 million in cash.  These transactions
increased Simon’s ownership interest in the Operating Partnership.
On September 25, 2018, the Operating Partnership issued 475,183 units in connection with the acquisition of the
remaining 50% interest in The Outlets at Orange, as discussed in Note 4.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
113On February 13, 2017, Simon’s Board of Directors authorized a two-year extension of the previously authorized $2.0
billion common stock repurchase plan through March 31, 2019.  On February 11, 2019, Simon's Board of Directors authorized a
new common stock repurchase plan.  Under the new program, the Company may purchase up to $2.0 billion of its common
stock during the two-year period ending February 11, 2021.  Simon may repurchase the shares in the open market or in privately
negotiated transactions as market conditions warrant.  During the year ended December 31, 2019, Simon purchased 2,247,074
shares at an average price of $160.11 per share, of which 46,377 shares at an average price of $164.49 were purchased as part
of the previous program.  During the year ended December 31, 2018, Simon repurchased 2,275,194 shares at an average price
of $155.64 per share as part of the previous program.  As Simon repurchases shares under this program, the Operating
Partnership repurchases an equal number of units from Simon.
Temporary Equity
Simon
Simon classifies as temporary equity those securities for which there is the possibility that Simon could be required to
redeem the security for cash irrespective of the probability of such a possibility. As a result, Simon classifies one series of
preferred units in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties in temporary equity. Each of
these securities is discussed further below.
Limited Partners’ Preferred Interest in the Operating Partnership and Noncontrolling Redeemable Interests in
Properties.  The redemption features of the preferred units in the Operating Partnership contain provisions which could require
the Operating Partnership to settle the redemption in cash. As a result, this series of preferred units in the Operating Partnership
remains classified outside permanent equity.
The remaining noncontrolling interests in a property or portfolio of properties which are redeemable at the option of the
holder or in circumstances that may be outside Simon’s control, are accounted for as temporary equity. The carrying amount of
the noncontrolling interest is adjusted to the redemption amount assuming the instrument is redeemable at the balance sheet
date. Changes in the redemption value of the underlying noncontrolling interest are recorded and presented within accumulated
deficit in the consolidated statements of equity in the line issuance of unit equivalents and other. There were no noncontrolling
interests redeemable at amounts in excess of fair value as of December 31, 2019 and 2018. The following table summarizes the
preferred units in the Operating Partnership and the amount of the noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties as of
December 31.
    2019     2018  
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units, 260,000  units authorized, 255,373  issued
and outstanding $25,537 $25,537
Other noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties  193,524  204,626
Limited partners’  preferred interest in the Operating Partnership and noncontrolling
redeemable interests in properties $219,061 $230,163
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units.  This series of preferred units accrues cumulative quarterly
distributions at a rate of $7.50 annually. The preferred units are redeemable by the Operating Partnership upon the death of the
survivor of the original holders, or the transfer of any preferred units to any person or entity other than the persons or entities
entitled to the benefits of the original holder. The redemption price is the liquidation value ($100.00 per preferred unit) plus
accrued and unpaid distributions, payable either in cash or fully registered shares of common stock at our election. In the event
of the death of a holder of the preferred units, the occurrence of certain tax triggering events applicable to the holder, or on or
after November 10, 2006, the holder may require the Operating Partnership to redeem the preferred units at the same
redemption price payable at the option of the Operating Partnership in either cash or shares of common stock.  These preferred
units have a carrying value of $25.5 million and are included in limited partners’ preferred interest in the Operating Partnership in
the consolidated balance sheets at December 31, 2019 and 2018.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
114The Operating Partnership
The Operating Partnership classifies as temporary equity those securities for which there is the possibility that the
Operating Partnership could be required to redeem the security for cash, irrespective of the probability of such a possibility.  As a
result, the Operating Partnership classifies one series of preferred units and noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties in
temporary equity.  Each of these securities is discussed further below.
Noncontrolling Redeemable Interests in Properties   Redeemable instruments, which typically represent the
remaining noncontrolling interests in a property or portfolio of properties, and which are redeemable at the option of the holder or
in circumstances that may be outside our control, are accounted for as temporary equity.  The carrying amount of the
noncontrolling interest is adjusted to the redemption amount assuming the instrument is redeemable at the balance sheet date.
 Changes in the redemption value of the underlying noncontrolling interest are recorded within equity and are presented in the
consolidated statements of equity in the line issuance of unit equivalents and other.  There are no noncontrolling interests
redeemable at amounts in excess of fair value as of December 31, 2019 and 2018.  The following table summarizes the
preferred units and the amount of the noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties as of December 31.    
    2019     2018  
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units, 260,000  units authorized, 255,373  issued
and outstanding $25,537 $25,537
Other noncontrolling redeemable interests in properties  193,524  204,626
Total preferred units, at liquidation value, and noncontrolling redeemable interests in
properties $219,061 $230,163
7.50% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units   The 7.50% preferred units accrue cumulative quarterly distributions
at a rate of $7.50 annually.  We may redeem the preferred units upon the death of the survivor of the original holders, or the
transfer of any preferred units to any person or entity other than the persons or entities entitled to the benefits of the original
holder.  The redemption price is the liquidation value ($100.00 per preferred unit) plus accrued and unpaid distributions, payable
either in cash or fully registered shares of common stock of Simon at our election.  In the event of the death of a holder of the
7.5% preferred units, the occurrence of certain tax triggering events applicable to the holder, or on or after November 10, 2006,
the holder may require the Operating Partnership to redeem the preferred units at the same redemption price payable at the
Operating Partnership’s option in either cash or fully registered shares of common stock of Simon.  These preferred units have a
carrying value of $25.5 million and are included in preferred units, at liquidation value in the consolidated balance sheets at
December 31, 2019 and 2018.
Permanent Equity
Simon
Preferred Stock.  Dividends on all series of preferred stock are calculated based upon the preferred stock’s preferred
return multiplied by the preferred stock’s corresponding liquidation value. The Operating Partnership pays preferred distributions
to Simon equal to the dividends Simon pays on the preferred stock issued.
Series J 83/8% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Stock.  Dividends accrue quarterly at an annual rate of 83/8% per
share. Simon can redeem this series, in whole or in part, on or after October 15, 2027 at a redemption price of $50.00 per share,
plus accumulated and unpaid dividends. This preferred stock was issued at a premium of $7.5 million. The unamortized premium
included in the carrying value of the preferred stock at December 31, 2019 and 2018 was $2.6 million and $2.9 million,
respectively.
The Operating Partnership
Series J 83/8% Cumulative Redeemable Preferred Units.     Distributions accrue quarterly at an annual rate of 83/8%
per unit on the Series J 83/8% preferred units, or Series J preferred units.  Simon owns all of the Series J preferred
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
115units which have the same economic rights and preferences of an outstanding series of Simon preferred stock.  The Operating
Partnership can redeem this series, in whole or in part, when Simon can redeem the related preferred stock, on and after
October 15, 2027 at a redemption price of $50.00 per unit, plus accumulated and unpaid distributions. The Series J preferred
units were issued at a premium of $7.5 million.  The unamortized premium included in the carrying value of the preferred units at
December 31, 2019 and 2018 was $2.6 million and $2.9 million, respectively.  There are 1,000,000 Series J preferred units
authorized and 796,948 Series J preferred units issued and outstanding.
Other Equity Activity
The Simon Property Group 1998 Stock Incentive Plan, as amended.  This plan, or the 1998 plan, provides for the
grant of equity-based awards with respect to the equity of Simon in the form of options to purchase shares, stock appreciation
rights, restricted stock grants and performance-based unit awards. Options may be granted which are qualified as “incentive
stock options” within the meaning of Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code and options which are not so qualified. An
aggregate of 16,300,000 shares of common stock have been reserved for issuance under the 1998 plan.
The 1998 plan is administered by the Compensation Committee of Simon’s Board of Directors, or the Compensation
Committee. The Compensation Committee determines which eligible individuals may participate and the type, extent and terms
of the awards to be granted to them. In addition, the Compensation Committee interprets the 1998 plan and makes all other
determinations deemed advisable for its administration. Options granted to employees become exercisable over the period
determined by the Compensation Committee. The exercise price of an employee option may not be less than the fair market
value of the shares on the date of grant. Employee options generally vest over a three-year period and expire ten years from the
date of grant.
Directors who are not also our employees or employees of our affiliates are eligible to receive awards under the 1998
plan. Each independent director receives an annual cash retainer of $110,000, and an annual restricted stock award with a grant
date value of $175,000. Committee chairs receive annual retainers for the Company’s Audit, Compensation, and Governance
and Nominating Committees of $35,000, $35,000 and $25,000, respectively.  Directors receive fixed annual retainers for service
on the Audit, Compensation and Governance and Nominating Committees, of $15,000, $15,000, and $10,000, respectively. The
Lead Director receives an annual retainer of $50,000.  These retainers are paid 50% in cash and 50% in restricted stock.
Restricted stock awards vest in full after one year.  Once vested, the delivery of the shares of restricted stock (including
reinvested dividends) is deferred under our Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the director retires, dies or becomes
disabled or otherwise no longer serves as a director. The directors may vote and are entitled to receive dividends on the
underlying shares; however, any dividends on the shares of restricted stock must be reinvested in shares of common stock and
held in the Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the shares of restricted stock are delivered to the former director.
In accordance with its terms, the 1998 Plan expired on December 31, 2018.  The shares of common stock that were
available for grant under the 1998 Plan at the time of its expiration are not available for grant under the 2019 Plan.
The Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan.  This plan, or the 2019 plan, provides for the grant of
equity-based awards with respect to the equity of Simon in the form of incentive and nonqualified stock options to purchase
shares, stock appreciation rights, restricted stock grants and performance-based awards.  Options may be granted which are
qualified as “incentive stock options” within the meaning of Section 422 of the Internal Revenue Code and options which are not
so qualified.  An aggregate of 8,000,000 shares of common stock have been reserved under the 2019 plan.
The 2019 plan is administered by the Compensation Committee.  The Compensation Committee determines which
eligible individuals may participate and the type, extent and terms of the awards to be granted to them.  In addition, the
Compensation Committee interprets the 2019 plan and makes all other determinations deemed advisable for its administration.
 Options granted to employees become exercisable over the period determined by the Compensation
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
116Committee.  The exercise price of an employee option may not be less than the fair market value of the shares on the date of
grant.  Employee options generally vest over a three-year period and expire ten years from the date of grant.
Directors who are not also our employees or employees of our affiliates are eligible to receive awards under the 2019
plan. Each independent director receives an annual cash retainer of $110,000, and an annual restricted stock award with a grant
date value of $175,000. Committee chairs receive annual retainers for the Company’s Audit, Compensation, and Governance
and Nominating Committees of $35,000, $35,000 and $25,000, respectively.  Directors receive fixed annual retainers for service
on the Audit, Compensation and Governance and Nominating Committees, of $15,000, $15,000, and $10,000, respectively. The
Lead Director receives an annual retainer of $50,000.  These retainers are paid 50% in cash and 50% in restricted stock.
Restricted stock awards vest in full after one year.  Once vested, the delivery of the shares of restricted stock (including
reinvested dividends) is deferred under our Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the director retires, dies or becomes
disabled or otherwise no longer serves as a director. The directors may vote and are entitled to receive dividends on the
underlying shares; however, any dividends on the shares of restricted stock must be reinvested in shares of common stock and
held in the Director Deferred Compensation Plan until the shares of restricted stock are delivered to the former director.
Stock Based Compensation
Awards under our stock based compensation plans primarily take the form of LTIP units and restricted stock grants.
Restricted stock and awards under the LTIP programs are either market or performance-based and are based on various
individual, corporate and business unit performance measures as further described below. The expense related to these
programs, net of amounts capitalized, is included within home and regional office costs and general and administrative costs in
the accompanying statements of operations and comprehensive income.
LTIP Programs.  The Compensation Committee has approved long-term, performance based incentive compensation
programs, or the LTIP programs, for certain senior employees. Awards under the LTIP programs take the form of LTIP units, a
form of limited partnership interest issued by the Operating Partnership, which are subject to the participant maintaining
employment with us through certain dates and other conditions as described in the applicable award agreements. Awarded LTIP
units not earned in accordance with the conditions set forth in the applicable award agreements are forfeited. Earned and fully
vested LTIP units are equivalent to units of the Operating Partnership. During the performance period, participants are entitled to
receive distributions on the LTIP units awarded to them equal to 10% of the regular quarterly distributions paid on a unit of the
Operating Partnership. As a result, we account for these LTIP units as participating securities under the two-class method of
computing earnings per share.
In 2018, the Compensation Committee established and granted awards under a redesigned LTIP program, or the 2018
LTIP program.  Awards under the 2018 LTIP program were granted in two tranches, Tranche A LTIP units and Tranche B LTIP
units.  Each of the Tranche A LTIP units and the Tranche B LTIP units will be considered earned if, and only to the extent to
which, the respective goals based on Funds From Operations, or FFO, per share or Relative TSR Goal performance criteria, as
defined in the applicable award agreements, are achieved during the applicable two-year and three-year performance periods of
the Tranche A LTIP units and Tranche B LTIP units, respectively.  One half of the earned Tranche A LTIP units will vest on
January 1, 2021 with the other one-half vesting on January 1, 2022. All of the earned Tranche B LTIP units will vest on January
1, 2022.
The grant date fair value of the portion of the LTIP units based on achieving the target FFO performance criteria is $6.1
million for the Tranche A LTIP units and the Tranche B LTIP units, for a total of $12.1 million.  The 2018 LTIP program provides
that the value of the FFO-based award may be adjusted up or down based on the Company’s performance compared to the
target FFO performance criteria and has a maximum potential fair value of $18.2 million.  
In 2019, the Compensation Committee established and granted awards under a redesigned LTIP program, or the 2019
LTIP program.  Awards under the 2019 LTIP program will be considered earned if, and only to the extent to which, the respective
performance conditions (based on Funds From Operations, or FFO, per share, and Objective Criteria Goals)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
117and market conditions (based on Relative TSR performance), as defined in the applicable award agreements, are achieved
during the applicable three-year measurement period, subject to the recipient’s continued employment through the vesting date.
 All of the earned LTIP units under the 2019 LTIP program will vest on January 1, 2023.  The 2019 LTIP program provides that
the amount earned of the performance-based portion of the awards is dependent on Simon’s performance compared to certain
criteria and has a maximum potential fair value at issuance of $22.1 million.  
The grant date fair values of any LTIP units for market-based awards are estimated using a Monte Carlo model, and the
resulting fixed expense is recorded regardless of whether the market condition criteria are achieved if the required service is
delivered. The grant date fair values of the market-based awards are being amortized into expense over the period from the
grant date to the date at which the awards, if earned, would become vested.  The expense of the performance-based award is
recorded over the period from the grant date to the date at which the awards, if earned, would become vested, based on our
assessment as to whether it is probable that the performance criteria will be achieved during the applicable performance
periods.
The Compensation Committee approved LTIP unit grants as shown in the table below. The extent to which LTIP units
were earned, and the aggregate grant date fair value, are as follows:
LTIP Program     LTIP Units Earned     Grant Date Fair Value of
TSR Award     Grant Date Target Value
of Performance-Based
Awards
2018 L TIP program - Tranche A  To be determined in 2020  $6.1 million  $6.1 million
2018 L TIP program - Tranche B  To be determined in 2021  $6.1 million  $6.1 million
2019 L TIP program To be determined in 2022  $9.5 million  $14.7 million
We recorded compensation expense, net of capitalization and forfeitures, related to LTIP programs of approximately
$15.8 million, $12.0 million, and $14.0 million for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017, respectively.
Restricted Stock.  The 1998 and 2019 plans also provide for shares of restricted stock to be granted to certain
employees at no cost to those employees, subject to achievement of individual performance and certain financial and return-
based performance measures established by the Compensation Committee related to the most recent year’s performance. Once
granted, the shares of restricted stock then vest annually over a three-year or a four-year period (as defined in the award). The
cost of restricted stock grants, which is based upon the stock’s fair market value on the grant date, is recognized as expense
ratably over the vesting period. Through December 31, 2019 a total of 5,865,147 shares of restricted stock, net of forfeitures,
have been awarded under the 1998 plan, and 12,178 shares of restricted stock have been awarded under the 2019 plan.
Information regarding restricted stock awards is summarized in the following table for each of the years presented:
For the Year Ended  
December 31,  
    2019    2018    2017 
Shares of restricted stock awarded during the year , net of
forfeitures  90,902  51,756  76,660
Weighted average fair value of shares granted during the
year $181.94 $153.24 $170.81
Annual amortization $12,604 $12,029 $13,911
We recorded compensation expense, net of capitalization, related to restricted stock for employees and non-employee
directors of approximately $11.0 million, $7.8 million, and $9.0 million for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017,
respectively.
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
118Other Compensation Arrangements.  On July 6, 2011, in connection with the execution of an employment agreement,
the Compensation Committee granted David Simon, Simon’s Chairman, Chief Executive Officer and President, a retention
award in the form of 1,000,000 LTIP units, or the Award, for his continued service through July 5, 2019. Effective December 31,
2013, the Award was modified, or the Current Award, and as a result the LTIP units would become earned and eligible to vest
based on the attainment of Company-based performance goals, in addition to the service-based vesting requirement included in
the original Award. The Current Award does not contain an opportunity for Mr. Simon to receive additional LTIP units above and
beyond the original Award should our performance exceed the higher end of the performance criteria.  The performance criteria
of the Current Award are based on the attainment of specific FFO per share goals. Because the performance criteria has been
met, a maximum of 360,000 LTIP units, or the A units, 360,000 LTIP units, or the B units, and 280,000 LTIP units, or the C units,
became earned on December 31, 2015, December 31, 2016 and December 31, 2017, respectively. If the relevant performance
criteria had not been achieved, all or a portion of the Current Award would have been forfeited. The earned A units vested on
January 1, 2018, earned B units vested on January 1, 2019 and earned C units vested on June 30, 2019. The grant date fair
value of the retention award of $120.3 million was recognized as expense over the eight-year term of his employment agreement
on a straight-line basis based on the applicable vesting periods of the A units, B units and C units.  
We also maintain a tax-qualified retirement 401(k) savings plan and offer no other post-retirement or post-employment
benefits to our employees.
Exchange Rights
Simon
Limited partners in the Operating Partnership have the right to exchange all or any portion of their units for shares of
common stock on a one-for-one basis or cash, as determined by Simon’s Board of Directors. The amount of cash to be paid if
the exchange right is exercised and the cash option is selected will be based on the trading price of Simon’s common stock at
that time. At December 31, 2019, Simon had reserved 54,528,976 shares of common stock for possible issuance upon the
exchange of units, stock options and Class B common stock.
The Operating Partnership
Limited partners have the right under the partnership agreement to exchange all or any portion of their units for shares of
Simon common stock on a one-for-one basis or cash, as determined by Simon in its sole discretion. If Simon selects cash,
Simon cannot cause the Operating Partnership to redeem the exchanged units for cash without contributing cash to the
Operating Partnership as partners’ equity sufficient to effect the redemption.  If sufficient cash is not contributed, Simon will be
deemed to have elected to exchange the units for shares of Simon common stock.  The amount of cash to be paid if the
exchange right is exercised and the cash option is selected will be based on the trading price of Simon’s common stock at that
time. The number of shares of Simon’s common stock issued pursuant to the exercise of the exchange right will be the same as
the number of units exchanged.
9. Lease Income
As discussed in Note 3, fixed lease income under our operating leases includes fixed minimum lease consideration and
fixed CAM reimbursements recorded on a straight-line basis.  Variable lease income includes consideration based on sales, as
well as reimbursements for real estate taxes, utilities, marketing, and certain other items.
For the Year Ended
December 31, 
    2019     2018 2017
Fixed lease income $ 4,293,401 $ 4,185,174 $ 4,156,971
Variable lease income 950,370 973,246 952,128
Total lease income $ 5,243,771 $ 5,158,420 $ 5,109,099
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
119Lease income for the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017 has been reclassified to conform to the current year
presentation.  
Minimum fixed lease consideration under non-cancelable tenant operating leases for each of the next five years and
thereafter, excluding variable lease consideration, as of December 31, 2019, is as follows:
2020     $3,553,867
2021  3,182,630
2022  2,785,719
2023  2,293,210
2024  1,825,869
Thereafter  4,700,660
$18,341,955
10. Commitments and Contingencies
Litigation
We are involved from time-to-time in various legal and regulatory proceedings that arise in the ordinary course of our
business, including, but not limited to, commercial disputes, environmental matters, and litigation in connection with transactions
such as acquisitions and divestitures. We believe that current proceedings will not have a material adverse effect on our financial
condition, liquidity, or results of operations. We record a liability when a loss is considered probable and the amount can be
reasonably estimated.
During the first quarter of 2019, we settled a lawsuit with our former insurance broker, Aon Risk Services Central Inc.,
related to the significant flood damage sustained at Opry Mills in May 2010. In accordance with a previous agreement with the
prior co-investor in Opry Mills, a portion of the settlement was remitted to the co-investor.  Our share of the settlement was
approximately $68.0 million, which was recorded as other income in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations
and comprehensive income.
Lease Commitments
As of December 31, 2019, a total of 23 of the consolidated properties are subject to ground leases. The termination dates
of these ground leases range from 2021 to 2090, including periods for which exercising an extension option is reasonably
assured. These ground leases generally require us to make fixed annual rental payments, or a fixed annual rental payment plus
a percentage rent component based upon the revenues or total sales of the property. In addition, we have several regional office
locations that are subject to leases with termination dates ranging from 2020 to 2028. These office leases generally require us to
make fixed annual rental payments plus pay our share of common area, real estate, and utility expenses. Some of our ground
and office leases include escalation clauses. All of our lease arrangements are
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
120classified as operating leases.  We incurred ground lease expense and office lease expense, which are included in other
expense and home office and regional expense, respectively, as follows:
For the Year Ended
December 31, 2019
Operating Lease Cost
Fixed lease cost $ 31,000
Variable lease cost 16,833
Sublease income  (694)
Total operating lease cost $ 47,139
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
121For the years ended December 31, 2018 and 2017, we incurred $47,320 and $45,345 of lease expense, respectively.
For the Year Ended
December 31, 2019
Other Information
Cash paid for amounts included in the measurement of lease liabilities
Operating cash flows from operating leases $ 48,519
Weighted-average remaining lease term - operating leases 35.6 years
Weighted-average discount rate - operating leases 4.87%
Future minimum lease payments due under these leases for years ending December 31, excluding applicable extension
options and renewal options unless reasonably certain of exercise and any sublease income, are as follows:
2020 $ 32,438
2021 32,440
2022 32,451
2023 32,583
2024 32,717
Thereafter 908,701
$1,071,330
Impact of discounting (554,521 )
Operating lease liabilities $516,809
Insurance
We maintain insurance coverage with third party carriers who provide a portion of the coverage for specific layers of
potential losses, including commercial general liability, fire, flood, extended coverage and rental loss insurance on all of our
properties in the United States. The initial portion of coverage not provided by third party carriers is either insured through our
wholly-owned captive insurance company, Bridgewood Insurance Company, Ltd., or other financial arrangements controlled by
us. If required, a third party carrier has, in turn, agreed to provide evidence of coverage for this layer of losses under the terms
and conditions of the carrier’s policy. A similar policy written either through our captive insurance company or other financial
arrangements controlled by us also provides initial coverage for property insurance and certain windstorm risks at the properties
located in coastal windstorm locations.
We currently maintain insurance coverage against acts of terrorism on all of our properties in the United States on an “all
risk” basis in the amount of up to $1 billion. Despite the existence of this insurance coverage, any threatened or actual terrorist
attacks where we operate could adversely affect our property values, revenues, consumer traffic and tenant sales.
Hurricane Impacts
During the third quarter of 2017, two of our wholly-owned properties located in Puerto Rico sustained significant property
damage and business interruption as a result of Hurricane Maria.  Since the date of the loss, we have received
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
122$73.9 million of insurance proceeds from third-party carriers related to the two properties located in Puerto Rico, of which $45.5
million was used for property restoration and remediation and to reduce the insurance recovery receivable.  During the years
ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, we recorded $10.5 million and $17.9 million, respectively, as business interruption income,
which was recorded in other income in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations and comprehensive income.
Guarantees of Indebtedness
Joint venture debt is the liability of the joint venture and is typically secured by the joint venture property, which is non-
recourse to us. As of December 31, 2019 and 2018, the Operating Partnership guaranteed joint venture related mortgage
indebtedness of $214.8 million and 216.1 million, respectively (of which we have a right of recovery from our venture partners of
$10.8 million). Mortgages guaranteed by the Operating Partnership are secured by the property of the joint venture which could
be sold in order to satisfy the outstanding obligation and which have estimated fair values in excess of the guaranteed amount.
Concentration of Credit Risk
Our U.S. Malls, Premium Outlets, and The Mills rely upon anchor tenants to attract customers; however, anchors do not
contribute materially to our financial results as many anchors own their spaces. All material operations are within the United
States and no customer or tenant accounts for 5% or more of our consolidated revenues.
11. Related Party Transactions
Transactions with Affiliates
Our management company provides office space and legal, human resource administration, property specific financing
and other support services to Melvin Simon & Associates, Inc., or MSA, a related party, for which we received a fee of $0.6
million in each of 2019, 2018 and 2017. In addition, pursuant to management agreements that provide for our receipt of a
management fee and reimbursement of our direct and indirect costs, we have managed since 1993 two shopping centers owned
by entities in which David Simon and Herbert Simon have ownership interests, for which we received a fee of $3.9 million, $4.2
million, and $4.2 million in 2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.  
Transactions with Unconsolidated Joint Ventures
As described in Note 2, our management company provides management, insurance, and other services to certain
unconsolidated joint ventures.  Amounts received for such services were $108.2 million, $111.5 million, and $116.4 million in
2019, 2018, and 2017, respectively.  During 2019, 2018, and 2017, we recorded development, royalty, and other fee income, net
of elimination, related to our unconsolidated international joint ventures of $14.8 million, $16.0 million, and $15.5 million,
respectively.  The fees related to our international investments are included in other income in the accompanying consolidated
statements of operations and comprehensive income.  Neither MSA, David Simon, or Herb Simon have an ownership interest in
any of our unconsolidated joint ventures, except through their ownership interests in the Company or the Operating Partnership.
 
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements
(Dollars in thousands, except share, per share, unit and per unit amounts
and where indicated as in millions or billions)
12312. Quarterly Financial Data (Unaudited)
Quarterly 2019 and 2018 data is summarized in the table below. Quarterly amounts may not sum to annual amounts due
to rounding.
    First     Second     Third     Fourth  
Quarter Quarter Quarter Quarter  
2019
Total revenue $ 1,452,834 $ 1,397,186 $ 1,416,554 $ 1,488,615
Operating income before other items  745,021  680,631  705,302  776,876
Consolidated net income  631,947  572,102  628,724  590,416
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Net income attributable to common stockholders $ 548,475 $ 495,324 $ 544,254 $ 510,194
Net income per share — Basic and Diluted $ 1.78 $ 1.60 $ 1.77 $ 1.66
Weighted average shares outstanding — Basic and Diluted  308,978,053  308,708,798  307,275,230  306,868,960
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Net income attributable to unitholders $ 631,551 $ 570,389 $ 627,074 $ 587,931
Net income per unit — Basic and Diluted $ 1.78 $ 1.60 $ 1.77 $ 1.66
Weighted average units outstanding — Basic and Diluted 355,778,250 355,491,396 354,038,110 353,619,579
2018
Total revenue (1) $ 1,394,182 $ 1,385,059 $ 1,404,021 $ 1,462,027
Operating income before other items  704,962  727,983  722,843  770,512
Consolidated net income  715,524  631,414  642,212  833,192
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Net income attributable to common stockholders $ 620,654 $ 547,004 $ 556,267 $ 712,796
Net income per share — Basic and Diluted $ 2.00 $ 1.77 $ 1.80 $ 2.30
Weighted average shares outstanding — Basic and Diluted  310,583,643  309,355,154  309,294,045  309,293,708
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Net income attributable to unitholders $ 714,303 $ 629,822 $ 640,402 $ 821,237
Net income per unit — Basic and Diluted $ 2.00 $ 1.77 $ 1.80 $ 2.30
Weighted average units outstanding — Basic and Diluted 357,446,988 356,181,817 356,073,080 356,396,387
(1)Total revenue has been reclassified to conform to the current year presentation.
13. Subsequent Event
On February 10, 2020, we and Taubman Centers, Inc., a publicly held Michigan corporation (“TCO”), issued a joint press
release announcing the execution of an Agreement and Plan of Merger (the “Merger Agreement”) dated as of February 9, 2020,
pursuant to which, among other things and subject to the satisfaction or waiver of certain conditions, the Operating Partnership
will acquire 100% of the equity interests of TCO and, following the transactions contemplated in the Merger Agreement, will hold
80% of the equity interests of The Taubman Realty Group Limited Partnership (“TRG”), with the Taubman Family (as defined in
the Merger Agreement) retaining a 20% interest in TRG. Consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Merger
Agreement are subject to the satisfaction or waiver of customary closing conditions, including the approval and adoption of the
Merger Agreement by (i) shareholders holding two-thirds of TCO’s outstanding voting stock and (ii) shareholders, excluding the
Taubman Family, holding a majority of TCO’s outstanding voting stock.
TRG is engaged in the ownership, management and/or leasing of 26 super-regional shopping centers in the U.S. and
Asia.  The TRG board will be comprised of 3 Simon designees and 3 Taubman designees.  TRG will continue to be managed by
its existing executive team.  We, through the Operating Partnership, will acquire all of Taubman common stock for $52.50 per
share in cash, or $3.6 billion.
Table of Contents
124Item 9.  Changes in and Disagreements with Accountants on Accounting and Financial Disclosure
None.
Item 9A.    Controls and Procedures
Simon
Management's Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
Simon maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the Securities Exchange Act of
1934, as amended (the "Exchange Act")) that are designed to provide reasonable assurance that information required to be
disclosed in the reports that we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within
the time periods specified in the SEC's rules and forms, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to Simon’s
management, including its Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding
required disclosures. Because of inherent limitations, disclosure controls and procedures, no matter how well designed and
operated, can provide only reasonable, and not absolute, assurance that the objectives of disclosure controls and procedures
are met.
Our management, with the participation of Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, evaluated the
effectiveness of the design and operation of Simon’s disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31, 2019. Based on
that evaluation, Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that, as of December 31, 2019, Simon’s
disclosure controls and procedures were effective at a reasonable assurance level.
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
Simon is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial reporting. Internal control
over financial reporting is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act as a process designed by, or under the supervision
of, Simon’s principal executive and principal financial officers and effected by Simon’s Board of Directors, management and
other personnel, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial
statements for external purposes in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles and includes those policies
and procedures that:
● Pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect our transactions and
disposition of assets;
● Provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, and that our receipts and
expenditures are being made only in accordance with authorizations of our management and directors; and
● Provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or
disposition of our assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate
because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
We assessed the effectiveness of Simon’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31, 2019. In making
this assessment, we used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission
(COSO) in Internal Control-Integrated Framework (2013). Based on that assessment and criteria, we believe that, as of
December 31, 2019, Simon’s internal control over financial reporting was effective.
Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm
The audit report of Ernst & Young LLP on their assessment of Simon's internal control over financial reporting as of
December 31, 2019 is set forth within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have not been any changes in Simon's internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under
the Exchange Act) that occurred during the year ended December 31, 2019 that have materially affected, or are reasonably
likely to materially affect, Simon's internal control over financial reporting.
Table of Contents
125The Operating Partnership
Management's Evaluation of Disclosure Controls and Procedures
The Operating Partnership maintains disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) under the
Exchange Act) that are designed to provide reasonable assurance that information required to be disclosed in the reports that
we file or submit under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in
the SEC's rules and forms, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to our management, including Simon’s
Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosures.
Because of inherent limitations, disclosure controls and procedures, no matter how well designed and operated, can provide
only reasonable, and not absolute, assurance that the objectives of disclosure controls and procedures are met.
Our management, with the participation of Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, evaluated the
effectiveness of the design and operation of the Operating Partnership’s disclosure controls and procedures as of December 31,
2019. Based on that evaluation, Simon’s Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer concluded that, as of December 31,
2019, the Operating Partnership’s disclosure controls and procedures were effective at a reasonable assurance level.
Management's Report on Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
The Operating Partnership is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control over financial
reporting. Internal control over financial reporting is defined in Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act as a process designed by,
or under the supervision of, Simon’s principal executive and principal financial officers and effected by Simon’s Board of
Directors, management and other personnel, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and
the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles
and includes those policies and procedures that:
● Pertain to the maintenance of records that in reasonable detail accurately and fairly reflect our transactions and
disposition of assets;
● Provide reasonable assurance that transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial
statements in accordance with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles, and that our receipts and
expenditures are being made only in accordance with authorizations of our management and directors; and
● Provide reasonable assurance regarding prevention or timely detection of unauthorized acquisition, use or
disposition of our assets that could have a material effect on the financial statements.
Because of its inherent limitations, internal control over financial reporting may not prevent or detect misstatements.
Projections of any evaluation of effectiveness to future periods are subject to the risk that controls may become inadequate
because of changes in conditions, or that the degree of compliance with the policies or procedures may deteriorate.
We assessed the effectiveness of the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting as of December 31,
2019. In making this assessment, we used the criteria set forth by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway
Commission (COSO) in Internal Control-Integrated Framework (2013). Based on that assessment and criteria, we believe that,
as of December 31, 2019, the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting was effective.
Attestation Report of the Registered Public Accounting Firm
The audit report of Ernst & Young LLP on their assessment of the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial
reporting as of December 31, 2019 is set forth within Item 8 of this Form 10-K.
Changes in Internal Control Over Financial Reporting
There have not been any changes in the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting (as defined in
Rule 13a-15(f) under the Exchange Act) that occurred during the year ended December 31, 2019 that have materially affected,
or are reasonably likely to materially affect, the Operating Partnership’s internal control over financial reporting.
Table of Contents
126Item 9B.    Other Information
During the fourth quarter of the year covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K, the Audit Committee of Simon’s Board
of Directors approved certain audit, audit-related and non-audit tax compliance and tax consulting services to be provided by
Ernst & Young LLP, our independent registered public accounting firm. This disclosure is made pursuant to Section 10A(i)(2) of
the Exchange Act as added by Section 202 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
Part III
Item 10.    Directors, Executive Officers and Corporate Governance
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for Simon’s
2020 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A and the information included under the
caption "Information about our Executive Officers" in Part I hereof.
Item 11.    Executive Compensation
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for Simon’s
2020 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
Item 12.    Security Ownership of Certain Beneficial Owners and Management and Related Stockholder Matters
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for Simon’s
2020 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
Item 13.    Certain Relationships and Related Transactions and Director Independence
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for Simon’s
2020 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
Item 14.  Principal Accountant Fees and Services
The information required by this item is incorporated herein by reference to the definitive proxy statement for Simon’s
2020 annual meeting of stockholders to be filed with the SEC pursuant to Regulation 14A.
The Audit Committee of Simon's Board of Directors pre-approves all audit and permissible non-audit services to be
provided by Ernst & Young LLP, or Ernst & Young, Simon’s and the Operating Partnership’s independent registered public
accounting firm, prior to commencement of services. The Audit Committee has delegated to the Chairman of the Audit
Committee the authority to pre-approve specific services up to specified individual and aggregate fee amounts. These pre-
approval decisions are presented to the full Audit Committee at the next scheduled meeting after such approvals are made.  We
have incurred fees as shown below for services from Ernst & Young as Simon’s and the Operating Partnership’s independent
registered public accounting firm and for services provided to our managed consolidated and joint venture properties and our
consolidated non-managed properties. Ernst & Young has advised us that it has billed or will bill these indicated amounts for the
following categories of services for the years ended December 31, 2019 and 2018, respectively:
2019     2018
Audit Fees (1) $4,230,000 $ 3,941,000
Audit Related Fees (2)  4,835,000   5,024,000
Tax Fees (3)   266,000   191,000
All Other Fees   —   —
(1)Audit Fees include fees for the audits of the financial statements and the effectiveness of internal control over financial
reporting for Simon and the Operating Partnership and services associated with the related SEC registration statements,
periodic reports, and other documents issued in connection with securities offerings.
Table of Contents
127(2)Audit-Related Fees include audits of individual or portfolios of properties and schedules to comply with lender, joint venture
partner or contract requirements and due diligence services for our managed consolidated and joint venture properties and
our consolidated non-managed properties.  Our share of these Audit-Related Fees was approximately 59% and 60% for the
years ended 2019 and 2018, respectively.
(3)Tax Fees include fees for international and other tax consulting services and tax return compliance services associated with
the tax returns for certain managed joint ventures as well as other miscellaneous tax compliance services.  Our share of
these Tax Fees was approximately 65% and 59% for 2019 and 2018, respectively.
Table of Contents
128Part IV
Item 15.  Exhibits and Financial Statement Schedules
Page No.
(a) (1) Financial Statements
The following consolidated financial statements of Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon
Property Group, L.P . are set forth in Part II, item 8.
Reports of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm 73
Consolidated Financial Statements of Simon Property Group, Inc.
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 79
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 80
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018
and 2017 81
Consolidated Statements of Equity for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and
2017 82
Consolidated Financial Statements of Simon Property Group, L.P .
Consolidated Balance Sheets as of December 31, 2019 and 2018 84
Consolidated Statements of Operations and Comprehensive Income for the years ended
December 31, 2019, 2018 and 2017 85
Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018
and 2017 86
Consolidated Statements of Equity for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018 and
2017 87
Notes to Consolidated Financial Statements 88
(2) Financial Statement Schedule
Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P . Schedule III — Schedule of Real
Estate and Accumulated Depreciation 136
Notes to Schedule III 142
Other financial statement schedules are omitted because they are not applicable or the
required information is shown in the financial statements or notes thereto.
(3) Exhibits
The Exhibit Index attached hereto is hereby incorporated by reference to this Item. 129
Item 16.  Form 10-K Summary
None.
Table of Contents
129EXHIBIT INDEX
Exhibits
2.1Separation and Distribution Agreement by and among Simon Property Group, Inc., Simon Property Group, L.P.,
Washington Prime Group Inc. and Washington Prime Group, L.P., dated as of May 27, 2014 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 2.1 of the Registrant’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 29, 2014).
3.1Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Simon Property Group, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Appendix A of Simon
Property Group, Inc.’s Proxy Statement on Schedule 14A filed March 27, 2009).
3.2Amended and Restated By-Laws of Simon Property Group, Inc. as adopted on March 20, 2017 (incorporated by reference
to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 24, 2017).
3.3Certificate of Powers, Designations, Preferences and Rights of the 83/8% Series J Cumulative Redeemable Preferred
Stock, $0.0001 Par Value (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed October 20, 2004).
3.4Certificate of Designation of Series A Junior Participating Redeemable Preferred Stock (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 15, 2014).
3.5Second Amended and Restated Certificate of Limited Partnership of the Limited Partnership (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed March 31, 2003).
3.6Eighth Amended and Restated Limited Partnership Agreement of Simon Property Group, L.P. dated as of May 8, 2008
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 9, 2008).
3.7Certificate of Designation of Series B Junior Participating Redeemable Preferred Units of Simon Property Group, L.P.
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed August 8,
2014).
3.8Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P. dated March 7, 2007, but effective as of
August 27, 1999, regarding a prior agreement filed under an exhibit 99.1 to Form S-3/A of Simon Property Group, L.P. on
November 20, 1996 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 3.4 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Annual Report on Form 10-K
filed March 16, 2007).
3.9Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P. dated April 29, 2009, but effective as of
October 14, 2004, regarding redemption of the Registrant's Series I Preferred Units (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 3.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 8, 2009).
4.1(a)Indenture, dated as of November 26, 1996, by and among Simon Property Group, L.P. and The Chase Manhattan Bank,
as trustee (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Registration Statement on Form S-3
filed October 21, 1996 (Reg. No. 333-11491)).
4.2Description of Each Registrant’s Securities Registered Pursuant to Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
9.1Second Amended and Restated Voting Trust Agreement, Voting Agreement and Proxy dated as of March 1, 2004 between
Melvin Simon & Associates, Inc., on the one hand and Melvin Simon, Herbert Simon and David Simon on the other hand
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 9.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 10,
2004).
9.2Voting Trust Agreement, Voting Agreement and Proxy dated as of March 1, 2004 between David Simon, Melvin Simon and
Herbert Simon (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 9.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q
filed May 10, 2004).
10.1Form of the Indemnity Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and its directors and officers (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.7 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Form S-4 filed August 13, 1998 (Reg. No. 333-61399)).
Table of Contents
130Exhibits
10.2Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of September 24, 1998, by and among Simon Property Group, Inc. and the
persons named therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on
Form 8-K filed October 9, 1998).
10.3Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of August 27, 1999, by and among Simon Property Group, Inc. and the persons
named therein (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.4 of the Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed March 24, 2004
(Reg. No. 333-113884)).
10.4Registration Rights Agreement, dated as of November 14, 1997, by and between O’Connor Retail Partners, L.P. and
Simon DeBartolo Group, Inc. (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 4.8 of the Registration Statement on Form S-3 filed
December 7, 2001 (Reg. No. 333-74722)).
10.5*Simon Property Group, L.P. Amended and Restated 1998 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1
of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 10, 2014).
10.6*Form of Nonqualified Stock Option Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998 Stock Incentive Plan
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.8 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed March 16,
2005).
10.7*Form of Performance-Based Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998 Stock
Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.9 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
filed February 28, 2007).
10.8*Form of Non-Employee Director Restricted Stock Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998 Stock
Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.10 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K
filed March 16, 2005).
10.9*Employment Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and David Simon effective as of July 6, 2011 (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.10*First Amendment to Employment Agreement between Simon Property Group, Inc. and David Simon, dated as of
March 29, 2013 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K
filed April 4, 2013).
10.11*Non-Qualified Deferred Compensation Plan dated as of December 31, 2008 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed November 5, 2009).
10.12*Amendment — 2008 Performance Based-Restricted Stock Agreement dated as of March 6, 2009 (incorporated by
reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed November 5, 2009).
10.13*Certificate of Designation of Series 2010 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.4 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 19, 2010).
10.14*Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (Three Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998 Stock
Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
March 19, 2010).
10.15*Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (Two Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998 Stock
Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
March 19, 2010).
10.16*Form of Series 2010 LTIP Unit (One Year Program) Award Agreement under the Simon Property Group, L.P. 1998 Stock
Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed
March 19, 2010).
10.17*Certificate of Designation of Series CEO LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
Table of Contents
131Exhibits
10.18*Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.4 of Simon
Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.19*First Amendment to Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement dated as of December 22, 2011
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.24 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Annual Report on Form 10-K filed
February 28, 2012).
10.20*Second Amendment to Simon Property Group Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement, dated as of March 29, 2013
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 4, 2013).
10.21*Simon Property Group Amended and Restated Series CEO LTIP Unit Award Agreement, dated as of December 31, 2013
(incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed January 2,
2014).
10.22*Certificate of Designation of Series 2011 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.5 of Simon Property Group, Inc.'s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.23*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2011 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.6 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed July 7, 2011).
10.24*Certificate of Designation of Series 2012 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 11, 2012).
10.25*Amended and Restated Certificate of Designation of Series 2012 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated
by reference to Exhibit 10.5 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 7, 2014).
10.26*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2012 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 8, 2012).
10.27*Simon Property Group Amended and Restated Series 2012 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 28, 2014).
10.28*Certificate of Designation of Series 2013 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 10, 2013).
10.29*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2013 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 4, 2013).
10.30*Form of Simon Property Group Executive Officer LTIP Waiver, dated April 18, 2014 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 28, 2014).
10.31*Simon Property Group CEO LTIP Unit Adjustment Waiver, dated April 18, 2014 (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3
of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 28, 2014).
10.32*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2014 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 7, 2014).
10.33*Certificate of Designation of Series 2014 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q filed May 7, 2014).
10.34Amended and Restated $2,750,000,000 Credit Agreement dated as of March 2, 2015 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 3, 2015).
10.35*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2015 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.3 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q/A for the quarter ended March 31, 2015 filed on January 13,
2016).
Table of Contents
132Exhibits
10.36*Certificate of Designation of Series 2015 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.4 of Simon Property Group, L.P.'s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q/A for the quarter ended March 31, 2015 filed
on January 13, 2016).
10.37*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2016 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2016 filed on May 5, 2016).
10.38*Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2016 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2016 filed on May 5, 2016).
10.39Amendment No. 1 to Amended and Restated Credit Agreement, dated as of April 6, 2016 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed April 7, 2016).
10.40Amended and Restated $4,000,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of March 17, 2017 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed March 20, 2017).
10.41Amended and Restated $3,500,000,000 Credit Agreement, dated as of February 15, 2018 (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 99.2 of Simon Property Group, L.P.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed February 15, 2018).
10.42*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2018 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
March 31, 2018 filed on May 3, 2018).
10.43*Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2018 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.2 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended March 31, 2018 filed on May 3, 2018).
10.44*Simon Property Group, L.P. 2019 Stock Incentive Plan (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.1 of Simon Property
Group, Inc.’s Current Report on Form 8-K filed May 8, 2019).
10.45*Form of Simon Property Group Series 2019 LTIP Unit Award Agreement (incorporated by reference to Exhibit 10.2 of
Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the quarter ended
June 30, 2019 filed on August 7, 2019).
10.46*Form of Certificate of Designation of Series 2019 LTIP Units of Simon Property Group, L.P. (incorporated by reference to
Exhibit 10.3 of Simon Property Group, Inc.’s and Simon Property Group, L.P.’s  Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q for the
quarter ended June 30, 2019 filed on August 7, 2019).
21.1List of Subsidiaries of Simon Property Group Inc. and Simon Property Group, L.P.
23.1Simon Property Group, Inc. — Consent of Ernst & Young LLP.
23.2Simon Property Group, L.P. — Consent of Ernst & Young LLP.
31.1Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.2Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.3Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
31.4Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Financial Officer pursuant to Rule 13a-14(a) of the Securities
Exchange Act of 1934, as adopted pursuant to Section 302 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
Table of Contents
133Exhibits
32.1Simon Property Group, Inc. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer pursuant to
18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
32.2Simon Property Group, L.P. — Certification by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer pursuant to
18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002.
101.INSXBRL Instance Document – the instance document does not appear in the Interactive Data File because its XBRL tags
are embedded within the Inline XBRL document.
101.SCHInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Schema Document
101.CALInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Calculation Linkbase Document
101.LABInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Label Linkbase Document
101.PREInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Presentation Linkbase Document
101.DEFInline XBRL Taxonomy Extension Definition Linkbase Document
104Cover Page Interactive File (formatted as Inline XBRL and contained in Exhibit 101)
(a)    Does not include supplemental indentures that authorize the issuance of debt securities series, none of which exceeds
10% of the total assets of Simon Property Group, L.P. on a consolidated basis. Simon Property Group, L.P. agrees to file
copies of any such supplemental indentures upon the request of the Commission.
*        Represents a management contract, or compensatory plan, contract or arrangement required to be filed pursuant to
Regulation S-K.
Table of Contents
134SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, each Registrant has duly
caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized.
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, INC.
By/s/ DAVID SIMON
David Simon
Chairman of the Board of Directors, Chief
Executive Officer and President
Date: February 21, 2020
SIMON PROPERTY GROUP, L.P.
/s/ DAVID SIMON
David Simon
Chairman of the Board of Directors, Chief Executive
Officer and President of Simon Property Group, Inc.,
General Partner
Date: February 21, 2020
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, this report has been signed below by the following
persons on behalf of Simon Property Group, Inc., for itself and in its capacity as General Partner of Simon Property Group, L.P.,
and in the capacities and on the dates indicated.
Signature Capacity Date
/s/ DAVID SIMONChairman of the Board of Directors, Chief
Executive Of ficer (Principal Executive Of ficer)
and PresidentFebruary 21, 2020
David Simon
/s/ HERBER T SIMONChairman Emeritus and Director February 21, 2020Herbert Simon
/s/ RICHARD S. SOKOLOVVice Chairman and Director February 21, 2020Richard S. Sokolov
/s/ LARR Y C. GLASSCOCKDirector February 21, 2020Larry C. Glasscock
/s/ REUBEN S. LEIBOWITZDirector February 21, 2020Reuben S. Leibowitz
/s/ J. ALBER T SMITH, JR.Director February 21, 2020J. Albert Smith, Jr .
/s/ KAREN N. HORNDirector February 21, 2020Karen N. Horn
/s/ ALLAN HUBBARDDirector February 21, 2020Allan Hubbard
/s/ DANIEL  C. SMITHDirector February 21, 2020Daniel C. Smith
Table of Contents
135Signature Capacity Date
/s/ GAR Y M. RODKINDirector February 21, 2020Gary M. Rodkin
/s/ GLYN F . AEPPELDirector February 21, 2020Glyn F . Aeppel
/s/ STEF AN M. SELIGDirector February 21, 2020Stefan M. Selig
/s/ MAR TA R. STEW ARTDirector February 21, 2020Marta R. Stewart
/s/ BRIAN J. MCDADE Executive V ice President, Chief Financial
Officer (Principal Financial Of ficer) and
TreasurerFebruary 21, 2020
Brian J. McDade
/s/ ADAM J. REUILLE Senior V ice President and Chief Accounting
Officer (Principal Accounting Of ficer)February 21, 2020Adam J. Reuille
Table of Contents
136SCHEDULE III
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Malls
Barton
Creek
Square  Austin, TX $ — $2,903 $ 20,929 $7,983 $ 92,681 $10,886 $ 113,610 $124,496 $ 62,531  1981
Battlefield
Mall  Springfield, MO  115,043  3,919  27,231  3,000  72,652  6,919  99,883  106,802  72,416  1970
Bay Park
Square  Green Bay , WI  —  6,358  25,623  4,106  32,357  10,464  57,980  68,444  34,600  1980
Brea Mall  Brea (Los Angeles), CA  —  39,500  209,202  2,993  76,253  42,493  285,455  327,948  150,527  1998 (4)
Broadway
Square  Tyler, TX  —  11,306  32,431  —  46,983  11,306  79,414  90,720  39,881  1994 (4)
Burlington
Mall  Burlington (Boston), MA  —  46,600  303,618  27,458  204,004  74,058  507,622  581,680  236,539  1998 (4)
Castleton
Square  Indianapolis, IN  —  26,250  98,287  7,434  79,828  33,684  178,115  211,799  115,286  1972
Cielo V ista
Mall  El Paso, TX  —  1,005  15,262  608  56,715  1,613  71,977  73,590  49,480  1974
College
Mall  Bloomington, IN  —  1,003  16,245  720  70,773  1,723  87,018  88,741  45,621  1965
Columbia
Center  Kennewick, W A  —  17,441  66,580  —  42,401  17,441  108,981  126,422  62,150  1987
Copley
Place  Boston, MA  —  —  378,045  —  214,121  —  592,166  592,166  242,594  2002 (4)
Coral
Square  Coral Springs (Miami), FL  —  13,556  93,630  —  20,174  13,556  113,804  127,360  88,716  1984
Cordova
Mall  Pensacola, FL  —  18,626  73,091  7,321  69,914  25,947  143,005  168,952  76,474  1998 (4)
Domain,
The  Austin, TX  180,735  40,436  197,010  —  150,597  40,436  347,607  388,043  164,609  2005
Empire
Mall  Sioux Falls, SD  186,948  35,998  192,186  —  29,900  35,998  222,086  258,084  60,956  1998 (5)
Fashion
Mall at
Keystone,
The  Indianapolis, IN  —  —  120,579  29,145  101,367  29,145  221,946  251,091  125,707  1997 (4)
Firewheel
Town
Center  Garland (Dallas), TX  —  8,438  82,716  —  28,801  8,438  111,517  119,955  62,470  2004
Forum
Shops at
Caesars,
The  Las V egas, NV  —  —  276,567  —  277,394  —  553,961  553,961  275,437  1992
Greenwood
Park Mall  Greenwood (Indianapolis), IN  —  2,423  23,445  5,253  123,737  7,676  147,182  154,858  88,241  1979
Haywood
Mall  Greenville, SC  —  11,585  133,893  6 42,726  11,591  176,619  188,210  109,736  1998 (4)
Ingram
Park Mall  San Antonio, TX  125,225  733  16,972  37  44,000  770  60,972  61,742  32,240  1979
King of
Prussia  King of Prussia (Philadelphia), P A —  175,063  1,128,200  —  374,807  175,063  1,503,007  1,678,070  407,464  2003 (5)
La Plaza
Mall  McAllen, TX  —  87,912  9,828  6,569  184,222  94,481  194,050  288,531  48,508  1976
Lakeline
Mall  Cedar Park (Austin), TX  —  10,088  81,568  14  25,238  10,102  106,806  116,908  62,704  1995
Lenox
Square  Atlanta, GA  —  38,058  492,411  —  140,839  38,058  633,250  671,308  357,413  1998 (4)
Livingston
Mall Livingston (New York), NJ — 22,214 105,250 — 48,437 22,214 153,687 175,901 87,664 1998 (4)
Mall of
Georgia Buford (Atlanta), GA — 47,492 326,633 — 15,033 47,492 341,666 389,158 185,545 1999 (5)
Table of Contents
137Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and Buildings and Buildings and     Accumulated     or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
McCain Mall N. Little Rock, AR $ — $ — $ 9,515 $10,530 $ 29,043 $10,530 $ 38,558 $49,088 $ 16,385 1973
Menlo Park Mall  Edison (New York), NJ  — 65,684  223,252  — 81,610  65,684  304,862  370,546  180,763  1997 (4)
Midland Park Mall  Midland, TX  73,679  687 9,213  1,196  33,966  1,883  43,179  45,062  22,997 1980
Miller Hill Mall  Duluth, MN  —  2,965  18,092   1,811   44,438   4,776   62,530   67,306   44,752  1973
Montgomery Mall  North W ales (Philadelphia), P A 100,000   27,105  86,915   —  64,110   27,105   151,025   178,130   71,996  2004 (5)
North East Mall  Hurst (Dallas), TX  —  128 12,966   19,010   148,122   19,138   161,088   180,226   114,922  1971
Northgate  Seattle, W A  —  23,610  115,992   —  54,357   23,610   170,349   193,959   82,994  1987
Ocean County
Mall  Toms River (New York), NJ  —  20,404  124,945   3,277   71,607   23,681   196,552   220,233   95,906  1998 (4)
Orland Square  Orland Park (Chicago), IL  —  35,439  129,906   —  79,521   35,439   209,427   244,866   110,562  1997 (4)
Oxford V alley Mall  Langhorne (Philadelphia), P A  59,541   24,544  100,287   —  21,445   24,544   121,732   146,276   82,499  2003 (4)
Penn Square Mall  Oklahoma City , OK  310,000   2,043  155,958   —  60,655   2,043   216,613   218,656   129,929  2002 (4)
Pheasant Lane
Mall  Nashua, NH  —  3,902  155,068   550  50,798   4,452   205,866   210,318   111,692  2004 (5)
Phipps Plaza  Atlanta, GA  —  15,005  210,610   —  203,514   15,005   414,124   429,129   160,784  1998 (4)
Plaza Carolina  Carolina (San Juan), PR  225,000   15,493  279,560   —  75,185   15,493   354,745   370,238   164,298  2004 (4)
Prien Lake Mall  Lake Charles, LA  —  1,842  2,813   3,053   60,521   4,895   63,334   68,229   31,771  1972
Rockaway
Townsquare  Rockaway (New York), NJ  —  41,918  212,257   —  66,784   41,918   279,041   320,959   151,799  1998 (4)
Roosevelt Field  Garden City (New York), NY  —  163,160  702,008   1,246   368,267   164,406   1,070,275   1,234,681   500,787  1998 (4)
Ross Park Mall  Pittsburgh, P A  —  23,541  90,203   5,815   129,184   29,356   219,387   248,743   127,819  1986
Santa Rosa Plaza  Santa Rosa, CA  —  10,400  87,864   —  28,927   10,400   116,791   127,191   66,455  1998 (4)
Shops at Chestnut
Hill, The  Chestnut Hill (Boston), MA  120,000   449 25,102   38,864   106,972   39,313   132,074   171,387   37,688  2002 (5)
Shops at Nanuet,
The  Nanuet, NY  —  28,125  142,860   —  10,877   28,125   153,737   181,862   39,309  2013
Shops at
Riverside, The  Hackensack (New York), NJ  130,000   13,521  238,746   —  258,036   13,521   496,782   510,303   80,710  2007 (4) (5)
South Hills V illage  Pittsburgh, P A  —  23,445  125,840   1,472   82,363   24,917   208,203   233,120   103,581  1997 (4)
South Shore Plaza Braintree (Boston), MA —  101,200 301,495  —  165,865  101,200  467,360  568,560  254,866 1998 (4)
Southdale Center  Edina (Minneapolis), MN  141,377   41,430  184,967   —  112,735   41,430   297,702   339,132   65,664  2007 (4) (5)
SouthPark  Charlotte, NC  —  42,092  188,055   100  201,974   42,192   390,029   432,221   213,185  2002 (4)
Southridge Mall Greendale (Milwaukee), WI 114,458 12,359 130,111 1,939 14,033 14,298 144,144 158,442 48,103 2007 (4) (5)
St. Charles Towne
Center Waldorf (W ashington, DC), MD — 7,710 52,934 1,180 30,246 8,890 83,180 92,070 59,918 1990
Table of Contents
138Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and     Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated     or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land        Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Stanford
Shopping
Center  Palo Alto (San Jose), CA $ — $ — $ 339,537  $ — $ 164,618  $ — $ 504,155  $504,155  $ 196,441  2003 (4)
Summit
Mall  Akron, OH 85,000  15,374  51,137  — 57,597  15,374  108,734  124,108  64,652  1965
Tacoma
Mall  Tacoma (Seattle), W A  —  37,113   125,826   —  149,126   37,113   274,952   312,065   138,231  1987
Tippecanoe
Mall  Lafayette, IN  —  2,897   8,439   5,517   48,193   8,414   56,632   65,046   44,397  1973
Town
Center at
Boca
Raton  Boca Raton (Miami), FL  —  64,200   307,317   —  235,698   64,200   543,015   607,215   291,763  1998 (4)
Town
Center at
Cobb  Kennesaw (Atlanta), GA  181,632   32,355   158,225   —  24,154   32,355   182,379   214,734   123,820  1998 (5)
Towne East
Square  Wichita, KS  —  8,525   18,479   4,108   52,323   12,633   70,802   83,435   47,968  1975
Treasure
Coast
Square  Jensen Beach, FL  —  11,124   72,990   3,067   40,463   14,191   113,453   127,644   73,903  1987
Tyrone
Square  St. Petersburg (T ampa), FL  —  15,638   120,962   1,459   51,512   17,097   172,474   189,571   107,064  1972
University
Park Mall  Mishawaka, IN  —  10,762   118,164   7,000   59,528   17,762   177,692   195,454   146,660  1996 (4)
Walt
Whitman
Shops  Huntington Station (New York), NY  —  51,700   111,258   3,789   127,988   55,489   239,246   294,735   122,578  1998 (4)
White Oaks
Mall  Springfield, IL  47,548   2,907   35,692   2,166   66,683   5,073   102,375   107,448   56,577  1977
Wolfchase
Galleria  Memphis, TN  156,170   16,407   128,276   —  17,530   16,407   145,806   162,213   93,616  2002 (4)
Woodland
Hills Mall  Tulsa, OK  —  34,211   187,123   —  34,550   34,211   221,673   255,884   137,063  2004 (5)
Premium
Outlets    
Albertville
Premium
Outlets  Albertville (Minneapolis), MN  —  3,900   97,059   —  11,572   3,900   108,631   112,531   52,010  2004 (4)
Allen
Premium
Outlets  Allen (Dallas), TX  —  20,932  69,788  —  42,478  20,932  112,266  133,198  32,728 2004 (4)
Aurora
Farms
Premium
Outlets Aurora (Cleveland), OH  —  2,370  24,326  —  9,274  2,370  33,600  35,970  23,826 2004 (4)
Birch Run
Premium
Outlets  Birch Run (Detroit), MI  123,000   11,477   77,856   —  8,843   11,477   86,699   98,176   34,066  2010 (4)
Camarillo
Premium
Outlets  Camarillo (Los Angeles), CA  —  16,670   224,721   395  72,239   17,065   296,960   314,025   140,770  2004 (4)
Carlsbad
Premium
Outlets  Carlsbad (San Diego), CA  —  12,890   184,990   96  9,907   12,986   194,897   207,883   84,213  2004 (4)
Carolina
Premium
Outlets  Smithfield (Raleigh), NC  42,982   3,175   59,863   5,311   7,667   8,486   67,530   76,016   36,402  2004 (4)
Chicago
Premium
Outlets  Aurora (Chicago), IL  —  659  118,005   13,050   101,399   13,709   219,404   233,113   79,095  2004 (4)
Cincinnati
Premium
Outlets  Monroe (Cincinnati), OH  —  14,117   71,520   —  5,234   14,117   76,754   90,871   36,619  2008
Clinton
Crossing
Premium
Outlets  Clinton, CT  —  2,060   107,556   1,532   6,098   3,592   113,654   117,246   57,830  2004 (4)
Denver
Premium
Outlets  Thornton (Denver), CO — 11,671  45,335  10 71,266  11,681  116,601  128,282  7,030  2018
Desert Hills
Premium
Outlets Cabazon (Palm Springs), CA — 3,440 338,679 — 115,468 3,440 454,147 457,587 173,343 2004 (4)
Table of Contents
Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and     Buildings and     Buildings and     Accumulated     or  
Name     Location     Encumbrances (6)     Land     Improvements     Land     Improvements     Land     Improvements     Total (1)     Depreciation (2)     Acquisition  
Ellenton
Premium
Outlets  Ellenton (T ampa), FL $ 178,000  $15,807  $ 182,412  $ — $ 7,719  $15,807  $ 190,131  $205,938 $ 96,640 2010 (4)
Folsom
Premium
Outlets  Folsom (Sacramento), CA  — 9,060  50,281  — 5,017  9,060  55,298  64,358 30,972 2004 (4)
Gilroy
Premium
Outlets  Gilroy (San Jose), CA  —  9,630   194,122   —  17,960   9,630   212,082   221,712  100,683 2004 (4)
Grand
Prairie
Premium
Outlets  Grand Prairie (Dallas), TX  111,607   9,497   194,245   —  2,167   9,497   196,412   205,909  47,912 2012
Grove City
Premium
Outlets  Grove City (Pittsburgh), P A  140,000   6,421   121,880   —  7,358   6,421   129,238   135,659  66,003 2010 (4)
Gulfport
Premium
Outlets  Gulfport, MS  50,000   —  27,949   —  7,494   —  35,443   35,443  15,543 2010 (4)
Hagerstown
Premium
Outlets  Hagerstown (Baltimore/W ashington, DC), MD  74,655   3,576   85,883   —  2,930   3,576   88,813   92,389  36,464 2010 (4)
Houston
Premium
Outlets  Cypress (Houston), TX  —  8,695   69,350   —  48,112   8,695   117,462   126,157  50,806 2007
Indiana
Premium
Outlets Edinburgh (Indianapolis), IN — 2,857 47,309 — 19,704 2,857 67,013 69,870 34,573 2004 (4)
Jackson
Premium
Outlets  Jackson (New York), NJ  —  6,413   104,013   3  8,413   6,416   112,426   118,842  50,036 2004 (4)
Jersey
Shore
Premium
Outlets  Tinton Falls (New York), NJ  —  15,390   50,979   —  79,060   15,390   130,039   145,429  61,084 2007
Johnson
Creek
Premium
Outlets  Johnson Creek, WI  —  2,800   39,546   —  6,978   2,800   46,524   49,324  22,152 2004 (4)
Kittery
Premium
Outlets  Kittery , ME  —  11,832   94,994   —  11,024   11,832   106,018   117,850  44,198 2004 (4)
Las
Americas
Premium
Outlets  San Diego, CA  —  45,168   251,878   —  11,088   45,168   262,966   308,134  94,764 2007 (4)
Las V egas
North
Premium
Outlets  Las V egas, NV  —  25,435   134,973   16,536   151,951   41,971   286,924   328,895  123,087 2004 (4)
Las V egas
South
Premium
Outlets  Las V egas, NV  —  13,085   160,777   —  33,215   13,085   193,992   207,077  82,007 2004 (4)
Lee
Premium
Outlets  Lee, MA  50,710   9,167   52,212   —  4,313   9,167   56,525   65,692  27,692 2010 (4)
Leesburg
Corner
Premium
Outlets  Leesburg (W ashington, DC), V A  —  7,190   162,023   —  20,557   7,190   182,580   189,770  84,560 2004 (4)
Lighthouse
Place
Premium
Outlets  Michigan City (Chicago, IL), IN  —  6,630   94,138   —  13,222   6,630   107,360   113,990  56,227 2004 (4)
Merrimack
Premium
Outlets  Merrimack, NH  119,120   14,975   118,428   —  2,684   14,975   121,112   136,087  38,616 2012
Napa
Premium
Outlets  Napa, CA  —  11,400  45,023  —  7,621  11,400  52,644  64,044  25,980 2004 (4)
North Bend
Premium
Outlets  North Bend (Seattle), W A  —  2,143   36,197   —  5,757   2,143   41,954   44,097  18,761 2004 (4)
North
Georgia
Premium
Outlets  Dawsonville (Atlanta), GA  —  4,300   137,020   —  1,785   4,300   138,805   143,105  63,672 2004 (4)
Orlando
International
Premium
Outlets  Orlando, FL  —  31,998   472,815   —  17,151   31,998   489,966   521,964  165,855 2010 (4)
Orlando
Vineland
Premium
Outlets  Orlando, FL  —  14,040   382,949   36,023   6,279   50,063   389,228   439,291  166,168 2004 (4)
Petaluma
Village
Premium
Outlets  Petaluma (San Francisco), CA  —  13,322   13,710   —  4,428   13,322   18,138   31,460  11,127 2004 (4)
Philadelphia
Premium
Outlets  Limerick (Philadelphia), P A  —  16,676   105,249   —  26,355   16,676   131,604   148,280  68,622 2006
Phoenix
Premium
Outlets  Chandler (Phoenix), AZ  — — 63,082  — 634 — 63,716  63,716 21,380 2013
Pismo
Beach
Premium
Outlets  Pismo Beach, CA  34,590  4,317  19,044  — 2,906  4,317  21,950  26,267 12,267 2010 (4)
139
Table of Contents
140Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
Buildings and     Buildings and Buildings and Accumulated or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Pleasant
Prairie
Premium
Outlets  Pleasant Prairie (Chicago, IL/Milwaukee), WI  $ 145,000  $16,823  $ 126,686  $ — $ 7,337  $16,823  $ 134,023  $150,846  $ 50,807  2010 (4)
Puerto Rico
Premium
Outlets  Barceloneta, PR  160,000   20,586   114,021   —  9,301   20,586   123,322   143,908   46,781  2010 (4)
Queenstown
Premium
Outlets  Queenstown (Baltimore), MD  60,767   8,129   61,950   —  5,095   8,129   67,045   75,174   26,943  2010 (4)
Rio Grande
Valley
Premium
Outlets  Mercedes (McAllen), TX  —  12,229   41,547   —  32,631   12,229   74,178   86,407   42,057  2005
Round Rock
Premium
Outlets  Round Rock (Austin), TX  —  14,706   82,252   —  6,541   14,706   88,793   103,499   51,123  2005
San
Francisco
Premium
Outlets  Livermore (San Francisco), CA  —  21,925   308,694   46,177   75,029   68,102   383,723   451,825   84,035  2012
San Marcos
Premium
Outlets  San Marcos (Austin/San Antonio), TX  —  13,180   287,179   —  12,207   13,180   299,386   312,566   105,137  2010 (4)
Seattle
Premium
Outlets Tulalip (Seattle), W A —  —  103,722  —  53,899  —  157,621  157,621  72,850 2004 (4)
St.
Augustine
Premium
Outlets St. Augustine (Jacksonville), FL —  6,090  57,670  2  12,437  6,092  70,107  76,199  36,240 2004 (4)
Tampa
Premium
Outlets  Lutz (T ampa), FL  —  14,298   97,188   121  5,135   14,419   102,323   116,742   19,150  2015
The
Crossings
Premium
Outlets  Tannersville, P A  105,802   7,720   172,931   —  18,399   7,720   191,330   199,050   84,345  2004 (4)
Tucson
Premium
Outlets Marana (T ucson), AZ —  12,508  69,677  —  5,900  12,508  75,577  88,085  14,223 2015
Vacaville
Premium
Outlets  Vacaville, CA  —  9,420   84,850   —  19,156   9,420   104,006   113,426   53,763  2004 (4)
Waikele
Premium
Outlets  Waipahu (Honolulu), HI  —  22,630   77,316   —  20,953   22,630   98,269   120,899   45,639  2004 (4)
Waterloo
Premium
Outlets  Waterloo, NY  —  3,230   75,277   —  14,935   3,230   90,212   93,442   45,560  2004 (4)
Williamsburg
Premium
Outlets Williamsburg, V A 185,000  10,323  223,789  —  7,992  10,323  231,781  242,104  80,017 2010 (4)
Woodburn
Premium
Outlets  Woodburn (Portland), OR  —  9,414   150,414   —  2,983   9,414   153,397   162,811   41,386  2013 (4)
Woodbury
Common
Premium
Outlets Central V alley (New York), NY — 11,110 862,559 1,658 262,904 12,768 1,125,463 1,138,231 416,863 2004 (4)
Wrentham
Village
Premium
Outlets Wrentham (Boston), MA —  4,900  282,031  —  43,343  4,900  325,374  330,274  137,981 2004 (4)
The Mills
Arizona Mills Tempe (Phoenix), AZ 149,481  41,936  297,289  —  18,788  41,936  316,077  358,013  64,198 2007 (4) (5)
Great Mall Milpitas (San Jose), CA —  69,853  463,101  —  57,898  69,853  520,999  590,852  137,261 2007 (4) (5)
Gurnee Mills Gurnee (Chicago), IL 259,455  41,133  297,911  —  30,392  41,133  328,303  369,436  90,091 2007 (4) (5)
Mills at
Jersey
Gardens,
The Elizabeth, NJ 350,000  120,417  865,605  —  17,732  120,417  883,337  1,003,754  166,147 2015 (4)
Opry Mills Nashville, TN 375,000  51,000  327,503  —  16,815  51,000  344,318  395,318  92,169 2007 (4) (5)
Outlets at
Orange, The Orange (Los Angeles), CA 215,000 64,973 211,322 — 2,728 64,973 214,050 279,023 9,940 2007 (4) (5)
Potomac
Mills Woodbridge (W ashington, DC), V A 416,000 61,755 425,370 — 40,019 61,755 465,389 527,144 132,379 2007 (4) (5)
Sawgrass
Mills Sunrise (Miami), FL — 192,981 1,641,153 5,395 205,643 198,376 1,846,796 2,045,172 465,457 2007 (4) (5)
Table of Contents
141Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Real Estate and Accumulated Depreciation
December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
Cost Capitalized  
Subsequent to Gross Amounts At Which Date of  
Initial Cost (3) Acquisition (3) Carried At Close of Period Construction  
        Buildings and         Buildings and         Buildings and         Accumulated     or  
Name     Location    Encumbrances (6)    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Land    Improvements    Total (1)    Depreciation (2)    Acquisition  
Designer
Outlets
La Reggia
Designer
Outlet  Marcianise (Naples), Italy $ 141,001  $ 37,220  $ 233,179  $ — $ 12,562  $ 37,220  $ 245,741  $ 282,961  $ 37,075  2013 (4) (5) 
Noventa Di
Piave
Designer
Outlet  Venice, Italy 313,701 38,793 309,284 — 60,729 38,793 370,013 408,806 47,723  2013 (4) (5) 
Parndorf
Designer
Outlet Vienna, Austria 207,487 14,903 221,442 — 5,331 14,903 226,773 241,676 42,149 2013 (4) (5) 
Provence
Designer
Outlet Provence, France 91,855 38,467 77,827 6,169 — 44,636 77,827 122,463 16,397 2017 (4) (5) 
Roermond
Designer
Outlet Roermond, Netherlands 257,958 15,035 400,094 — 8,833 15,035 408,927 423,962 72,303 2013 (4) (5) 
Roosendaal
Designer
Outlet Roosendaal, Netherlands 65,447 22,191 108,069 — 3,927 22,191 111,996 134,187 15,962 2017 (4) (5) 
Community
Centers
ABQ
Uptown Albuquerque, NM — 6,374 75,333 4,054 7,532 10,428 82,865 93,293 26,891 2011 (4)
University
Park V illage  Fort W orth, TX 55,000   18,031  100,523  — 4,675  18,031  105,198  123,229  18,306  2015 (4)
  
Other
Properties
Calhoun
Outlet
Marketplace Calhoun, GA 18,311   1,745  12,529  — 2,471  1,745  15,000  16,745  9,683 2010 (4)
Florida Keys
Outlet
Center Florida City , FL 17,000 1,112 1,748 — 4,127 1,112 5,875 6,987 3,397 2010 (4)
Gaffney
Outlet
Marketplace Gaffney (Greenville/Charlotte), SC 29,581   4,056  32,371  — 6,347  4,056  38,718  42,774  19,448 2010 (4)
Lincoln
Plaza King of Prussia (Philadelphia), P A — — 21,299 — 12,963 — 34,262 34,262 16,147 2003 (4)
Orlando
Outlet
Marketplace Orlando, FL — 3,367 1,557 — 3,347 3,367 4,904 8,271 2,555 2010 (4)
Osage
Beach
Marketplace Osage Beach, MO — 9,460 85,804 — 8,905 9,460 94,709 104,169 54,997 2004 (4)
Other pre-
development
costs — 107,403 134,874 959 — 108,362 134,874 243,236 78
Other 25,000 3,537 40,304 — — 3,537 40,304 43,841 11,138
Currency
Translation
Adjustment — 4,300 5,364 — 19,165 4,300 24,529 28,829 (22,517 )
$ 6,920,866 $3,334,769 $25,051,178 $357,287 $8,613,505 $3,692,056 $33,664,683 $37,356,739 $13,622,433
Table of Contents
142Simon Property Group, Inc.
Simon Property Group, L.P.
Notes to Schedule III as of December 31, 2019
(Dollars in thousands)
(1) Reconciliation of Real Estate Properties:
The changes in real estate assets for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 are as follows:
    2019     2018     2017  
Balance, beginning of year $36,667,960 $36,014,506 $34,897,942
Acquisitions and consolidations (7)  40,990  328,265  328,621
Improvements  899,728  758,135  731,863
Disposals and deconsolidations  (219,268 ) (357,622 ) (125,499 )
Currency Translation Adjustment (32,671 ) (75,324 ) 181,579
Balance, close of year $37,356,739 $36,667,960 $36,014,506
The unaudited aggregate cost of domestic consolidated real estate assets for U.S. federal income tax purposes as of
December 31, 2019 was $21,435,574.
(2) Reconciliation of Accumulated Depreciation:
The changes in accumulated depreciation for the years ended December 31, 2019, 2018, and 2017 are as follows:
    2019     2018     2017  
Balance, beginning of year $12,632,690 $11,704,223 $10,664,738
Depreciation expense (7)  1,176,815  1,106,053  1,121,863
Disposals and deconsolidations  (194,664 ) (190,241 ) (81,187 )
Currency Translation Adjustment 7,592 12,655 (1,191 )
Balance, close of year $13,622,433 $12,632,690 $11,704,223
Depreciation of our investment in buildings and improvements reflected in the consolidated statements of operations and
comprehensive income is calculated over the estimated original lives of the assets as noted below.
●Buildings and Improvements — typically 10-35 years for the structure, 15 years for landscaping and parking lot, and 10
years for HVAC equipment.
●Tenant Allowances and Improvements — shorter of lease term or useful life.
(3) Initial cost generally represents net book value at December 20, 1993, except for acquired properties and new
developments after December 20, 1993. Initial cost also includes any new developments that are opened during the
current year. Costs of disposals and impairments of property are first reflected as a reduction to cost capitalized
subsequent to acquisition.
(4) Not developed/constructed by us or our predecessors. The date of construction represents the initial acquisition date for
assets in which we have acquired multiple interests.
(5) Initial cost for these properties is the cost at the date of consolidation for properties previously accounted for under the
equity method of accounting.
(6) Encumbrances represent face amount of mortgage debt and exclude any premiums or discounts and deferred financing
costs.
(7) Represents the original cost and does not include subsequent currency translation adjustments.
